_	Kramer’s "Music as Cultural Practice" (1990) set forth the principle that music takes on complex meanings as a result of its participation the circulation of valuations and practices that constitute culture.
_	The Court, however, made clear that it would review deduction determinations in light of the principle that the "federal income tax is a tax on net income, not a sanction against wrongdoing."
_	Pratītyasamutpāda (; "paṭiccasamuppāda"), commonly translated as dependent origination, or dependent arising, is the principle that all "dharmas" ("phenomena") arise in dependence upon other "dharmas": "if this exists, that exists; if this ceases to exist, that also ceases to exist".
_	People who identify as YIMBY come from all over the political spectrum, from far left-wingers who believe in social justice, to free-market libertarians who feel that the supply of housing should not be regulated by the government (see Market urbanist); together they agree on the principle that cities should be affordable and accessible for everyone, and the way to accomplish that is by building more housing.
_	Besides reinforcing the principle that a person can receive general damages for breaches of privacy for humiliation and injury of feelings, it set the precedent of increasing such an award from the then $7,500 to $10,000, and was prominent enough to be included on the Privacy Commission's June 2012 newsletter.
_	As conflicting claims grew out of the controversy, maritime states came to moderate their demands and base their maritime claims on the principle that it extended seawards from land.
_	EPR is based upon the principle that because producers (usually brand owners) have the greatest control over product design and marketing and these same companies have the greatest ability and responsibility to reduce toxicity and waste.
_	One of his first acts, after preventing the application of capital punishment to the ringleaders of the revolt, was to veto the project of protecting the khedive and his government by means of a Praetorian guard recruited from Asia Minor, Epirus, Austria and Switzerland, and to insist on the principle that Egypt must be governed in a truly liberal spirit.
_	Legal objections could also be raised on the principle that the Clean Water Act itself violates the Commerce Clause of the Constitution.
_	Fulop aggressively advocated for this policy and worked with the municipal council for its passage citing it as a basic human dignity issue that builds upon the principle that a healthy employee is a more productive employee.
_	Explaining the HCSA position, he said: ""As with our position on the consultant aspect of the DDRB proposals currently being pursued by the government and employers, this stance is guided by the principle that any successful outcome must balance safety, fairness and work-life balance.
_	Bordeaux contends that the ends justify the means, while Scott adheres to the principle that heroes should not kill unless absolutely necessary.
_	Hugh Ross adheres to a literal translation of Genesis 1 and 2 and holds to the principle that "Scripture interprets Scripture” to shed light on the context of the Creation account.
_	The Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit upheld the principle that civil rights laws could not be used to stifle legitimate political debate of these matters.
_	This test is based on the principle that cytochalasin D very effectively inhibits platelet function by inhibition of the contractile elements.
_	In 1566 the president put into effect the principle that a monopoly of trade belonged to the Crown, as opposed to the councils of some cities, like Velez or Tocaima, which had jurisdiction in ports on the Magdalena River of those who had derived revenue.
_	He maintained the principle that hounds should account for their fox with as little assistance as possible, and work out their own success.
_	Using the principle that any function with a finite number of possible outputs placed in a feedback loop will cycle, one can use a relatively small amount of memory to store outputs with particular structures and use them as "markers" to better detect when a marker has been "passed" before.
_	V, tit. xxxix), Innocent III sets forth the principle that governs such cases: "When it is difficult for the excommunicated person to go to him who excommunicated him, he may be absolved by his bishop or even by his own priest, on promising to obey the orders of him by whom excommunication was pronounced."
_	This is the principle that moralists and canonists formulated as an axiom:
_	Hobson subscribes to an outwardly benevolent paternalistic fascism, based on the principle that "democracy is a form of group suicide".
_	However, some of the arguments that he constructed himself were not widely accepted amongst the scientific community; he says, for example, that "the special creation of a species of animal or plant is not thinkable" because it would contravene the principle that both matter and energy are conserved.
_	His ventures include English Proper, a translation company; The Infinite Faculty, an online university, web design firm, and rock band; and Die Grosse Liebe, an exhibition and film based on the principle that love is "a powerful force" (he and his collaborator, Åsa Elzén, embarked on a world tour in 2003-04 to visit former lovers on several continents).
_	This tactic is based on the principle that:
_	Hemanth Kumar of "The Times of India" also gave the film 3.5 out of 5 stars and called it an "ode to classic style of filmmaking — clinical in its approach and hits just about the perfect notes to keep the audience hooked, without much gimmickry", adding that the film's biggest achievement is that it "respects our intelligence and reinforces the principle that story-telling isn't a dying art".
_	In some jurisdictions, malice can also be negated by imperfect self-defense, the principle that an honest but unreasonable belief that it is necessary to defend yourself from imminent peril to life or great bodily injury negates malice aforethought, the mental element necessary for a murder charge, so that the chargeable offense is reduced to manslaughter.
_	The Erster Rezess established the principle that in Hamburg nobody may be arrested at the government's will but only after a prior judicial hearing and conviction (except of in flagrante delicto).
_	The EMCDDA was founded on the principle that independent scientific research is a "vital resource to help Europe understand the nature of its drug problems and better respond to them."
_	President Barack Obama had also supported the referendum, writing, "I am firmly committed to the principle that the question of political status is a matter of self-determination for the people of Puerto Rico."
_	The Comvik approach set out in decision T 641/00 is consistent with the principle that "technically non-functional modifications are (...) irrelevant to inventive step, even if the skilled person would never think of such a modification."<ref name="T 176/97">T
_	The solid principle, the solid basis upon which every honest man ought to make up his mind on this issue, may be summed up in the principle that we all claimed when it was first enunciated by the President, the principle of government by the consent of the governed.
_	His overtly belligerent image did not prevent newspapers from declaring he had done more for peace than anyone else, on the principle that Mussolini always did better than everyone else.
_	He was quoted as saying: "Sunni participation in this election will certainly lead to the establishment of the principle that Sunnis in Iraq are a minority who have to be ruled by the rejectionists" (a term used by radical Sunnis to describe Shi'a Muslims), he also said that his group would use "primarily military means to prevent these elections".
_	Judicial economy is the principle that the limited resources of the legal system or a given court should be conserved by the refusal to decide one or more claims raised in a case.
_	The other face looks toward the principle that governmental intervention in religious matters can itself endanger religious freedom."
_	Moreover, in Article 52, it establishes the principle that if threats of using force are made during diplomatic negotiations, then any resulting treaty is invalid, stating "A treaty is void if its conclusion has been procured by the threat or use of force in violation of the principles of international law embodied in the Charter of the United Nations".
_	This strategy is guided by the principle that more will be learned through complementary investigation of multiple trace elements than can be achieved in an exhaustive study of one element in isolation.
_	The 2012 Democratic Party platform endorsed the principle that no one should face discrimination based on their gender, sexual orientation, and gender identity, such as trans-genders, gay, lesbian and/or Bi-sexual support for the Employment Non-Discrimination Act, anti-bullying prevention for LGBT youth, the Don't Ask, Don't Tell Repeal Act of 2010, and the Matthew Shepard and James Byrd Jr. Hate Crimes Prevention Act.
_	The strongest criticism against all such codes of Jewish law is the contention that they inherently violate the principle that halakha must be decided according to the "later" sages; this principle is commonly known as "hilkheta ke-vatra'ei" ("the "halakha" follows the later ones").
_	Voluntarism, sometimes referred to as voluntary action, is the principle that individuals are free to choose goals and how to achieve them within the bounds of certain societal and cultural constraints, as opposed to actions that are coerced or predetermined.
_	This contributed to the adoption of the principle that the British navy must equal the combined force of the other two greatest world navies.
_	In recognizing the principle that all living beings have intrinsic worth, there is an acknowledgement that they are good for their own sake.
_	The guidelines follow the principle that segregation is permissible if the Equality Act 2010 is followed and equal priority is given to all groups, in a manner similar to the former "separate but equal" doctrine in United States constitutional law that justified racial segregation until the Civil Rights Act of 1964.
_	This opinion established the principle that Congressional statutes providing remedial action should be construed liberally toward the aim of Congress' intent in passing the statute.
_	It also articulated the principle that if an installment payment was not overdue at the time a suit was commenced, it was not time barred from being brought in a later suit.
_	In his first year, he laid down the principle that in order to retain their right to the mining land that they owned, owners of mining land were obliged to see that their land was worked.
_	Singh refuses to surrender on the principle that while he was a sportsman holding a national record, nobody came to help him with his problems, and the moment he turned a rebel, everyone wants him to be arrested.
_	As conflicting claims grew out of the controversy, maritime states came to moderate their demands and base their maritime claims on the principle that it extended seawards from land.
_	ISSU's activities have three stated strands: it aims to provide training, guidance and advice to students and to equip them with the skills needed to become involved in the decision-making processes in their own school communities; and it aims to work with other organisations to bring the views of secondary school students to the attention of policy-makers and the media; and it aims to provide services to the membership of ISSU on the principle that control of those services lies with the membership.
_	The scenes are organized based on the principle that Adam and Christ mirror each other - with Christ's sacrificial death redeeming Adam's sin.
_	In architecture, functionalism is the principle that buildings should be designed based solely on the purpose and function of the building.
_	In her ruling, Judge Wright Allen inadvertently attributed the principle that "all men are created equal" to the Constitution, rather than the Declaration of Independence - an error which she corrected in a subsequent amended ruling.
_	Despite the criticisms, few people object to the principle that mail-receiving sites should be able to reject undesired mail systematically.
_	Based her observations on the principle that similarly ruled paper would have been created at the same time.
_	This case arguably stands for the principle that the creation and publication of a carefully written parody novel in the United States counts as fair use.
_	This suffices to explain the principle that actuated Abraham ben David in his intense opposition to Maimonides, and particularly to his "Yad ha-Ḥazaḳah," which David himself designates as a great achievement (Kilayim, vi. 2).
_	Monro's original appointment as professor was only at the pleasure of the Town Council, but in 1722, encouraged by his success, he applied for a permanent status, and although the council had as lately as August 1719 reaffirmed the principle that regentships and professor ships were to be held at their pleasure, nevertheless they departed from it and by resolution of 14 March 1722, nominated Alexander Monro sole Professor of Anatomy in the City and College.
_	According to the 2016 platform, the party's stance on the status of Taiwan is: "We oppose any unilateral steps by either side to alter the status quo in the Taiwan Straits on the principle that all issues regarding the island's future must be resolved peacefully, through dialogue, and be agreeable to the people of Taiwan".
_	Sun Pingzi (孫平子), however, believed that this violated the principle that past emperors should all be worshipped.
_	The EBR technology is based on the principle that microbes mediate the removal of metal and inorganic contaminants through electron transfer (redox processes).
_	"Goursez Breizh" has members who are Christian, Jewish or atheist; on the principle that anyone living in Brittany is Breton.
_	A Department of External Affairs memorandum in 1953 stated: "Our immigration is based firmly on the principle that we are and intend to remain a country of European development.
_	This technology is based on the principle that a change in the proximal environment of GFP, such as unfolding and aggregation of the protein of interest, is measurable through its effect on the fluorescence of the fluorophore.
_	H.A. Prichard gave a defense of the view in his "Does Moral Philosophy Rest on a Mistake?" (1912), wherein he contended that moral philosophy rested chiefly on the desire to provide arguments starting from non-normative premises for the principles of obligation that we pre-philosophically accept, such as the principle that one ought to keep one's promises or that one ought not to steal.
_	The CSD operates on the principle that building local knowledge of democratization and good governance is the most effective means of allowing countries undergoing democratic transitions to successfully manage this change over the long term, as well as being able to effectively respond to crises.
_	This tradition embodies the principle that – while adults should be free to see, hear and read what they want – children should be protected from material that may be unsuitable for (or harmful to) them, and everyone should be protected from material that is highly offensive.
_	Variations of the Theil–Sen estimator based on weighted medians have also been studied, based on the principle that pairs of samples whose -coordinates differ more greatly are more likely to have an accurate slope and therefore should receive a higher weight.
_	The decision relied on the principle that the power to dispose of income and the enjoyment of property's economic benefits is the equivalent of ownership.
_	He emphasized particularly the principle that every academic discipline can be taught and debated through the medium of Welsh, a principle that is now central to the Coleg’s academic strategy."
_	In devising ways of classifying organisms the philosopher Aristotle (384–322 BCE) established the important idea of a "fundamentum divisionis" — the principle that groups can be progressively subdivided.
_	During periods when the predominantly unionist MPs from Northern Ireland deprived Labour of working majorities, Conservatives supported the principle that "every member of the House of Commons is equal to every other member of the House of Commons".
_	At the basis of the regulatory system is the principle that no technology is fail proof, so licensees must incorporate multiple layers of protection whenever radioactive materials are used.
_	Through his research, Nierenberg developed a negotiation ideology based on the principle that "in a successful negotiation, everybody wins."
_	This technique is based on the principle that all objects absorb radiation from the environment.
_	The reason the program had any hope of success was because of crossing, the principle that the forces between particles are determined by particle exchange.
_	To Paschasius, the Eucharist's transformation into the flesh and blood of Christ is possible because of the principle that God is truth; God is able to manipulate nature, as he created it.
_	The anti-vaccine movement mobilized following the decision and the Anti-Vaccination League of America was founded three years later in Philadelphia to promote the principle that "health is nature's greatest safeguard against disease and that therefore no State has the right to demand of anyone the impairment of his or her health."
_	To turn certain bits on, the bitwise codice_2 operation can be used, following the principle that codice_3 and codice_4.
_	Since preserving a life is probably more highly valued than adhering to the principle that lying is wrong, lying to save someone’s life is acceptable.
_	An ordinance issued 24 July 1936 reiterated the principle that the newly conquered country, as in the older colonies, would have two different types of educational institutions, namely "Italian type schools" and schools for "colonial subjects."
_	Near the end of "Forging the Darksword", Joram deduced that, in a world that exudes magic, there must exist a force capable of absorbing it, going by the principle that 'for every action, there is an opposite and equal reaction'.
_	The Protocol also reaffirms the principle that developed countries have to pay billions of dollars, and supply technology to other countries for climate-related studies and projects.
_	The temperature gradient gel electrophoresis (TGGE) or temperature gradient capillary electrophoresis (TGCE) method is based on the principle that partially denatured DNA is more restricted and travels slower in a porous material such as a gel.
_	This approach sticks to the principle that Israel is the first country in the Middle East to receive the newest fighter aircraft.
_	Maintaining the principle that theological education must be maintained by the churches and for the churches, the federation operates the Canadian Reformed Theological Seminary, which is located in Hamilton, Ontario.
_	Once the principle that an electronic document can have legal value was accepted, it was possible to deal with its management within a telematic procedure.
_	Chaffetz opposes net neutrality, the principle that Internet service providers should not be allowed to discriminate or charge differentially by user, content, website or platform.
_	It is designed around the principle that the subjective value of a reinforcer decreases, or is 'discounted,' as the delay to reinforcement increases.
_	Modeling is defined as the automation of Enterprise Business Models based on the principle that the model's underlying business processes and business services need to be dynamically and openly definable and re-definable.
_	In the end a judgment must be made to balance the principle that one transaction generally attracts concurrent sentences with the principle that the overall criminal conduct must be appropriately recognised and that distinct acts may in the circumstances attract distinct penalties.
_	While the IHO are often considered the authority for such conventions, the shift brought them into line with the practices of other publications (e.g. the CIA "World Fact Book") which already adopted the principle that seas are contained within oceans.
_	In the 17th century Thomas Hobbes founded a contractualist theory of legal positivism beginning from the principle that man in the state of nature, which is to say without a "commonwealth" (a state) is in a state of constant war one with the other and thus in fear of his life and possessions (there being no property nor right without a sovereign to define it).
_	On 27 June, the unification of the self-proclaimed Serbian Autonomous Oblasts (SAOs) of Krajina in Croatia and Bosanska Krajina in Bosnia and Herzegovina was declared in response to the "disintegration of Yugoslavia, caused by the secession of Slovenia and Croatia" and on "the principle that all Serbs should live in one state."
_	This shortage of flour broke the principle that required the king to ensure the security of his subjects and their food supply.
_	A related term, "secularism", involves the principle that government institutions and their representatives should remain separate from religious institutions, their beliefs, and their dignitaries.
_	A strong believer in the principle that women and not men should administer women's sports, she became a member of the Victorian Women's Amateur Sports Council, and was later the patron of the Victorian Women's Hockey Association.
_	It is from this fact that is derived the principle that says that a being knows only the modifications of its own substance; or consciousness is aware only of its own modalities".
_	It works on the principle that blue cyanine dye is a substrate for HRP and red dye is a substrate for AP.
_	The Council sought to: (a) bring an end to the practice of the conferring of ecclesiastical benefices by people who were laymen; (b) free the election of bishops and abbots from secular influence; (c) clarify the separation of spiritual and temporal affairs; (d) re-establish the principle that spiritual authority resides solely in the Church; (e) abolish the claim of the emperors to influence papal elections.
_	Mr. Havel based his idea for Forum 2000 on the principle that, “it would be good if intelligent people, not only from the various ends of the earth, different continents, different cultures, from civilization's religious circles, but also from different disciplines of human knowledge could come together somewhere in calm discussion.
_	The main impact of the case was its reiteration of the principle that the Supreme Court could always intervene in state capital cases if there was a question of violation of the right to due process contained in the US Constitution.
_	In 1907 he helped establish the "Little Landers" colony of Tujunga, which was based on the principle that everything a family could need might be gained through farming the property that they owned and that "land had value only if people lived on it."
_	[5][6] Mixing emotional responses by evoking sadness at the end of the play was considered a violation of the principle that comedy and tragedy were supposed to be separate entities, each consistent in tone and in the feelings they produced in the audience.
_	This includes the principle that, with exceptions for enactments or provisions within the Code, no health care procedure shall be carried out without informed consent, the duties and obligations of health care providers and the rights of consumers.
_	The most important of these was the principle that came to be called Ampère's law, which states that the mutual action of two lengths of current-carrying wire is proportional to their lengths and to the intensities of their currents.
_	Often, though, he embroidered Homer's verse, following the principle that has since become known as dynamic equivalence or thought-for-thought translation.
_	As long as Leo Amery as Colonial Secretary attempted to qualify the principle that the interests of Africans in tropical Africa would be treated as paramount, he gave tacit encouragement to these Northern Rhodesian settler aspirations.
_	He still thought about accelerators, though, and in 1952, along with Ernest Courant, Hartland Snyder and J. Blewett at Brookhaven, developed strong focusing, the principle that the net effect on a particle beam of charged particles passing through alternating field gradients is to make the beam converge.
_	4-A made the Director of Central Intelligence responsible for psychological warfare, establishing at the same time the principle that covert action was an exclusively Executive Branch function.
_	Khi does this by analyzing the morphological changes of arterial pressure waveforms on a bit-by-bit basis, based on the principle that changes in compliance or resistance affect the shape of the arterial pressure waveform.
_	These receptors, located along the mouth and nose of the fish, operate according to the principle that a time-varying magnetic field moving through a conductor induces an electric potential across the ends of the conductor.
_	Others have supported him, on the principle that "drivers are free to race".
_	AC 25.1309–1 establishes the principle that the more severe the hazard resulting from a system or equipment failure, the less likely that failure must be.
_	They underscore the importance of consistent exposure to expository Bible teaching throughout the believer’s life on Earth, under the principle that "man shall not live on bread alone, but on every word that proceeds out of the mouth of God" (Matt. 4:4).
_	J stressed the importance of the principle that the Commonwealth's power over trade and commerce extends only to intrastate trade and commerce that is inseparably connected with interstate trade and commerce.
_	He established the principle that this river, which runs through the Netherlands, defined a natural boundary between Gaul and Germania magna.
_	The method is based on the principle that the best way to study the Indian legal system and relevant laws is from precedent, i.e. a principle or rule established in a previous legal case that is either binding on or persuasive for a court or other tribunal when deciding subsequent cases with similar issues or facts.
_	Others have supported him, on the principle that "drivers are free to race".
_	The American Bar Association "affirms the principle that dependence on alcohol or other drugs is a disease."
_	Throughout the world the EWS is based on the principle that clinical deterioration can be seen through changes in multiple physiological measurements, as well as large changes within a single variable.
_	Ogri is the living embodiment of the principle that it is the rider, not the machine, that determines speed; he can outrace lesser mortals over any going whatever, no matter what they are riding.
_	Critics contend that the book is based on a pseudoscientific theory called the "law of attraction"—the principle that "like attracts like".
_	Lloyd later wrote that agreement had been reached on the Six Principles, but not on "how" to implement them, although he conceded that Nasser had never accepted the principle that the Canal could not be under the control of any one country.
_	For example, in the work of Harish-Chandra one finds the principle that what can be done for one semisimple (or reductive)
_	Most reconstructions of social communities by archaeologists rely on the principle that social interaction is conditioned by physical distance.
_	In the 21st Century the Award is especially intended by its presenters to honor those whose lives and works exemplify the principle that international peace, universal socioeconomic justice, and planetary environmental harmony are interdependent and inseparable, and all three are essential to the survival of civilization.
_	He told the almost 2000 convention attendees that he rejected the principle that Quebec has the right to self-determination through unilateral separation from Canada.
_	Section 35.1 commits the governments of Canada and the provinces "to the principle that, before any amendment is made [to subsection 91(24) of the "Constitution Act, 1867", section 25 of the Charter or sections 35 or 35.1 of the Constitution Act, 1982]" that the Prime Minister will convene a conference of first ministers (i.e. provincial premiers) to discuss the amendment and invite "representatives of the aboriginal peoples of Canada" to discuss the amendment.
_	However, from the 13th century onwards, English diocesan bishops successfully established the principle that only the glebe and 'greater tithes' of grain, hay and wood could be appropriated by monastic patrons in this manner; the 'lesser tithes' had to remain within the parochial benefice; the incumbent of which thenceforward carried the title of 'vicar'.
_	The Harrogate Improvement Commissioners Board's " 1841 Harrogate Act" established the principle that the poor should not be excluded from the perceived medicinal benefits of Harrogate's sulphur water.
_	He believed these men had pursued treasonous policies and tried to ruin his life when he criticized them but at the same time subscribed to the principle that a civilized government should not put former ministers to death.
_	The Poor Relief Act of 1576 went on to establish the principle that if the able-bodied poor needed support, they had to work for it.
_	He advocated the principle that families settling on an acre or two of land could support themselves and create a flourishing community.
_	He opposes same-sex marriage, and has voted against legislation which would establish net neutrality, which refers to the principle that Internet service providers cannot discriminate by user, content, website, or platform, and has voted in favor of legislation that would require photo IDs for voting in federal elections.
_	The case established the principle that when primary legislation is ambiguous and certain criteria are satisfied, courts may refer to statements made in the House of Commons or the House of Lords in an attempt to interpret the meaning of the legislation.
_	He said that martial law "is founded upon the principle that the state has a right to protect itself against those who would destroy it, and has therefore been likened to the right of an individual to self-defense."
_	It is based on the principle that signals with excessive and possibly spurious detail have high total variation, that is, the integral of the absolute gradient of the signal is high.
_	Loevinger chose to use a projective test, relying on the principle that item stem responses are a reflection of internal, conscious and unconscious processes.
_	The axiom "AX" is now justified based on the principle that what will predictably happen every time this experiment is performed, should at the very least be possible.
_	Also, unlike the other two programs, the principle that the national government should contribute a portion of the underwriting cost, with the other two portions prorated accordingly, was accepted without question.
_	Another type of transistor, the field-effect transistor, operates on the principle that semiconductor conductivity can be increased or decreased by the presence of an electric field.
_	In all these cases the courts have repeatedly stressed the need to look at the reality of the arrangement, and to disregard the artificial labels which are typically employed in the documents (which, being invariably drafted by the landowner, represent only the landowner's view of the rights being created) – labels such as 'licensor' and 'licensee' – on the principle that it is necessary to call a spade a spade.
_	This is based on the principle that if an animal responds to a stimulus in a similar way, it is likely to have had an analogous experience.
_	The court first noted that the principle that "[a] promissory note, negotiable in form, is not necessarily the equivalent of cash" remains true.
_	More often, however, it is a very good example of the principle that natural annual flooding by rivers is valuable and productive for wildlife and human populations, while damming rivers to control floods, as has happened with the Kafue Flats, is potentially damaging to the environment.
_	Among the most well-known of Blackstone's contributions to judicial theory is his own statement of the principle that it "is better that ten guilty persons escape than that one innocent suffer".
_	The Tosefta deduced from (and the principle that the law prohibits doing on the Sabbath all that was done to build the Tabernacle) that one who tans hides on the Sabbath violates the commandment to keep the Sabbath.
_	Drake saw no purpose in having a member of the aristocracy without specialist knowledge and established the principle that the captain of the ship would be in sole command, based upon his skill and experience rather than social position.
_	It operates on the principle that:
_	Following the principle that a picture is worth a thousand words, the book makes use of images of war.
_	In many rural areas there is still a strong bartering culture, the exchanged items being of more immediate value than official currency (following the principle that one can eat a chicken, but not a coin).
_	United States Supreme Court Justice Antonin Scalia cited "My Cousin Vinny" as an example of the principle that a client can choose his own lawyer, but United States Senator John Kennedy told District Court nominee Matthew S. Petersen that having seen the film did not qualify one to be a federal judge during a disastrous 2017 hearing when Peterson could not answer basic legal questions.
_	According to Honda, "VCM technology works on the principle that a vehicle only requires a fraction of its power output at cruising speeds.
_	The Institute’s cancer research is based on the principle that all living cells have some built-in control of their growth and development.
_	The technology behind AWOMO is based on the principle that a player does not need to hold all of the game data locally in order to run and start playing the game.
_	This is based on the principle that if a non-human animal's responses to noxious stimuli are similar to those of humans, they are likely to have had an analogous experience.
_	The Exchequer Court rejected the argument made by the defendants that the patent merely covered the principle that furnace temperature could be increased by injecting hot air instead of cold air into the furnace, for the principle of itself could not be patented.
_	The leadership asserted the unfairness of the principle that the onus of proof always lies with the Indigenous peoples to demonstrate the basis of their land claims.
_	The novel follows the principle that people are molded by events prior to their birth, and Eugenides explores a character's prenatal life in terms of his or her genes; the narrator is, however, subject to the principle that whatever he does not know is of his imagination.
_	Sarkar's concept of "karma samnyasa" refers to the principle that a yogi becomes a person with all-round development and a balanced mind, that he called a "sadvipra"; and that this is accomplished by someone who remains fixed on the "supreme" consciousness through transformative personal practices and engaging in the politics of social liberation as a form of service work.
_	The right to access information builds on the principle that the public has a right to know how power is exercised and public money is spent, given that public bodies are elected by people and sustained by taxpayers.
_	It is emphatically not the case that the Minister has delegated his decision-making power to a subordinate and therefore the doctrine achieves consistency with the principle that Parliament's delegatees have, unless specifically provided by statute, no power to delegate ("delegatus non potest delegare").
_	Instead, the approach ordinarily to be adopted entailed indirect application via the principle that contracts that are contrary to public policy are unenforceable.
_	PDP is based on the principle that to effectively manage and improve efficiency in plastic use, reuse and recycling, businesses must first quantify their plastics.
_	Under the "Two Plus Four Treaty" both the Federal Republic and the GDR committed themselves and their unified continuation to the principle that their joint pre-1990 boundaries constituted the entire territory that could be claimed by a Government of Germany, and hence that there were no further lands outside those boundaries that were parts of Germany as a whole.
_	With their advocacy of patrilineal descent in the 1970s, the Reconstructionist Rabbinical Association supported the principle that a man who takes responsibility for raising a Jewish child can pass Judaism on to the next generation as well as a woman.
_	Zeroscape is a Canadian four piece Reggae metal band based in Toronto that formed in 2001 on the principle that any and all music genres could "Melt" together.
_	Biden's words, published shortly after his visit to Ukraine and Georgia, were interpreted by George Friedman of Stratfor as "reaffirm[ing] the U.S. commitment to the principle that Russia does not have the right to a sphere of influence in these countries or anywhere in the former Soviet Union"; Friedman pointed up a fundamental error in the analysis that underlay such thinking and predicted, "We suspect the Russians will squeeze back hard before they move off the stage of history".
_	In Islam, prophecy (, "nubuwwah") is the principle that God has appointed exemplary individuals, i.e. prophets and messengers to communicate
_	The Gallicans briefly achieved independence for the French church, on the principle that the religion of France could not be controlled by the Bishop of Rome, a foreign power.
_	Ascodroutes, in antiquity, were a sect of Christian heretics in the 2nd century, who rejected all use of sacraments, on the principle that incorporeal things cannot be communicated by things visible and corporeal.
_	"Mashpee" cited "Passamaquoddy" for the principle that "courts will accord substantial weight to federal recognition of a tribe."
_	The Act is designed "to protect society and the individual from harm or danger arising from actions of the Crown by ensuring that there are mechanisms to hold the Crown responsible and accountable for its actions [and to] meet the principle that the Crown should in general be subject to the law and the same legal processes as anyone else."
_	As well as the principle that bears his name, Archimedes discovered that a submerged object displaces a volume of water equal to the object's own volume (upon which it is said he shouted "Eureka").
_	While Shire advocates for a feminism that achieves inclusivity by avoiding political positions so as to not alienate women who disagree with those positions, organizers of the Women's March hold the principle that "women have intersecting identities" necessitating a movement that focuses on a "comprehensive agenda".
_	Contemporary systems of criminal law accept the principle that guilt shall only be personal.
_	The United Methodist Church website defines "connexion" as the principle that "all leaders and congregations are connected in a network of loyalties and commitments that support, yet supersede, local concerns."
_	The theory is based on the principle that peace must be defined by widely accepted social goals, and that any state of peace is characterized by the absence of violence.
_	As an exception to the principle that the military jurisdiction concerns only military persons, the penal code provides for the loss of military rank.
_	He reaffirmed the principle that there exists a "general area" or "domain" of criminal law.
_	Gustav Fechner began conducting psychophysics research in Leipzig in the 1830s, articulating the principle that human perception of a stimulus varies logarithmically according to its intensity.
_	Working from the principle that the collective mission of these agencies should be to foster the optimal development of community members, an ongoing thrust is to develop the robust conception of a fully functioning human being that is needed to cumulate the impacts of their individual programs.
_	He was a cautious supporter of the principle that the military government should hand over to civilian rule in 1976.
_	Below are comparison charts of several of the major Indic scripts, organised on the principle that glyphs in the same column all derive from the same Brahmi glyph.
_	Therefore, the antitrust case is governed by the principle that, "where the second cause of action between the parties is upon a different claim, the prior judgment is "res judicata" not as to issues which might have been tendered, but "only as to those matters in issue or points controverted upon the determination of which the finding or verdict was rendered."
_	The idea of extending the model to the membership of a society was initiated by the Roxburghe Club, founded in 1812 as a convivial association of bibliophiles, but which rapidly introduced the principle that each member should sponsor the publication of an edition of a rare work of interest to members, and that other volumes would be published by the Club collectively.
_	Howe further notes that "Hitler had always accepted the principle that the Mediterranean was an area of paramount Italian interest just as, farther north, German interests were exclusive.
_	All Identity is Constructed appeared on UK digital billboards in 2016 asserting the principle that all identities, regardless of their differences, are arbitrary constructions.
_	The court established the principle that when primary legislation is ambiguous then, in certain circumstances, the court may refer to statements made in the House of Commons or House of Lords in an attempt to interpret the meaning of the legislation.
_	Stratfordian scholars also cite Occam's razor, the principle that the simplest and best-evidenced explanation (in this case that the plays were written by Shakespeare of Stratford) is most likely to be the correct one.
_	It was formed on the principle that cowardice and fear are the causes of human problems.
_	During his nine years at Beloit, the College constructed or renovated 10 buildings (where he insisted on a principle of fiscal conservatism that permitted construction to begin only after funds for both the project and an endowment to maintain the finished building were obtained); grew the endowment by 500%; increased the size of the student body and faculty; introduced the concept of "moral obligation" scholarships; had, at 55%, one of the highest percentages nationally of alumni who contributed to the College; instituted intensive language programs in Arabic, Chinese, Japanese, and Russian; established the principle that any student who was admitted would have the financial ability to attend the College; and created Help Yourself, a program to bring at-risk students, beginning in third grade, to the College for an after-school program that served as the basis for the Help Yourself Foundation he established in 2005.
_	Nevertheless, the principle that admits the proliferation of the module represented more evidently the idea of unity as well as that of inclusion.
_	He ran unsuccessfully for mayor in 1900, the "Herald" backing him because he "represents the principle that the city should govern the saloons, instead of the saloons ruling the city" and "He is an avowed advocate of the municipal ownership of the water system."
_	Shot towers work on the principle that molten lead forms perfectly round balls when poured from a high place.
_	Underpinning this legislation is the principle that informal unpaid family carers are to be treated as ‘key partners’ in providing care.
_	Simplification is accomplished by the principle that a rotation has no effect on a point lying on its axis.
_	He also established the principle that rather than blindly following precedent, judges should seek to find loopholes in rules that were no longer applicable, something that later received the support of Oliver Wendell Holmes, Jr., who said, "It is revolting to have no better reason for a rule of law than that so it was laid down in the time of Henry IV.
_	He made his judgements on the principle that "as the usages of society alter, the law must adapt itself to the various situations of mankind", leading John Baker to describe him as "one of the boldest of judicial spirits".
_	While functioning as a judge, Chief Justice of the High Court and Supreme Court Judge, Misra has demonstrated through her judgments and orders that she is a strong believer of the principle that social justice, which is one of the objectives of the Indian Constitution certainly helps us in bringing about a just society by removing imbalances in social, educational, economic and political life of the people and protecting the rights of the weak, aged, destitute, women, children and other under-privileged persons of the state against the ruthless treatment which is enshrined in the preamble to the constitution.
_	At the same time, the principle that Islamic terror should be fought against and not Islam itself should be applied.
_	As regards Daniel's theories, he denied that speculation could be regarded as a source of knowledge, and, probably in accordance with this tenet, he maintained, in opposition to Anan, the principle that the Biblical laws must not be interpreted allegorically, nor explained contrary to the simple text (see below).
_	Accompanying that doctrine was the doctrine of reserved State powers, which was based on the principle that the powers of the Australian parliament should be interpreted narrowly, to avoid intruding on areas of power traditionally exercised by the state parliaments.
_	Based in Sri Lanka, IDIRIYA comprises a group of professionals in diverse fields who offer their expertise and follow the principle that "good design enables bad design disables".
_	Every man [acts] on the principle that he is to support the man who will keep him in office
_	The final impeachment vote maintained the principle that Congress should not remove the president from office simply because its members disagreed with him over policy, style, and administration of office.
_	This is the principle that is used to make all of the colors on your computer screen and your television.
_	Writing on May 30, 2013, about efforts to get "New York state's teachers unions to accept personal accountability as a bedrock principle of public-education reform," Bob McManus of the "New York Post" commented that Weingarten "once seemed to have a conscience on such matters — but no more," adhering to the principle that "No tenured teacher, under any circumstances, is to be held to account for any failing of any sort."
_	In computer science, input enhancement is the principle that processing a given input to a problem and altering it in a specific way will increase runtime efficiency or space efficiency, or both.
_	Akbar followed the principle that all artwork should include the name of the artist on the margin.
_	Net neutrality is the principle that Internet service providers treat all data on the Internet equally, and not discriminate or charge differently by user, content, website, platform, application, type of attached equipment, or method of communication.
_	In preparation for the asteroid belt, where the equivalent of a gold rush is in progress prospecting for "core material" and radioactive ores, the twins obtain supplies and luxury goods on Mars to sell at their destination, on the principle that it is shopkeepers, not miners, who get rich during gold rushes.
_	It seems probable, however, that his views on protection were far from clear, and that he was somewhat under the sway of the principle that the best financial policy is encouragement of national industry.
_	Venice was satisfied with reaffirming the principle that no citizen was superior to the normal processes of law.
_	Since retired ministers, theology professors and others ministers with non-parochial charges are members of Presbytery and sometimes of the Assembly, "equalising elders" are required in the higher courts of the Church to maintain the principle that ministers and elders are represented in equal numbers.
_	She co-founded the university on the principle that every member of the community deserves the same level of care and opportunity, according to the report.
_	Consilience is the principle that approaching the same problem by different methods should produce the same result.
_	In the Constitutions of Clarendon of 1164, Henry II of England laid down the principle that “If a dispute shall arise...concerning advowson and presentation to churches, let it be treated and concluded in the court of the king”.
_	He still defended the Bohemian national movement, and in one of his writings laid down the principle that nationality was one of the interests outside the control of the state.
_	Temüjin executed Jamukha's betrayers on the principle that betrayal merits the harshest punishment.
_	The basis for the anointed leader is founded on the principle that Moses was anointed with God's Spirit to lead the Israelites, and later this anointing was passed on to Joshua, and continued throughout the history of the Bible.
_	He articulated the principle that you shouldn't take credit for your learning, because "this was the purpose of your creation".
_	A 1983 law on apprenticeships laid down the principle that apprenticeship is a method of giving young workers having completed schooling a general theoretical and practical training, for the purpose of acquiring professional qualifications leading to technology diplomas.
_	The Tribunal upheld the Engineers’ Bar Association unconstitutionality claim and confirmed the principle that the Land Reform Bonds should be adjusted in accordance with the valuation principle enshrined in article 1236 of the Civil Code and Article 70 of the Constitution.
_	On the principle that an employee should not be compensated over and above what is an actual reflection of their loss.
_	It was declared that the case came within the principle that "at the most an architect or builder of a work is answerable only to his employes for any want of care or skill in the execution thereof, and he is not liable for accidents or injuries which may occur after the execution of the contract," and that the defendants owed to the plaintiff no duty whatever at the time of the explosion "either growing out of contract or imposed by law."
_	In recognition of attachment issues, social work good practice requires a minimal number of moves and the 1989 Children Act enshrines the principle that delay is inimical to a child's welfare.
_	The pollution levy is based on the principle that a polluter must pay for the pollution that he causes.
_	"Savanna Principle" is a term coined by Satoshi Kanazawa in 2004 for the principle that human behavior remaining to some extent adapted to the ancestral environment of early "Homo" in the savanna may lead to problems in a modern (Industrial or post-Industrial) environment.
_	Courts in the United States and elsewhere have developed a number of principles for handling such evidence of legislative intent; as an example, many courts have suggested that the comments of those opposing a bill under consideration should be treated with skepticism, on the principle that opponents of a bill may often exaggerate its practical consequences.
_	The Peace Conference adopted the principle that these territories should be administered by different governments on behalf of the League – a system of national responsibility subject to international supervision.
_	This is based on the principle that good measurement supports good management and is a prerequisite for good communication.
_	This was in keeping with the Thai policy of "humane deterrence": the principle that the camps should not become permanent settlements or provide a level of assistance beyond what the refugees could expect to find in Cambodia.
_	These comments run counter to the principle that dictionaries simply record linguistic usage rather than judge it, and that dropping the entry for "McJob" would be a precedent for bowdlerising definitions of other derogatory terms.
_	To quote the General Report on Tunny:Turingery introduced the principle that the key differenced at one, now called ΔΚ, could yield information unobtainable from ordinary key.
_	Reisman's campaign against Kinsey was described by Morton Hunt (1999) as follows: "To use smear tactics, methods of intimidation, and political trickery to achieve what one considers a moral end, is to live by the principle that the end justifies the means" (p. 209).
_	In line with this, Hiigli worked in early childhood education, in 1971 co-founding the French-American preschool Le Jardin A L'Ouest, with his wife: Dominique Bordereaux-Hiigli, and then Jardin Galerie in 2000 on the principle that "Art is an essential component of child development, communication and education."
_	The Smurfs' community generally takes the form of a cooperative, sharing, and kind environment based on the principle that each Smurf has something he or she is good at, and thus contributes it to Smurf society as he or she can.
_	Gross said the United States was also achieving broad consensus on the principle that a "culture of cybersecurity" must develop in national ICT policies to continue growth and expansion in this area.
_	Piezo-electric current therapy, or PECT, is an analgesic technique based on the principle that mechanical deformation of a motorized piezoelectric ceramic rod produces a burst of 10 electrical pulses (five positive and five negative), each lasting 2–3 ms.
_	The van is constructed on the principle that it can be recharged on a three-pin plug, thus avoiding the need for supporting infrastructure, although rapid chargers can be purchased allowing a recharge time of 30 minutes.
_	That [affirmative action] programs may have been motivated, in part, by good intentions cannot provide refuge from the principle that under our Constitution, the government may not make distinctions on the basis of race."
_	In the context of institutional investment management, intergenerational equity is the principle that an endowed institution's spending rate must not exceed its after-inflation rate of compound return, so that investment gains are spent equally on current and future constituents of the endowed assets.
_	Its starting team of five was headed by lead designer Nigel Papworth on the principle that they would develop their own games without working with other major publishers to develop commissioned games.
_	In physics, charge conservation is the principle that the total electric charge in an isolated system never changes.
_	One of the main treatments is rational emotive therapy (RET), which is based on the principle that an "activating" emotional event will cause a change in thoughts toward that situation, even if it is an illogical thought.
_	Erskine's defence anticipated the Libel Act 1792, which laid down the principle that it is for the jury (who previously had only decided the question of publication) and not the judge to decide whether or not a publication is a libel.
_	Through Mr. Miyagi's teaching, Daniel learns not only karate but also important life lessons such as the importance of personal balance, reflected in the principle that martial arts training is as much about training the spirit as the body.
_	When he was about to be arrested, friars denied the order because of the principle that whoever sought refuge in the Church is already under divine protection.
_	Roemer argues that according to the principle of distributive justice, the traditional definition of socialism based on the principle that individual compensation be proportional to the value of the labour one expends in production is inadequate.
_	The amendment to the Federal Law of July 7, 2003 № 126-FZ (On communications) would renew the principle that restriction of access to information through the Internet is regulated by the Federal Law "On Information, Information Technologies and Information Protection."
_	The development team was guided by the principle that gameplay should not be interrupted unless it is necessary.
_	These tribes were selected on the principle that the Government should take "the most pains with those who resisted the United States the most".
_	Mifinder evolved to specifically focus on life experiences as it is driven by the principle that people who have gone through similar experiences can have greater mutual understanding, and therefore can offer more support to one another.
_	The earth was not easy to measure, nor was it uniformly shaped, but the principle that units of measure were to be based on quantitative relationships among invariant facets of the physical world was established.
_	The Family teaches an eclectic mixture of Christianity and Hinduism with other Eastern and Western religions on the principle that spiritual truths are universal.
_	The meaning of the principle that there is no compulsion in religion was not limited to freedom of individuals to choose their own religion.
_	Instead, it introduced the principle that the number depended on the actual number of inhabitants.
_	Given the principle that standing to enforce an obligation should reflect whoever has a legitimate interest in its performance, a 1996 report by the Law Commission entitled "Privity of Contract: Contracts for the Benefit of Third Parties", recommended that while courts should be left free to develop the common law, some of the more glaring injustices should be removed.
_	Dr. Robert Cunningham (University of Tennessee, Knoxville) wrote that Farmer "sets his ideas on the high road, the big picture, and implications for the future, adhering to the principle that ideas should be explained as simply as possible without distorting the reality..." (Cunningham, 2009, 302).
_	Hebblethwaite wrote that Stepinac's support for Croatian independence had been based on the Atlantic Charter and the principle that all nations have a right to exist.
_	A pressure hypsometer as shown in the drawing (right) employs the principle that the boiling point of a liquid is lowered by diminishing the barometric pressure, and that the barometric pressure varies with the height of the point of observation.
_	This is the principle that in an instance where building-block two (controllable indicators) does not connect to building block one of the outcomes model, then building-block five (impact evaluation) offers the only way to obtain more information about whether changes in high-level indicators can be attributed to an intervention.
_	Blantyre Youth Council eventually agreed to disband however and support the youth development team on the principle that it was to be youth led.
_	The United States Supreme Court has decided a number of cases that have established and refined the principle that it is unfair for a court to assert jurisdiction over a party unless that party's contacts with the state in which that court sits are such that the party "could reasonably expect to be haled into court" in that state.
_	Batman refuses to utilize any sort of gun on the principle that a gun was used to murder his parents.
_	Currently, any Maryland resident who is an official party member may become a voting member of the Central Committee as long as he or she is a registered Libertarian and certifies that he or she agrees with the principle that no person (or group of persons) has the right to seek to attain values by initiating the use of force or fraud against any other person (or group of persons).
_	It is notable as Lord Russell CJ established the principle that if a measure were to indirectly discriminate between classes, it could be declared void.
_	The fact that a child is an Australian citizen is enough to establish the principle that the best interests of children should be a primary consideration in the making of administrative decisions.
_	Edward I's government was not prepared to concede this, they agreed to the issuing of the "Confirmatio", confirming the previous charters and confirming the principle that taxation should be by consent, although the precise manner of that consent was not laid down.
_	Separators work on the principle that the three components have different densities, which allows them to stratify when moving slowly with gas on top, water on the bottom and oil in the middle.
_	Most officials were willing to uphold the principle that criminals were entitled to be attended by a minister of their own communion at the place of execution.
_	The organization takes its name from the principle that Americans’ homes or businesses should be their castles, that is, places where they are safe and free from abusive government power.
_	The Te Kohatu Mauri Stone is a pounamu touchstone that works on the principle that each person who views or touches it passes on their life-force (mauri), imparting their energy towards the competing athletes.
_	No matter what the charge or where the trial, the principle that the prosecution must prove the guilt of the prisoner is part of the common law of England and no attempt to whittle it down can be entertained.
_	"Vital Space" is based upon the principle that artworks can change the world for the better and "is dedicated to the initiation of art projects designed to reach and influence a wide and diverse audience."
_	In 2006, Nolo began publishing a directory of attorneys, which is asserted to operate on the principle that both participating lawyers and consumers are better served by a relatively short list of qualified attorneys under each category (business law, real estate, etc.), with lots of information for side-by-side comparisons.
_	Hills argues that the principle that God provides truth through scriptural revelation, necessarily also implies that God must ensure a preserved transmission of the correct revealed text, continuing into the Reformation era of biblical translation and printing.
_	The French Government, however, while accepting the principle that waters drawn off should be returned, regarded itself as bound only to return a quantity of water corresponding to the actual needs of the Spanish users.
_	He believed that by the principle that phenomena found in nature were continuous by default, it was likely that the transition between conscious and unconscious states had intermediary steps.
_	Guided by the principle that agriculture is business, the DA implemented policy and institutional reforms that freed the agriculture markets, enabling farmers to enjoy higher farmgate prices.
_	Up till the 1870s and the King's acceptance of the principle that the leader of the majority party in Parliament should be given the mandate to form a government, the formation of political groupings around a leader who could govern if this pleased the King meant that the supposedly parliamentary government was actually at the monarch's discretion.
_	The project stems from the principle that younger children can learn from older children.
_	there's the principle that virtue develops concentration, concentration develops
_	This test relies on the principle that, when heated, ketoses are more rapidly dehydrated than aldoses.
_	The Emerging Voices Mentorship program, an initiative of the New Orleans Film Society, was created in 2014 and founded on the principle that to create a more diverse storytelling landscape, filmmakers of color in Louisiana need greater access to gatekeepers.
_	On June 2, 1784, Congress reissued the disbandment order, under the principle that "standing armies in time of peace are inconsistent with the principles of republican government, dangerous to the liberties of a free people, and generally converted into destructive engines for establishing despotism."
_	This article establishes the principle that the federal executive power has no powers or competences other than those attributed to it by the federal legislative power.
_	ID is based on the principle that meeting basic needs is a fundamental human right which is guaranteed to all who are in a physical condition to offer a minimal amount of work.
_	In computer programming and computer science, "maximal munch" or "longest match" is the principle that when creating some construct, as much of the available input as possible should be consumed.
_	The all-or-none law is the principle that the strength by which a nerve or muscle fibre responds to a stimulus is independent of the strength of the stimulus.
_	The Center for Open and Sustainable Learning (COSL) operates on the principle that "free and open access to educational opportunity is a basic human right".
_	The Redundancy Payments Act 1965 (c 62) was a UK Act of Parliament that introduced into UK labour law the principle that after a qualifying period of work, people would have a right to a severance payment in the event of their jobs becoming economically unnecessary to the employer.
_	Another work defines business ecology as “a new field for sustainable organizational management and design,” one “that is based on the principle that organizations, as living organisms, are most successful when their development and behavior are aligned with their core purpose and values – what we call “social DNA’”.
_	Their trial confirmed the principle that the laws of war apply equally to civilians and military personnel.
_	This contrasts with a common law title, which is based on the principle that a vendor cannot transfer to a purchaser a greater interest than he or she owns.
_	We are totally committed both to ensuring that religious denominations are not forced to change their practices, beliefs or sacraments in any way and to the principle that the State must not discriminate between individuals based on the grounds of sexual orientation.
_	This considerably extended the borough franchise and established the principle that each parliamentary constituency should hold roughly the same number of electors.
_	The idea was based on the principle that the territories would eventually become independent but under the tutelage of one of the victorious Entente countries.
_	The Nuremberg Trials are considered a breakthrough for the principle that, for a core set of crimes, there is no immunity from prosecution.
_	The British Boxing Board of Control and the newly formed French FFB tried to constitute a new European body—the European Boxing Association (EBA)--but other countries protested, because the two veteran countries would have reintroduced the principle that the European Champion would be decided by a bout between British and French champions.
_	An ardent proponent of the papal supremacy over Henry's emperorship, he pushed the Gregorian Reform as expressed in the "Dictatus papae" of March 1075, including the principle that the papal title is unique in the world and that it may even be permitted to him to depose emperors.
_	He ultimately decided not to persevere, basing himself on the principle that "business is business."
_	The Gemara advised that because of the principle that a dream's realization follows its interpretation, one who dreams of a dog should rise early and say the fortunate words of "But against any of the children of Israel shall not a dog whet his tongue," before thinking of the unfortunate words of (regarding Israel's corrupt aristocracy), "Yea, the dogs are greedy," so as to attribute to the dream the more favorable meaning and thus the more fortunate realization.
_	Section Four discusses the principle (Bava Batra 23b) that in case of a conflict between the principle that we follow the majority ("Rov") and the presumption that if an object is found near a certain place we can assume the object originated in that place ("Karov") the law of "Rov" has decisive power.
_	Knight won his claim after two appeals, in a case that established the principle that Scots law would not uphold the institution of slavery.
_	"The Black Scholar" was founded on the principle that all Black authors, scholars, and activists could take part in dialogues within its pages.
_	This was the principle that God took no notice of everyday doings in human affairs.
_	The RCA had been founded on the principle that architects and diverse craftspeople could be educated together, but Crosby's approach to the teaching curriculum was considered by many RCA students to be too traditional and limiting of creative freedom, and he met with much resistance, which took its toll on his health.
_	This was initially done only to "blighted" property, on the principle that such properties had a negative impact upon surrounding property owners, but was later expanded to allow the taking of any private property when the new 3rd party owner could develop the property in such a way as to bring in increased tax revenues to the government.
_	It was formed on the principle that selfishness and greed is the cause of human problems.
_	Coué thus developed a method which relied on the principle that "any idea exclusively occupying the mind turns into reality", although only to the extent that the idea is within the realm of possibility.
_	Hush-a-phone In Hush-a-Phone v. United States, 238 F.2d 266 (D.C. Cir. 1956), although the FCC sided with AT&T to disallow the Hush-a-phone (a small, cup-like device which mounted on the speaking party's phone) the decision affirmed the principle that attachments causing no harm to the Bell telephone network must be allowed, thereby opening the door for future competition.
_	W.E.C. grew from one mission field with 35 workers to a worldwide mission operating in over 40 fields with thousands of workers from around the world, all living according to the principle that all needs will be supplied by God with no appeals to man.
_	His design won the ensuing competition, with Herbert von Karajan writing to the judges "of all the designs submitted, one seems to stand out above the others... founded on the principle that the performers should be in the middle... the deployment of the walls certainly makes good sense acoustically, but the most impressive of all is the complete concentration of the listener on the musical event".
_	Sentience Politics endorses cause neutrality, the principle that the only relevant factor in deciding among causes (e.g. working on farmed animal advocacy vs. wild animal suffering) should be their relative effectiveness.
_	It's certainly organized around the principle that character is destiny . . . .
_	In March 1951 Bredero's sent him to Australia to seek out business opportunities: there he established Civil and Civic, the success of which was based on the principle that the designer should be employed by the contractor rather than the other way round.
_	Constantine established the principle that emperors should not settle questions of doctrine, but should summon general ecclesiastical councils for that purpose.
_	In 1969, the first federal "Equal Pay" case established the principle that where women perform 'equal work' alongside men they should receive equal pay, referred to as "equal pay for equal work".
_	Although it disagreed with the decision on behalf of ratepayers and on the principle that 'no man is indispensable', The Eastern Daily Mail proved a useful and independent check on the Municipal Commission.
_	Von Frey filaments rely on the principle that an elastic column, in compression, will buckle elastically at a specific force, dependent on the length, diameter and modulus of the material.
_	However, Black's argument is actually fallacious because the said model must be logically consistent--else a "counterexample" can be offered even against the principle that a counterexample can prove something false.
_	In fact, Einstein developed special and general relativity to accommodate the absolute speed of light that drops out of the Maxwell equations with the principle that only relative movement has physical consequences.
_	Piatigorsky disliked traditional academic jargon and for most of his life he upheld the principle that scholars should publish as little as possible on the grounds that publishing interrupts thinking.
_	Some critics have argued that Campbell's position was not self-consistent in the place assigned to the penal and expiatory element in the sufferings of Christ, nor adequate in its recognition of the principle that the obedience of Christ perfectly affirms all righteousness and so satisfies the holiness of God, thus effecting a peace and reconciliation between God and humanity—a true atonement.
_	In no case is a catechumen absolutely bound to be baptized, preserving the principle that the recipient of a sacrament must not be forced against his will : the person concerned must be drawn spiritually to the faith in addition to being intellectually persuaded.
_	The case does not stand for the principle that expectation damages are the only proper measure of damages — there are many other measures.
_	This conflicts with the principle that a defence may be based on a mistaken belief by the accused (e.g. the belief he was being attacked), but that the belief must be reasonable (Owens v HMA).
_	The finding was based on the principle that any assistance could help to "legitimate" the terrorist organization, and free up its resources for terrorist activities.
_	Their proposal centered on the principle that, in an era of high fuel cost and economic pressure for modernization of depressed fishing ports, sustainable fisheries require a balance of business economics and public planning versus the available fishery resources.
_	Yet more recently, the court has shown a greater willingness to prevent laws being preempted, however the courts have not yet adopted the principle that state law is not preempted or "superseded" if it is more protective to employees than a federal minimum.
_	They are a “non-profit, non-kill (as of January 2002) humane organization dedicated to the principle that every life is precious.”
_	The planners foresaw conflicts between preservationists and scientific planners and set forth the principle that historic streets and structures should be preserved and that new development must be in harmony with the city's character.
_	This is the principle that a client computer can provide certain capabilities for a user and request others from other computers that provide services for the clients.
_	The collective bases its work among others on the principle that “all is possible”, and continues participating in numerous performance art festivals worldwide.
_	This gives a version of the principle that applies to strips, for example bounded by two lines of constant real part in the complex plane.
_	This is based on the principle that if an animal responds to a stimulus in a similar way to ourselves, it is likely to have had an analogous experience.
_	This tradition embodies the principle that – while adults should be free to see, hear and read what they want – children should be protected from material that may be unsuitable for (or harmful to) them, and everyone should be protected from material that is highly offensive.
_	There are, however, two statutory exceptions to the principle that employers have no obligations to applicants for employment:
_	The trust operated on the principle that it was the purpose of the Holy Spirit to "renew the historic churches".
_	Purging relies on the principle that a combustible (or flammable) gas is able to undergo combustion (explode) only if mixed with air in the right proportions.
_	On the basis of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, he appealed to the United Nations to take into account the principle that "every person has the right to help any other person in a worse position than himself or herself in whatever country that person may reside", what in 1977 met the applause due to an American-Jewish leftist philosopher and left-wing activist Noam Chomsky who published a fragment of his correspondence with Grzegorczyk.
_	Following a series of urgent reports by his medical team, on 4 February 1782 General Murray sent a list of ten surrender terms to the Duc de Crillon, based on the principle that the garrison should be provided with transport back to Britain, which would be paid for by the British government.
_	The journal gets its inspiration from the etymology and goes by the principle that anything which has a form, visual or mental, can come under focus.
_	Variable reluctance (VR) motors have a plain iron rotor and operate based on the principle that minimum reluctance occurs with minimum gap, hence the rotor points are attracted toward the stator magnet poles.
_	Globally diversified portfolios of index funds are used by investment advisors who invest passively for their clients based on the principle that underperforming markets will be balanced by other markets that outperform.
_	It also established the principle that instead of attempting to develop a psychometric tool based on a possibly invalid theory, self-report questionnaires when analysed using techniques such as factor analysis can suggest theoretical constructs.
_	The Commonwealth bases the funding for charter schools on the principle that the state’s subsidies should follow the students, regardless of whether they choose to attend traditional public schools or charter schools.
_	During this period, the Jewish community lived by the principle that all male members were obliged to accept communal offices.
_	Sir Maurice Byers QC, who acted for the plaintiffs, paraphrasing former Justice Isaac Isaacs argued that the principle that governments are responsible to the citizens who elect them "permeates the Constitution, forming part of the fabric on which the written words of the Constitution are superimposed," and as such, all voters should be entitled to make comment on political issues.
_	The Earl of Birkenhead stated in 1920 that until the early 19th century voluntary drunkenness was never a defence, based on the principle that "a man who by his own voluntary act debauches and destroys his will power shall be no better situated in regard to criminal acts than a sober man".
_	Instead, he based his decision on the principle that even if churches are merely voluntary and private organisations, the members of church are entitled to have the church administered according to the church's own internal laws and rules.
_	ITERA is a 501(c)(3) non-profit organization and was founded on the principle that leading educational institutions can greatly benefit from cooperative development of curricular and research objectives.
_	Despite repeated invitations he refused to meet with any member of the administration of US president George W. Bush, on the principle that the struggle for democracy in Iran must be waged from within the country, without foreign governmental support.
_	This opinion established the principle that obvious inventions should not be patentable, which has been a core doctrine of U.S. and international patent law ever since this decision.
_	In his pamphlet "Das alte Lied: der Zweck heiligt die Mittel, im Texte verbessert und auf neue Melodie gesetzt" he declared he would give a thousand gulden to the person who could show to the faculty of law of Bonn or Heidelberg a book written by a Jesuit which taught the principle that the end justifies the means.
_	Integral geometry sprang from the principle that the mathematically natural probability models are those that are invariant under certain transformation groups.
_	Geospatial predictive modeling is conceptually rooted in the principle that the occurrences of
_	For age, belief, gender, race and sexuality there is generally no positive obligation to promote equality, and positive discrimination is generally circumscribed by the principle that merit must be regarded as the most important characteristic of a person.
_	It is a modular architecture built on the principle that interoperability and extensibility are best achieved by the integration of data, interfaces, and mechanisms (i.e., executable programs) as clearly defined modules.
_	Equality before the law, also known as equality under the law, equality in the eyes of the law, or legal equality, is the principle that each independent being must be treated equally by the law (principle of isonomy) and that all are subject to the same laws of justice (due process).
_	The Family Holiday Association was founded on the principle that spending quality time together as a family away from home results in stronger, healthier and happier families and communities.
_	The Library Project was founded on the principle that education is change and the key to breaking the cycle of poverty in the developing world.
_	Encoded Self-Assembling Chemical (ESAC) libraries rely on the principle that two sublibraries of a size of x members (e.g. 10) containing a constant complementary hybridization domain can yield a combinatorial DNA-duplex library after hybridization with a complexity of x uniformly represented library members (e.g. 10).
_	This method works on the principle that at differing pressures uranium 235 would diffuse through a barrier faster than uranium 238.
_	After the Peace of Augsburg in 1555, the principle that the religion of the ruler dictated the religion of the ruled ("cuius regio, eius religio") was observed throughout the Holy Roman Empire.
_	This underscores the principle that any pitch legalizes all previous turns at bat.
_	Project is based on the principle that the family is the best environment for a child’s development.
_	The Dostler case became a precedent for the principle that was used in the Nuremberg Trials of German generals, officials, and Nazi leaders beginning in November 1945: using superior orders as a defense does not relieve officers from responsibility of carrying out illegal orders and their liability to be punished in court.
_	It also confirmed the principle that "the administration of a drug by a doctor when it is necessary to relieve pain is a proper medical practice even when the doctor knows that the drugs will themselves cause the patient’s death".
_	Objective psychology is based on the principle that all behavior can be explained by objectively studying reflexes.
_	Accordingly, we are compelled to resort to the principle that exceptions to a general rule of an enactment must be strictly construed.”
_	The European Court of Justice however, although reaffirming the principle that it is up to the national court to determine if the factual conditions triggering the application of a European Union rule are fulfilled, proceeds to cite several former ECJ rulings that deal with the status of worker.
_	Lord Grey took office as Prime Minister in 1830, and Barrow was especially requested to remain in his post, starting the principle that senior civil servants stay in office on change of government and serve in a non-partisan manner.
_	According to "The Multimedia Encyclopedia of Women in Today's World," "its origins are fundamentally rooted in the principle that women, particularly expectant mothers, be given the utmost care and respect."
_	Mitigation in law is the principle that a party who has suffered loss (from a tort or breach of contract) has to take reasonable action to minimize the amount of the loss suffered.
_	In its endorsement for Campbell, the "Arizona Daily Miner" wrote, "His earthly possessions are in Arizona, and on the principle that, 'where our treasures are, there will our hearts be also.' he is strictly and emphatically an Arizonan."
_	Internationalism is an important component of socialist political theory, based on the principle that working-class people of all countries must unite across national boundaries and actively oppose nationalism and war in order to overthrow capitalism (see entry on proletarian internationalism).
_	Mifinder is reported to be driven by the principle that people who have gone through similar experiences can have greater mutual understanding, and therefore can offer support to one another, for example to seek advice about accessible venues, local support and information about the area.
_	He introduced the Merits System of Penal Discipline, which worked on the principle that the prisoner could secure freedom if they were industrious and well behaved.
_	With a strategic skill which deserves special recognition, Dom Guéranger worked on the principle that to suppress what is wrong, the thing must be replaced, and he laboured hard to supplant everywhere whatever reflected the opinion he was fighting.
_	For example, Avicenna's 'Refutation against astrology', "Risāla fī ibṭāl aḥkām al-nojūm", argues against the practice of astrology while supporting the principle that planets may act as agents of divine causation.
_	Therefore he based his work on the principle that an unemployed person may receive food or his wages only after performing an activity.
_	In nuisance, liability is strict in that the defendant can be liable even if he has taken reasonable care, but this is kept "under control" by the principle that a defendant is not liable for actions a reasonable user takes on his land.
_	With a last bluff, Philip lured the exhausted Aetolians into peace talks, granting the principle that every side should maintain what it currently possessed.
_	B.J. Leggett construes Stevens's perspectivism as commitment to the principle that "instead of facts we have perspectives, none privileged over the others as truer or more nearly in accord with things as they are, although not for that reason all equal."
_	Early in 1908 Partridge convinced the SGGA to endorse the principle that inland grain elevators should be owned by the province and terminal elevators by the Dominion of Canada.
_	Of the principle that "where there is a wrong there must be a remedy", he said that the policy decision to protect witnesses from litigation had been taken some time ago, without anything being said to cast doubt on the policy choice.
_	He began his career in public service with intern positions for the Ohio General Assembly and for the city manager of Xenia, Ohio, where he was first introduced to the principle that a career in public service requires untiring commitment and relentless effort.
_	In the High Courts and the Magistrates’ Courts, the principle that the loser pays the winner’s costs is still applied in almost all cases.
_	"Justice" is the principle that decision-makers must focus on actions that are fair to those affected.
_	His legal career is most remembered for his efforts in the area of water law, his key legal contributions being the "Kibbey Decision", a legal ruling establishing the principle that "water belongs to the land", and creation of the legal framework for the Salt River Valley Water User's Association, a model for federal water projects in the American West.
_	The goal was to hasten social change during the transition to an industrial society following the principle that "All social institutions must aim at improving the moral, intellectual and physical fortunes of the most numerous and poorest classes".
_	On 15 July 1205, the pope laid down the principle that Jews were doomed to perpetual servitude because they had crucified Jesus.
_	During the English invasion in 1346, sluices gates were added as water defences and a fort was built up around it in 1525 on the principle that the people of the fort could defend the town by flooding it.
_	This accelerated use fortifies the principle that excellent, strong book collections, strategically placed, provide economical and satisfactory extension [branch] service."
_	At its 2003 convention, CAN adopted a structure under the principle that it be student owned and operated.
_	The VRY concept operates on the principle that the dusthanas get weaker and less malevolent when their lords are placed in other dusthanas.
_	The Latin word iunctim (also spelled junctim) denotes the process of connecting two or more independent agreements (contracts, treaties, bills of law) according to the principle that " one agreement will not be made unless an agreement is found for all other items as well".
_	CGU was founded upon the principle that graduate education is separate and distinct from undergraduate education.
_	In this way, Butler questions the possibility of any genuinely oppositional discourse; "If speech depends upon censorship, then the principle that one might seek to oppose is at once the formative principle of oppositional speech".
_	However, since the United Nations Convention on the Rights of the Child, 20 November 1989, the principle that a child has to continue to maintain a strong relationship with both parents, even if separated, has become more and more a recognized right.
_	He also strongly opposed the military draft on the principle that it limited a young man's freedom of choice.
_	The University upholds the principle that its purpose is to provide a stable and smooth process of undergraduate education.
_	He was amongst three jockeys charged, along with Darren Williams and Fergal Lynch, all of whom had their licences to ride in Britain suspended, effectively under the principle that they would be guilty until found innocent.
_	In this peculiar case it is not possible to overcome the difficulty by recourse to the principle that a law of later date abrogates that of an earlier period.
_	Two Supreme Court decisions after "Perez" called into question the principle that loss of citizenship could occur even without the affected individual's intent.
_	Do you approve of the principle that Britain and Spain should share sovereignty over Gibraltar?
_	In 1771 James Boswell appeared before the Court of Session in "Wilson vs Smith and Armour", arguing for a return to the principle that the punishment for vicious intromission should be restored to its traditional severity, of rendering the intromittor liable to pay all the debts of the estate.
_	This is the principle that finds the party that is to blame before compensating the victim in personal injury cases.
_	Within the context of formal design reviews, the practical solution is simply to ensure a fresh perspective, based on the principle that those who are too close to the design may overlook design errors.
_	The German colonial administration governed on the principle that "there was only one government in the islands."
_	The Act not only provided a legal framework for the co-operative movement, but also specified much of its future direction - for example laying down the principle that up to 1/3rd of profits could be shared among members, the rest being used to build up the business.
_	Both the report and the rules, summarised below, are based on the principle that the best way to keep streets clean is not to dirty them in the first place.
_	Harry assures the principle that Eli and Alec are in good hands.
_	In 2015, Unit London relocated to a 4,000 square foot gallery in Soho, London, in keeping with the principle that ""Unit London is a gallery, a collective, and a community, which believes in the promotion and showcasing of truly gifted artists, regardless of their profile, reputation, or background.
_	Committed to the principle that men and women deserved the same punishments and rewards, she held women responsible for the behavior.
_	Lean typed out the whole screenplay himself correcting it as he went along, following the principle that scripts are not written, but rewritten.
_	Author Bill James has written that Wilhelm and Triandos "established the principle that a knuckleball pitcher and a big, slow catcher make an awful combination."
_	In feudal law, Nulle terre sans seigneur is the principle that one provides services to the sovereign (usually serving in his army) for the right to receive land from the sovereign.
_	1 All ER 53 is a case in English tort law that established the principle that claims under nuisance and "Rylands v Fletcher" must include a requirement that the damage be foreseeable; it also suggested that "Rylands" was a sub-set of nuisance rather than an independent tort, a debate eventually laid to rest in "Transco plc v Stockport Metropolitan Borough Council".
_	From its start, the Studio School was founded on the principle that drawing from life should form of the basis of artistic development.
_	He sets out (in his "Delineation") with the principle that private happiness must be the chief end and object of every man's pursuit; shows how the good of others affords the greatest happiness; and then, to sanction natural conscience, he calls in the authority of God, who must approve of what promotes the greatest happiness.
_	These articles were condemned by activists involved in the programme who applauded the party for “supporting the principle that every woman” should get the chance to participate.
_	Until the 20th century, traditional choice of law rules were based on the principle that legal rights vest automatically at legally significant and ascertainable times and places.
_	It works on the principle that the hydrostatic head of the "kill fluid" or "kill mud" will be enough to suppress the pressure of the formation fluids.
_	Nevertheless, the idea of imposing liability on another despite a lack of culpability never really disappeared and courts have developed the principle that an employer can incur liability for the acts and omissions of an employee if committed by the employee in the course of employment and if the employer has the right to control the way in which the employee carries out his or her duties (respondeat superior).
_	Smith advocated granting of power to the president to suppress mobs without waiting for a request from state governors (as required by ), on the principle that "The governor himself may be a mobber; and instead of being punished, as he should be, for murder or treason, he may destroy the very lives, rights, and property he should protect."
_	Unlike how Western countries would refuse hijackers’ demands, Fukuda accepted their demands based on the principle that “human life outweighs the earth.
_	Net neutrality is the principle that all Internet traffic should be treated equally.
_	It is based on the principle that restructuring facilities available to companies in a timely and transparent matter goes a long way in ensuring their viability which is sometimes threatened by internal and external factors.
_	This is based upon the principle that, as Ward put it, "in small face-to-face groups, the bureaucratising and hierarchical tendencies inherent in organisations have least opportunity to develop".
_	This had led to discussions about "draft equality" ("Wehrgerechtigkeit"), which is the principle that the draft should have applied equally and non-discriminatorily to all men.
_	It, along with additional laws such as Dissolution of Muslim Marriages Act of 1939 that followed, established the principle that religious laws of Indian Muslims can be their personal laws.
_	While Stevens essentially reaffirmed the principle that states have a wider latitude to regulate commercial speech, he stated that Rhode Island had gone too far.
_	Early product innovations were driven by the principle that men and women may have different needs when it comes to odor protection, but women should never have to compromise on efficacy.
_	At first, the few Western countries participating declined to accept the principle that the IPhO be organized every second year in a Western and Eastern bloc country.
_	Māyā is also a spiritual concept connoting "that which exists, but is constantly changing and thus is spiritually unreal", and the "power or the principle that conceals the true character of spiritual reality".
_	These two cases established the principle that the federal courts, not the states, have the final power to interpret the Constitution and to determine the Constitutional limits of federal power.
_	Canadian appellate courts and the Supreme Court of Canada have repeatedly affirmed the principle that young persons convicted of crimes must be sentenced differently from adults.
_	In the 20th century, Rabbi Moshe Feinstein and other poskim examined whether Jewish law forbids cigarette smoking or whether smoking risks are so commonplace as to be permitted under the principle that "The Lord protects the simple".
_	These principle belong to what Thomas Nagel identifies as ‘absurdism,’ namely the principle that the ‘chain of justification,’ of what causes what, is never satisfactorily resolved either in psychological theory, or in physics.
_	The reform aimed to systematise the correspondence between sounds (phonemes) and letters (graphemes), and to strengthen the principle that derived forms should follow the spelling of the root form.
_	Edward had nevertheless won a significant victory, in clearly establishing the principle that all liberties essentially emanated from the crown.
_	In May 1852, a vestry was convened by the churchwardens for considering the best mode of raising the necessary for reseating the Church and the principle that it should be effected by voluntary contributions was also approved.
_	For exceptions to the principle that the inverted verb must be an auxiliary, see below.
_	Karlgren first stated the principle that words written with the same phonetic component had initials with a common point of articulation in Old Chinese.
_	The dynamics that provide the tropics with the rain belt are founded on the principle that warmer air is able to retain more moisture than colder air.
_	The passage is presented as advice for physicians, based on the principle that "the bodies of healthy people, and especially those of sick people, change with the condition of the air".
_	They also held to the principle that education should result from a Biblical philosophy and the next generation should be taught a Christian worldview.
_	It also seems to be governed by the principle that proof yields knowledge:
_	EPI was founded on the principle that engaging locals is essential to the success of conserving biodiversity.
_	Though perhaps “it is too much detailed for any mass in a picture” in itself, he finds it commendable nevertheless as illustrating the principle that diversification of form and colour is needed in painting “to prevent monotony”.
_	Though he was especially thorough, similar work (especially on the mainland of Europe) around the same time independently cemented the principle that fossils change over time and can be reliably used to identify layers.
_	This case was later cited in a report published by the American Bar Association, in a defence of the principle that airline safety is undermined by such prosecutions because the threat of them taking place would impede the investigative processes.
_	Only cinemas worked on the principle that the premises had to be privately owned, and that customers had to sign a form which instantly made them members.
_	The theoretical approach of the church to contacts with less-developed peoples in Africa and the Americas carried over from conflicts with Muslims the principle that resistance to Christian conquest, and to conversion, was sufficient to make people, including whole populations, "enemies of Christ", who could be justly enslaved, and then held in slavery even after conversion.
_	Following World War One, the Treaty of Versailles contained the first constitution of a new International Labour Organization (ILO) founded on the principle that "labour is not a commodity", and for the reason that "peace can be established only if it is based upon social justice".
_	In this line, in 1990 artist Francois Hers and mediator Xavier Douroux inaugurate the “Nouveaux commanditaires” protocol, based on the principle that the commissioner is the community of users that, in collaboration with a curator-mediator, work at the context of the project with the artist.
_	The "Tao" is a fundamental idea in most Chinese philosophical schools; in Taoism, however, it denotes the principle that is the source, pattern and substance of everything that exists.
_	Phantom is based on the principle that "Everything is an object", in contrast to the Unix-like approach of "Everything is a file".
_	The theory is based on the principle that the statistical properties are invariant for rotations about a particular direction formula_1 (say), and reflections in planes containing formula_1 and perpendicular to formula_1.
_	The Earl of Birkenhead stated in 1920 that until the early 19th century voluntary drunkenness was never a defence, based on the principle that "a man who by his own voluntary act debauches and destroys his will power shall be no better situated in regard to criminal acts than a sober man".
_	Unlike its modern successor, the Meiji Constitution was founded on the principle that sovereignty resided in person of the Emperor, by virtue of his divine ancestry "unbroken for ages eternal", rather than in the people.
_	At the heart of Honoring Nations is the principle that tribes themselves hold the key to positive social, political, cultural, and economic prosperity—and that self-governance plays a crucial role in building and sustaining strong, healthy Indian nations.
_	This is the principle that landscape designs should "always" be adapted to the context in which they are located.
_	In Silkin v. Beaverbrook Newspapers Ltd., [1958] 1 W.L.R. 743, a House of Lords case, the famous speech of Lord Diplock states succinctly the principle that freedom of speech is subject to the law and like any other freedom there is a balancing.
_	These rules were based on the principle that the black slave had no judicial rights and was the property of his master.
_	Rufino Tamayo founded the Oaxacan school of painting on the principle that although painting must take place on the plastic level, it does not exclude the possibility that the work contain a profound consequence not altogether expressed.
_	Popular sovereignty, or sovereignty of the peoples' rule, is the principle that the authority of a state and its government is created and sustained by the consent of its people, through their elected representatives (Rule by the People), who are the source of all political power.
_	He gave two reasons for doing so:first, leaders of academic institutions tended to use their positions for career advancement at an adverse cost to the institutions;secondly, it was important to establish the principle that the director’s position is not hierarchical; he is only first among equals, which was "characteristically bold" of him, given the cultural milieu prevailing in leading academic institutions at that time.
_	In 1884 he left life assurance to become one of the three commissioners under the Public Service Act of 1883, appointed to establish the principle that promotion should depend on merit and seniority.
_	Police play a major role in youth justice, and such cases are governed by the principle that criminal proceedings should not be used if there is an alternative way of dealing with the offending.
_	They were based on the principle that the State should only recognize distinct "religious associations", having corporate status, formed in each parish for the purpose of worship "in accordance with the rules governing the organization of worship in general".
_	Founded in Melbourne, Australia in 2003, the World Literacy Foundation operates on the principle that education is a basic human right, and through the promotion of literacy and the provision of educational resources, aims to eradicate global illiteracy.
_	He reinforced the principle that federal courts are obligated to exercise judicial review, by overturning purported laws, both state and federal, if they violate the United States Constitution.
_	This is based on the principle that if an animal responds to a stimulus in a similar way to ourselves, it is likely to have had an analogous experience.
_	Focused on defending the border rights guaranteed by the Jay Treaty, Rickard always stood firm on the principle that all Six Nations Indians were citizens of their own nations."
_	It reaffirmed the principle that Guyana was a democratic state founded on the rule of law.
_	Social constructionist James Porter notes the “intertextuality” of all writing as interdependent, based on the principle that all speech and writing evolves from presumed meaning and accepted evidence as defined by each “discourse community,” which Porter defines as “a group of individuals bound by a common interest who communicate through approved channels and whose discourse is regulated.”
_	The former shelved it in the interests of peace; but the latter once more formulated the principle that elections in the churches were to be free and their result confirmed according to the provisions of the common law ("juxta juris communis dispositionem"), i.e. by the immediate superior to whom the right of confirmation belonged.
_	The Mayor complained to the King, who heard the case on 7 April 1669 and decided to allow it to be determined by law rather than by his royal privilege; the lawyers returned to the principle that the Temple could set its own internal rules on the right to carry swords.
_	For their part, the Russian Imperial government accepted the principle that Mongolia must remain formally part of China; however, Russia was equally determined that Mongolia possess autonomous powers so substantial as to make it quasi-independent.
_	Unlike Zhu's emphasis of "li", which is the principle that contains and underlies all things and beings, Lu brought forward the concept of the heart/mind as the ultimate one or source that encompasses everything including the universe and the principle.
_	An approximate theory was developed by Bernard Vonnegut in 1942 to measure the surface tension of the fluids, which is based on the principle that the interfacial tension and centrifugal forces are balanced at mechanical equilibrium.
_	In the UK, "Exxon Corpn et al v. Exxon Insurance Consultants" stands for the principle that a single word, even if highly original and creative, cannot be considered a literary work.
_	In mathematics, semantics, and philosophy of language, the principle of compositionality is the principle that the meaning of a complex expression is determined by the meanings of its constituent expressions and the rules used to combine them.
_	They operate on the principle that at high tide during new-moon (i.e. dark-moon) spring tides, fish swim over the walls to feed.
_	He used many methods, including wide use of eucalyptus trees, on the principle that the large tree would draw a lot of water from the ground.
_	WiLDAF centers around the principle that equality and empowerment are essential to a healthy society, and they focus their efforts on development and the law in relation to women to advocate for and educate people.
_	The Alliance did not express an opinion as to what should be the qualifications for enfranchisement, its sole object being to establish the principle that sex should not be a disqualification.
_	The technique operates on the principle that a positron or positronium will annihilate through interaction with electrons.
_	This is based on the principle that if an animal responds to a stimulus in a similar way to ourselves, it is likely to have had an analogous experience.
_	In the field of company law, it is known primarily to stand for the principle that damages may be sought for breach of contract by a director even though a contract may "de facto" constrain the exercise of powers to sack people found in the company's constitution.
_	Russ Meyer described Weapons's breasts in his autobiography, "A Clean Breast: The Life and Loves of Russ Meyer" as "Big boobs bolstered by a breast hammock based on the principle that made the Sydney Opera House feasible".
_	It is based on the principle that the astronomical theories of the motions of sun and moon determine a large number of component frequencies, and at each frequency there is a component of force tending to produce tidal motion, but that at each place of interest on the Earth, the tides respond at each frequency with an amplitude and phase peculiar to that locality.
_	He applied the principle that the monarchy should not go interfere with the justice system.
_	Both laws embrace the principle that user fees charged to motorists and air travelers should be fully invested in improving and modernizing the nation's surface and air transportation infrastructures.
_	In accelerator physics strong focusing or alternating-gradient focusing is the principle that the net effect on a particle beam of charged particles passing through alternating field gradients is to make the beam converge.
_	By contrast, "weak focusing" is the principle that nearby circles, described by charged particles moving in a uniform magnetic field, only intersect once per revolution.
_	Toward the end of his life he regretted some of his arguments, but still stood on the principle that a unified church was the quickest way to emancipate slaves.
_	An orthography based on the principle that symbols correspond to phonemes may, in some cases, lack characters to represent all the phonemes or all the phonemic distinctions in the language.
_	The concept of benchmarking is viewed with considerable suspicion by a number of European countries, though all accept the principle that education and training policies should be based on evidence.
_	The early Karaites adopted the principle that marriage was a true and full union - each spouse was to be considered legally as the same person, and hence someone related to one spouse was seen as having exactly the same relation to the other.
_	He was a staunch defender of the principle that sin had a privative rather than a positive nature (A Justification of the Fathers and the Schoolmen), and also published an academic treatise, Pothen zizania on the origin of heresy, written in Latin, with extensive Greek quotations.
_	Checks and balances is the principle that each of the Branches has the power to limit or check the other two and this creates a balance between the three separate powers of the state, this principle induces that the ambitions of one branch prevent that one of the other branches become supreme, and thus be eternally confronting each other and in that process leaving the people free from government abuses.
_	The program is committed to the principle that wildlife is a publicly owned resource held in trust and carefully managed by state and federal agencies.
_	An adult's sexual intercourse with a minor below the legal age of consent may sometimes be referred to as statutory rape, based on the principle that any apparent consent by a minor could not be considered legal consent.
_	The Tosefta establishes the principle that we may not save a community by sacrificing an individual, unless the original demand was for a specified individual.
_	After describing the operation of the principle in various types of case involving land, he stated: "I see no reason why the principle that a grantor will not be allowed to derogate from his grant [of land] by using property retained by him in such a way as to render property granted by him unfit or materially unfit for the purpose for which the grant was made should not apply to the sale of a car."
_	However, the controversy concerning church versus state education led to the Queensland Government's refusal of Roman Catholic Bishop James Quinn's proposal to establish grammar schools at Brisbane and Ipswich on the principle that a grammar school education should be secular and free from denominational control.
_	It is famous for its precedence in establishing the principle that the mere appearance of bias is sufficient to overturn a judicial decision.
_	The diverse repertoire of the company "cracked the strict organization of the Parisian operatic world by breaking away from the principle that institution and genre were of one substance."
_	Citing the case of "Co-operative Wholesale Society Ltd v National Westminster Bank plc" [1995] 1 EGLR 97, he accepted the principle that "where the parties have used unambiguous language, the court must apply it", no matter how commercially unreasonable the result.
_	In opposition to the revisionist line of the 5th Congress, the Conference adopted the Manifesto-Program, which draws a revolutionary line, reintroduced the Statute adopted at the Fourth Congress, adopted a resolution on the unity of the Communists, signed the principle that each country can only exist a single Marxist–Leninist party, decided to reissue The Working Class, a former central organ of the Party, approved the break with the USSR, and, finally, elected a new Central Committee.
_	The program was founded on the principle that it would not only achieve the same environmental results as the traditional (successful) 'command and control' regulations, but that it would do so more cheaply.
_	is a place where people can learn new skills, from soldering to video game design, and operates on the principle that members of the local community can be involved in all aspects of creating things that sustain people, such as food, clothing, energy, technology, shelter, and art.
_	Rumford's photometer (also called a shadow photometer) depended on the principle that a brighter light would cast a deeper shadow.
_	His drugs were based upon the principle that God had conferred 'marvelous' virtues on common things like serpents and toads.
_	Donald Knuth accepted the principle that programs must be written with provability in mind, but he disagreed (and still disagrees) with abolishing the GOTO statement.
_	Bentham defined as the "fundamental axiom" of his philosophy the principle that "it is the greatest happiness of the greatest number that is the measure of right and wrong".
_	A meeting of the PGA on the following Monday accepted the principle that the player could choose in such situations.
_	Crathorn felt the entire system had to be revised; the human mind naturally knows only qualities, and one cannot be certain that even they exist without appealing to the principle that God could not deceive us.
_	The quadrupole mass filter operates on the principle that ion trajectories in a two-dimensional quadrupole field are stable if the field has an AC component superimposed on a DC component with appropriate amplitudes and frequencies.
_	Tolerogenic therapies are based on the principle that inducing the semi-mature phenotype in dendritic cells and then exposing them to the target antigen should allow antigen-specific induction of T-cell tolerance.
_	It was founded on the principle that women, working together, can enhance the physical, social, and financial well-being of women and girls in the Washington metropolitan area by providing financial resources to local nonprofits already engaged in innovative, effective work for communities in need.
_	Contributions for which Luce is known include formulating Luce's choice axiom formalizing the principle that additional options should not affect the probability of selecting one item over another, defining semiorders, introducing graph-theoretic methods into the social sciences, and coining the term "clique" for a complete subgraph in graph theory.
_	He started to emphasize contours and modeling, abandoned the principle that scenes should be painted outdoors to capture light and atmosphere.
_	This was the first time the new government had been directly opposed, and through a clear show of federal authority, Washington established the principle that federal law is the supreme law of the land, and demonstrated that the federal government had both the ability and willingness to suppress violent resistance to the nation's laws.
_	Nevertheless, the Court looked to the Restatement (Third) Foreign Relations Law, § 415, Comment "j" for the principle that:
_	Businesses follow the principle that establishes that, the more people paying attention to the campaign, the more possibilities that campaign has for being remembered.
_	What is ultimate is the principle that one state, in its dealings with another, may not place itself in a position of economic isolation.
_	Haart developed her eponymous shoe label on the principle that sexy heels can be comfortable, a design-focused philosophy that translated to lingerie and womenswear with La Perla.
_	This process stems from the principle that there is usually no uniquely right way of accomplishing any task.
_	In creating its laws and dealing out sanctions, the school meeting generally applies A. S. Neill's maxim "Freedom not Licence" (he wrote a book of the same name); the principle that you can do as you please, so long as it doesn't cause harm to others.
_	The Gemara suggested that the principle that the first Tanna and Rabbi Judah were disputing was whether Jerusalem was divided among the Tribes; the first Tanna holds that Jerusalem was not divided, while Rabbi Judah holds that Jerusalem was divided among the Tribes.
_	Gaseous diffusion worked on the principle that a lighter gas diffuses through a barrier faster than a heavier one at a rate inversely proportional to its molecular weight.
_	He argues that "it is based on too facile a use of the principle that all power corrupts and absolute power corrupts absolutely".
_	Following World War I, the Treaty of Versailles contained the first constitution of a new International Labour Organization founded on the principle that "labour is not a commodity", and for the reason that "peace can be established only if it is based upon social justice".
_	Although the argument between universalism and relativism is far from complete, it is an academic discussion in that all international human rights instruments adhere to the principle that human rights are universally applicable.
_	Whereas Jeremy Bentham advocated the "use of pain where shame has proved ineffective", Right Realism advocates the principle that nothing deters more than the certainty of detection.
_	At considerable personal risk, he held fast to the principle that religion should not be unduly interfered with by the state.
_	In the "Corfu Channel" case, the Court articulated the principle that every state is obligd not to knowingly allow its territory to be used to commit acts against the rights of any other state.
_	Use propaganda and demands for concessions incessantly on the principle that familiarity with uncongenial subjects eventually breeds readiness to take them for granted.
_	In its March 1949 report, the Dinning Commission supported the principle that Albertans should have first call on provincial natural gas supplies, and that Canadians should have priority over foreign users if an exportable surplus developed.
_	Mill defines the difference between higher and lower forms of pleasure with the principle that those who have experienced both tend to prefer one over the other.
_	The arms of the hyperbola approach asymptotic lines and the 'right-hand' arm of one branch of a hyperbola meets the 'left-hand' arm of the other branch of a hyperbola at the point at infinity; this is based on the principle that, in projective geometry, a single line meets itself at a point at infinity.
_	This is the principle that the correct formal scientific name for an animal taxon, the "valid name", correct to use, is the oldest available name that applies to it.
_	Furthermore, an international activity of the organization is carried out in accordance with the principle that "Ukraine is not only Europe, but also the whole world".
_	The English follow the principle that when one lies, one should lie big, and stick to it.
_	This was seen as a betrayal by NAC leaders such as Matinga and James Frederick Sangala, who thought the Colonial Office was discarding the principle that African interests were paramount, instead favoring White colonists.
_	René Descartes (1596–1650) was one of the first to conceive a model of reciprocal innervation (in 1626) as the principle that provides for the control of agonist and antagonist muscles.
_	Under the "Two Plus Four Treaty" both the Federal Republic and the Democratic Republic committed themselves and their unified continuation to the principle that their joint pre-1990 boundaries constituted the entire territory that could be claimed by a Government of Germany, and hence that there were no further lands outside those boundaries that were parts of Germany as a whole.
_	In the United States, net neutrality, the principle that Internet service providers treat all data on the Internet the same, and not discriminate, has been an issue of contention between network users and access providers since the 1990s.
_	At its most basic level, law in Ankh-Morpork operates on the principle that a grocer is free to mix soil in his coffee, and also to be vivisected by any customer who happens to find out.
_	This is generally based on the principle that a child has a right to know his or her biological origins.
_	It is based on the principle that high levels of one attribute amongst one's peers can have spillover effects on an individual.
_	We strongly support the principle that the internet should remain a space that is open to all and we have not called for content providers to pay for distribution.
_	While some maintain that its only a secondary extension of the principle that it is primarily applied to Svayam bhagavan and His energies.
_	Similar to that of Roman Law, Islamic law also holds the principle that the onus of proof is on the accuser or claimant based on a hadith documented by Imam Nawawi.
_	Reciprocity in linear systems is the principle that a response Rab, measured at a location (and direction if applicable) a, when the system has an excitation signal applied at a location (and direction if applicable) b, is exactly equal to Rba which is the response at location b, when that same excitation is applied at a.
_	He went on to be First Sea Lord and Chief of the Naval Staff in which role he assisted in establishing NATO and agreed to the principle that the Supreme Allied Commander Atlantic should be an American admiral, in the face of fierce British opposition.
_	It is rooted in the principle that the "directors of a corporation... are clothed with [the] presumption, which the law accords to them, of being [motivated] in their conduct by a bona fide regard for the interests of the corporation whose affairs the stockholders have committed to their charge".
_	Acoustoelastic theory is based on the principle that the acoustic properties of a material are altered as the material is loaded and deformed.
_	If the father does not take leave, the family loses the leave period reserved for them; thus the father's quota is not the leave period itself, but rather the principle that a certain part of the leave period can only be taken by the father.
_	That case established the principle that for long marriages the courts should begin their deliberations on how to divide marital assets from the standpoint of a 50:50 split between husband and wife, regardless of who earned the money.
_	At heart, the constraints on long arm jurisdiction are concepts of international law, and the principle that one country ought not exercise state power over the territory of another unless some recognized exception applies.
_	In a national broadcast, he said that the decision was based on the principle that "justice must at all times be tempered with mercy."
_	The conference produced the Act of Chapultepec, which provided the framework for economic, social and defense cooperation among the nations of the Americas, and set the principle that an attack on one of these nations would be regarded as an attack on all and jointly resisted.
_	The BJC defines itself in the following terms: "The mission of the Baptist Joint Committee for Religious Liberty is to defend and extend God-given religious liberty for all, furthering the Baptist heritage that champions the principle that religion must be freely exercised, neither advanced nor inhibited by government."
_	The Commonwealth bases the funding for charter schools on the principle that the state’s subsidies should follow the students, regardless of whether they choose to attend traditional public schools or charter schools.
_	Established by producer Oliver Eberle in 1997, and based on the principle that understanding the information based upon which movies are made is key to working in Hollywood, ShowBIZData.com is a comprehensive entertainment industry database online.
_	This serves at least to show how strong in later ages was the recollection of Akiva's philosophical speculation Akiva's anthropology is based upon the principle that man was created בצלם, that is, not in the image of God—which would be בצלם אלהים—but after an image, after a primordial type; or, philosophically speaking, after an Idea—what Philo calls in agreement with Judean theology, "the first heavenly man" (see Adam ḳadmon).
_	One major characteristic of "business unionism" is the principle that unions should be run like businesses.
_	Wollemi College states that its aim is "to follow the principle that parents are the primary educators of their children and that schools exist to give parents every support".
_	On the verge of the Revolution, they accepted the principle that the public burden should be equally divided among all classes of the nation, a step they had delayed too long.
_	A "makefile" works upon the principle that files only need recreating if their dependencies are newer than the file being created/recreated.
_	This method of gear cutting is based on the principle that any two gears will mesh if they are of the same pitch, proper helix angle, and proper tooth depth and thickness.
_	Based on the principle that creative arts play an important role in democratic society, it was founded in 1970 by Willy Brandt acting on a proposal by the then chairman of the German Federation of Artists.
_	Mario Bunge has written that "psychokinesis, or PK, violates the principle that mind cannot act directly on matter.
_	The case nevertheless established the principle that the deliberate and failure of prison authorities to address the medical needs of an inmate constitutes "cruel and unusual punishment".
_	The Center for the Study of the Force Majeure, founded by Helen and Newton Harrison at UC Santa Cruz, operates on the principle that "We as a species must adapt ourselves to a very different world...proceed[ing] on our assertion that ecologically based, large-scale systems of adaptation to the extreme changes in the ever-warming environment are necessary for collective survival and so must be invented.
_	Catholic teaching accepts the principle that the state has the right to take the life of a person guilty of an extremely serious crime, and that the state may take appropriate measures to protect itself and its citizens from grave harm, nevertheless, the question for judgment and decision today is whether capital punishment is justifiable under present circumstances.
_	She is under a duty to mitigate her losses and cannot claim for harm that was a remote consequence of the contractual breach, but remedies in English law are footed on the principle that full compensation for all losses, pecuniary or not, should be made good.
_	Canada later also declared war on Italy (11 June 1940), Japan (7 December 1941), and other Axis powers, enshrining the principle that the Statute of Westminster conferred these sovereign powers to Canada.
_	On 14 January 2010, Army Commander Anupong Paochinda ordered a suspension of Khattiya Sawasdipol after an inquiry committee found that Khattiya had openly supported the DAAD, a political pressure group that called for new elections, which breached the principle that military officers do not openly take sides in politics.
_	Exceptions exist to the principle that chaining numbers represent a railroad distance to the zero point.
_	However, the Court referred to two United Kingdom decisions which stood for the principle that courts are not precluded from determining whether a decision is in fact based on grounds of national security.
_	The Herborn school held the principle that every theory has to be functional in practical use, therefore it has to be didactic (i.e. morally instructive).
_	High-gain feedback is the principle that allows simplified models of operational amplifiers and emitter-degenerated bipolar transistors to be used in a variety of different settings.
_	The CPG also confirmed the principle that 40% of the member states' military forces must be redeployable, and 8% must constantly be on operations abroad.
_	Schmitt also argues that "Every actual democracy rests on the principle that not only are equals equal, but unequals will not be treated equally.
_	Reis was “a firm believer in the principle that women should organize themselves for the betterment of society, she was active in a variety of clubs designed to help immigrants assimilate to the new world, aid strangers stranded in uncomfortable circumstances, assist the blind, and tap the political energies of women in general.
_	This argument bolsters the impact of secularism by weakening any position supporting the favouring of one religion over another in a given state, on the principle that if no scientific and reasonable assumption of its truth can be made, society should not be so organised as to privilege any particular religion.
_	This involved crackdowns on relatively minor offenses such as graffiti, turnstile jumping, and aggressive "squeegeemen," on the principle that this would send a message that order would be maintained and that the city would be "cleaned up."
_	This is based on the principle that, as a minority, the Transylvanian Hungarian community should politically be represented by a single, united organization that would offer a framework for varied ideologies and not by various political parties.
_	She continued, "It really is -- to suggest that there is some kind of rape that would be okay to force a woman to carry the resulting pregnancy to term, and abandon the principle that has been long held, an exception that has been settled for 30 years, is to me a violent act against women in and of itself," Wasserman Schultz said."
_	With his group, Glicken compiled a landmark study in the field of volcanic landslides, establishing the principle that tall volcanoes have a tendency to collapse.
_	The Nordic model would permit private enterprise on the condition that it adheres to the principle that the resources it disposes are in reality public means and would create of a broad category of social welfare rights.
_	Literature printed by the organization asserts the principle that "every man, woman and child is entitled to adequate and appropriate food, clothing, shelter and medical care as basic human rights."
_	The dissent argues, first, "The agreement to suppress the Lagadec patent, a competing technology, surely falls within" the principle that such agreements are "inherently suspect," so that showing their existence creates a "prima facie" case and shifts the burden to Philips to "come[ ] forward with some plausible (and legally cognizable) competitive justification for the restraint" or show that the restriction was not anticompetitive.
_	In virtually all cases, the EU follows the principle that member states can always create rights more beneficial to workers.
_	He established the principle that where the Talmud gives no decision traditional customs must be adhered to.
_	Blood tanistry is the principle that "the most talented male member of the royal dynasty should inherit the throne, commonly by murder and war".
_	The Parliament elected in December 1918 which sat from 1919 until 1922, represents the most significant deviation from the principle that the Leader of the Opposition is the leader of the party not in government with the greatest numerical support in the House of Commons.
_	Comcast has also been widely criticized, most publicly by Netflix, for its position against net neutrality, the principle that all traffic on the internet should be treated equally.
_	This allowed him to discuss the principle that God never wearies of forgiving humans and to stress the importance of never tiring in asking for forgiveness.
_	Francis Simon's group at Oxford investigated the gaseous diffusion, which works on the principle that at differing pressures uranium 235 would diffuse through a barrier faster than uranium 238.
_	When asked to summarise the incident, two prominent Sydney lawyers described it as "a beat up" and that "the only thing it’s a precedent for is the principle that if your application doesn’t include the required information it will be rejected."
_	Woodrow Wilson agreed to transfer the territories back to the ADR on the principle that they were dominated by Armenians.
_	As a practical guide towards a radical restoration the Abbot of Solesmes Dom Guéranger, in his "Institutions Liturgiques", had laid down the principle that "when a large number of manuscripts of various epochs and from different countries agree in the version of a chant, it may be affirmed that those MSS.
_	A Truman Institute survey from 2005 found that 63% of the Arab citizens accepted the principle that Israel is the state of the Jewish people.
_	Historically, Scottish common law differed in that the use of "precedent" was subject to the courts' seeking to discover the principle that justifies a law rather than searching for an example as a "precedent", and principles of natural justice and fairness have always played a role in Scots Law.
_	Interest in anticarcinogens is motivated primarily by the principle that it is preferable to prevent disease (preventive medicine) than to have to treat it (rescue medicine).
_	The instrument is based on the principle that under a certain pressure, gas can be pushed via the cervix and uterus through the tubes into the abdominal cavity where its presence can be detected by distension and other means.
_	His 1977 work "Meaning and Form" was instrumental in establishing the principle that a difference in form implies a difference in perceived meaning.
_	Grasset stresses the principle that various simple geometric shapes (e.g., the circle, triangle, the square, along with their respective volumes, spheres, cones and cubes) are the basis of all compositional arrangements.
_	She is the co-founder and chair of SHM Productions, a strategy and insight consultancy based in London, which was founded upon the principle that human motivation is at the root of business success and is critical to innovation across the public and private sectors.
_	The Teaching Pedagogy implemented in this school for both levels starting S.Y. 2012-2013 comprises a reformed Montessorian method of education, with the principle that we uphold the holistic development and freedom of the student to explore his or her strengths.
_	Levinson states that the role of śruti and smṛti in Hindu law is as a source of guidance, and its tradition cultivates the principle that "the facts and circumstances of any particular case determine what is good or bad".
_	Elkind emphasized the principle that "early education must start with the child, not with the subject matter to be taught."
_	the principle that biological resources were the heritage of mankind.
_	Steiner as one of the "giants of early-childhood development" and describes activities for young children in a Waldorf school as "social", "holistic", and "collaborative", as well as reflecting the principle that "early education must start with the child, not with the subject matter to be taught".
_	It maintains the principle that no object can accelerate to the speed of light in the reference frame of any coincident observer.
_	Recommendation No. 5. Looking towards a form of ultimate self-government, consistent with the three principles laid down in Recommendation No. 3, we recommend that the mandatory or trustee should proclaim the principle that Arab economic, educational and political advancement in Palestine is of equal importance with that of the Jews; and should at once prepare measures designed to bridge the gap which now exists and raise the Arab standard of living to that of the Jews; and so bring the two peoples to a full appreciation of their common interest and common destiny in the land where both belong.
_	He introduced a general civil code, abolished torture and established the principle that the Crown would not interfere in matters of justice.
_	The Juice Plus Children's Research Foundation (JPCRF), founded in 1997, is a non-profit medical research organization (NTEE code H99) whose stated goal is to initiate and/or support programs that advance the principle that improved nutrition leads to healthier lifestyle and overall better health in children.
_	Using the principle that the slope of a line equates to the rise/run, the coordinates at the end of the interval can be found using the following formula:
_	The Court did so on the basis of the principle that the nonstatutory subject matter (the algorithm) must be regarded as already in the prior art.
_	His 19-page letter, titled “The Deacon: Icon of Jesus Christ the Servant”, cited the principle that the one who presides at a liturgical service or who is the principal celebrant at Mass should also give the homily:
_	(That Hezekiah began to reign before 722 BC, however, is entirely consistent with the principle that the Ahaz/Hezekiah coregency began in 729 BC.)
_	Although the purpose of such a list is to reduce unwanted marketing, the principle that "data is only private until someone decides it isn't" indicates it can also generate unwanted marketing.
_	‘Free prior and informed consent’ (FPIC), is the principle that a community has the right to give or withhold its consent to proposed projects that may affect the lands they customarily own, occupy or otherwise use.
_	It works on the principle that equivalent sentences should roughly correspond in length—that is, longer sentences in one language should correspond to longer sentences in the other language.
_	Constitutional Accountability Center (CAC) is a non-profit think tank, public interest law firm, and action center founded in 2008 and located in Washington, D.C. CAC’s work in the courts, through the government, and with legal scholars is organized around the principle that the Constitution’s text and history are inherently progressive.
_	"Cuvillier" did not allude to the principle that the prerogative rights of the Crown could only be removed by express words in a statute.
_	Citizen's dividend is a proposed policy based upon the principle that the natural world is the common property of all persons (see Georgism).
_	They work to ensure fair and secure prices for the farmers supplying them, basing their operations on the principle that the health of the economy depends upon producers, distributors and consumers cooperating to generate stable businesses.
_	Going along with the principle that there are two sides of every picture, “Sachi Baat” helps you discover both these sides.
_	It is based on the principle that a dilute suspension of small particles will scatter light (usually a laser) passed through it rather than simply absorbing it.
_	The next meeting, in February 1914, endorsed the principle that all the countries bordering the Mediterranean and the Black Sea should be eligible for membership.
_	He added: "We are in some danger of resting our position too exclusively upon the existence, the nature and the wishes of the inhabitants of the Falkland Islands... if the population of the Falkland Islands did not desire to be British, the principle that the Queen wishes no unwilling subjects would long ago have prevailed; but we should create great difficulties for ourselves in other contexts, as well as in this context, if we rested our action purely and exclusively on the notion of restoring tolerable, acceptable conditions and self-determination to our fellow Britons on the Falkland Islands...
_	Abu Bakr established the principle that the "zakat" must be paid to the legitimate representative of the Prophet's authority (i.e. himself).
_	Creationists point to experiments they have performed, which they claim demonstrate that 1.5 billion years of nuclear decay took place over a short period of time, from which they infer that "billion-fold speed-ups of nuclear decay" have occurred, a massive violation of the principle that radioisotope decay rates are constant, a core principle underlying nuclear physics generally, and radiometric dating in particular.
_	are based on the principle that the inner light is present in all people.
_	It was created under the principle that strengthening America's allies in Europe through military assistance and economic recovery would be beneficial to America's long-term security.
_	However, the analysis of capitalist competition offered in Marx's "Capital, Volume III" is completely based on the principle that commodities, human labor capacity, currencies and assets (physical or financial) in reality "do not trade at their value".
_	Guided by the principle that the strongest sculler should row in the singles, her preference was for Boron, but Boron preferred to row in the double or quad.
_	Dividing 4 to 4 over the issue of jurisdiction, the U.S. Supreme court dismissed the case for want of jurisdiction, so the Vermont Supreme Court ordered Holmes release even though five of the eight Justices denied the issue of Jennison's authority, thus enunciating the principle that the Constitution gives state officers no power to take any independent actions concerned with foreign governments.
_	The Libertarian Party of New York is dedicated to the principle that free people have the right to do anything they please, except to initiate force, the threat of force, or fraud, against other persons or their property.
_	One Health is the principle that human, animal, and environmental health are inextricably linked and should no longer be researched and learned in a siloed manner.
_	The presumption of innocence is the principle that one is considered innocent unless proven guilty.
_	To quote the General Report on Tunny:Turingery introduced the principle that the key differenced at one, now called ΔΚ, could yield information unobtainable from ordinary key.
_	Other philological tools took longer to be developed: the first statement, for instance, of the principle that a more difficult reading should be preferred over a simpler one, was in 1697 by Jean Le Clerc.
_	In Keynesian Economics, the principle of effective demand is the principle that the aggregate demand function and the aggregate supply function intersect each other at the point of effective demand generally entailing under-employment and under-capacity utilization.
_	Quoting Hutton and Bagehot again, ""... the Statute of 1633 completed the slavery of the other classes, by proclaiming the principle that 'the air enslaves the man,' in virtue of which every peasant who had lived for a year upon the estate of a noble was held to be his property.
_	From the start of sailing till the turn of the millennium one practiced the principle that the difference in points between No. 1 and 2 must be larger than between No. 2 and 3 and so on.
_	This is based on the principle that if a specific cognitive problem can be found after an injury to a specific area of the brain, it is possible that this part of the brain is in some way involved.
_	Holding to the principle that covenants should continue to be updated and sworn, the RPCNA adopted the "Covenant of 1871" as their new church covenant in that year.
_	The photographer obtained his copies under a process based on the principle that in the parts of the image receiving less light the gelatin would remain soft whereas in the parts of the image receiving more light the gelatin would become hardened.
_	The expenditure approach works on the principle that all of the product must be bought by somebody, therefore the value of the total product must be equal to people's total expenditures in buying things.
_	The income approach works on the principle that the incomes of the productive factors ("producers," colloquially) must be equal to the value of their product, and determines GDP by finding the sum of all producers' incomes.
_	Businesses follow the principle that establishes that, the more people paying attention to the campaign, the more possibilities that campaign has for being remembered.
_	Inerting relies on the principle that a combustible (or flammable) gas is able to undergo combustion (explode) only if mixed with air in the right proportions.
_	Payton and related case law establish that the principle that a person in a home, particularly his or her own, is entitled Fourth Amendment protections not afforded to persons in automobiles, as per "Whren v. United States", or to persons in public, as per "United States v. Watson".
_	In Spanish verse, an octosyllable is a line that has its seventh syllable stressed, on the principle that this would normally be the penultimate syllable of a word ("Lengua Castellana y Literatura", ed. Grazalema Santillana.
_	"Rerum novarum" introduced the idea of subsidiarity, the principle that political and social decisions should be taken at a local level, if possible, rather than by a central authority, into Catholic social thought.
_	Creationists point to experiments they have performed, which they claim demonstrate that 1.5 billion years of nuclear decay took place over a short period, from which they infer that "billion-fold speed-ups of nuclear decay" have occurred, a massive violation of the principle that radioisotope decay rates are constant, a core principle underlying nuclear physics generally, and radiometric dating in particular.
_	Akiva's anthropology is based upon the principle that man was created בצלם, that is, not in the image of God—which would be בצלם אלהים—but after an image, after a primordial type; or, philosophically speaking, after an Idea—what Philo calls in agreement with Judean theology, "the first heavenly man" (see Adam ḳadmon).
_	Trained celebrants usually operate professionally on the principle that their own beliefs and values are irrelevant.
_	The Council noted with gratification the declaration by both India and Pakistan that they would work for a peaceful settlement, continue to observe a cease-fire and accepted the principle that the accession of the State of Jammu and Kashmir should be determined by a free and impartial plebiscite under the auspices of the United Nations.
_	It starts from the principle that within any community there is a wealth of knowledge and experience which, if used in creative ways, can be channeled into collective action to achieve the communities' desired goals.
_	McLuhan talks about media being “hot” or “cold” and touches on the principle that distinguishes them from one another.
_	In its 1986 ruling in "Société des Acadiens v. Association of Parents", the Supreme Court stated that the principle that elected governments can enhance language rights, had been constitutionalized in 1982 under the terms of section 16(3) of the "Canadian Charter of Rights and Freedoms".
_	The anti-religious campaign was questioned, not on moral grounds, but on the principle that it did not appear to be producing desired results and it was greatly reduced in intensity in the following years.
_	However, the principle that two Nulls aren't equal to each other is effectively violated in the SQL specification for the codice_40 and codice_41 operators, which do identify nulls with each other.
_	The Carr-Saunders Commission postulates “the principle that all children who show the necessary capacity should enjoy an equal chance of reaching the University; and, in particular, that no able child should be handicapped in climbing the educational ladder by race, religion, rural domicile, or lack of means.
_	"Besides appealing to the demonstrably false principle that the government cannot favor religion over irreligion, today's opinion suggests that the posting of the Ten Commandments violates the principle that the government cannot favor one religion over another . . ..
_	The public trust doctrine is the principle that the sovereign holds in trust for public use some resources such as shoreline between the high and low tide lines, regardless of private property ownership.
_	The Disability Rights Education and Defense Fund (DREDF) declared, "we hold as non-negotiable the principle that personal and physical autonomy of all people with disabilities be regarded as sacrosanct".
_	This was done on the principle that the goals scored were important but the most important factor was the win or loss, as in normal championship games.
_	Later empiricism referred to a theory of knowledge in philosophy which adheres to the principle that knowledge arises from experience and evidence gathered specifically using the senses.
_	These donation based seats have come under heavy criticism because this makes effectively India the only country that authorises, as official policy, the sale of medical seats by private medical colleges, implicitly accepting the principle that the ability to pay, and not merit, is what counts.
_	"Li" is the principle that is in everything and governs the universe.
_	On 22 August 2014, Out of the Blue released another charity single - "Rather Be" by Clean Bandit to raise money for Global Dream, a non-profit initiative that aims to promote literacy in India through a new technique for rapid learning, based on the principle that anyone who can read can teach anyone else to read.
_	As has already been mentioned, the matter content of the spacetime defines another quantity, the energy–momentum tensor T, and the principle that "spacetime tells matter how to move, and matter tells spacetime how to curve" means that these quantities must be related to each other.
_	One of the defining features of the local churches is their adherence to the principle that all Christians in a city or locality are automatically members of the one church in that locality.
_	"We deprecate certain immoral laws which have grown out of the failure of our nation to recognize [the principle that no law should contravene the Divine law], notably such as require the desecration of the Christian Sabbath, authorize unscriptural marriage and divorce, and license the manufacture and sale of intoxicating liquors as a beverage."
_	The story revolves around two fallen angels who plan to employ an alleged loophole in Catholic dogma to return to Heaven after being cast out by God; but as existence is founded on the principle that God is infallible, their success would prove God wrong and thus undo all creation.
_	He deeply believed in the principle that Christians could best understand their faith by studying Judaism and suggested that Christians "could gain some feeling for the Old Testament by attending a Friday night Sabbath service at a local temple or synagogue".
_	He was devoted to the principle that the most despised defendants also deserved a defense.
_	Its aims were to enforce the principle that it is iniquitous to inflict avoidable suffering on any sentient being.
_	a 2013 independent docufiction short web film about net neutrality (the principle that Internet service providers (ISPs) should not favour either type of content over another), directed by Gena Konstantinakos.
_	This is in accord with the analytical method that has since come to be called Ockham's razor, the principle that the explanation of any phenomenon should make as few assumptions as possible.
_	Committed to the principle that the accused deserves a vigorous defense, he mounts the best defense of Abel he can, declining along the way to cooperate in the CIA's attempts to induce him to violate the confidentiality of his communications with his client.
_	ratio to the tonnage of each category of vessel to be maintained, and to make any variation of this ratio in a particular category or categories dependent on the arrangements to this end that may be arrived at in a future general treaty on naval limitation, such arrangements being based on the principle that any increase in one category would be compensated for by a corresponding reduction in others.
_	Some territories were promised to several recipients, on the principle that conflicts could be sorted out after victory was achieved.
_	This analysis gave rise to the principle that an efficient microkernel should be small enough that the majority of performance-critical code fits into the (first-level) cache (preferably a small fraction of said cache).
_	This works by the principle that certain frequencies will be in, or close to antiphase, at different sections and will tend to cancel when added.
_	A double standard can therefore be described as a biased or morally unfair application of the principle that all are equal in their freedoms.
_	The method is based on the principle that foods combine well with one another when they share key flavor components.
_	"Stare decisis", the principle that cases should be decided according to consistent principled rules so that similar facts will yield similar results, lies at the heart of all common law systems.
_	This is based on the principle that if an animal responds to a stimulus in a similar way to ourselves, it is likely to have had an analogous experience.
_	This allowed the courts to consider the Crown's actions in terms of compliance with the Treaty and established the principle that if the Treaty is mentioned in strong terms in a piece of legislation, it takes precedence over other parts of that legislation should they come into conflict.
_	With a clear conception of the rights of the individual there came acceptance of the principle that secondary education is the birthright of every intelligent child and that his studies be closely related to his needs and aptitudes.
_	It is a development of the principle that thought and being constitute a single and active unity.
_	For sixteen days between November 25 and December 10 activists hold events and promote the principle that women’s rights are human rights.
_	The new law swept away a swathe of earlier statutes, stating at the outset the principle that "Printing and publication are free".
_	However, since the Convention on the Rights of the Child, 20 November 1989, the principle that a child has to continue to maintain a strong relationship with both parents even if separated, has become more and more a recognized right.
_	Melbourne's water supply system is based on the principle that it is better to start with the highest quality source water than having to treat it to reach required standards.
_	At the same time, the British Government recognised for the first time, as part of the prospective, the so-called "Irish dimension": the principle that the people of the island of Ireland as a whole have the right, without any outside interference, to solve the issues between North and South by mutual consent.
_	In this direction, although life's dynamics may be argued to go against the tendency of second law, which states that the entropy of an isolated system tends to increase, it does not in any way conflict or invalidate this law, because the principle that entropy can only increase or remain constant applies only to a closed system which is adiabatically isolated, meaning no heat can enter or leave.
_	Jackson's "flawed sweetness" was also acclaimed; concluding, "She's the principle that organizes the noise, and the particle around which songs become pearlescent".
_	The lesser of two evils principle (or lesser evil principle and lesser-evilism) is the principle that when faced with selecting from two immoral options, the one which is least immoral should be chosen.
_	According to Canaday, "coverture was diminished ... in the 1970s, as part of a broader feminist revolution in law that further weakened the principle that a husband owned a wife's labor (including her person)...
_	Those processes rely in the principle that an increase in temperature will induce the reduction or annihilation of pores.
_	While not all of Liebeskind's ideas were incorporated into the final design, his design and the public support it garnered did solidify the principle that the original footprints of the Twin Towers should be turned into a memorial and not be used for commercial purposes.
_	There was a third principle that followed from the former that came to light during the Crystal period, again according to Green: "the principle that nature should be approached as no more than the supplier of 'elements' to be pictorially or sculpturally developed and then freely manipulated according to the laws of the medium alone".
_	Holmes JA’s observation in no way detracts from the principle that, in culpable homicide cases, death must be reasonably foreseeable.
_	It established the principle that a restraint of trade is enforceable unless the court is convinced that it is unreasonable.
_	The idea that barristers would not automatically have rights of audience also irritated them, and the idea that the Lord Chancellor would be responsible for defining which bodies could grant these certificates undermined the principle that the legal profession should be independent from the Government.
_	The CNT initially welcomed the Republic as a preferable alternative to dictatorship, while still holding on to the principle that all states are inherently deleterious, if perhaps to varying degrees of severity.
_	This judgement also laid down the principle that slavery contracted in other jurisdictions could not be enforced in England.
_	In terms of U.S. foreign policy, he expressed his belief in American exceptionalism and defended what he saw as an assertive foreign agenda in which the country is "upholding the principle that bigger nations can't bully the small."
_	The Hortensian Law also reaffirmed the principle that an act of the Plebeian Council have the full force of law over both Plebeians and Patricians, which it had originally acquired as early as 449 BC.
_	They operate on the principle that, given laminar flow, the pressure difference across a pipe is linear to the flow rate.
_	The Gibbs phenomenon is also closely related to the principle that the decay of the Fourier coefficients of a function at infinity is controlled by the smoothness of that function; very smooth functions will have very rapidly decaying Fourier coefficients (resulting in the rapid convergence of the Fourier series), whereas discontinuous functions will have very slowly decaying Fourier coefficients (causing the Fourier series to converge very slowly).
_	According to a study by the Human Rights Watch, "the human rights standard for workplace safety and health centers on the principle that workers have a right to work in an environment reasonably free from predictable, preventable, serious risks."
_	Besides the great trilogy, the only complete work preserved is the treatise "Who is the Rich Man that Shall Be Saved?" based on Mark , and laying down the principle that not the possession of riches but their misuse is to be condemned.
_	Levinson states that the role of "Shruti" and "Smriti" in Hindu law is as a source of guidance, and its tradition cultivates the principle that "the facts and circumstances of any particular case determine what is good or bad".
_	Support is the principle that describes how well the underlying mucosa (oral tissues, including gums) keeps the denture from moving vertically towards the arch in question during chewing, and thus being excessively depressed and moving deeper into the arch.
_	Ultrasonography is based on the principle that sound can pass through human body tissues and is reflected by the tissue interfaces in the same way that light can reflect back on itself, from a mirror.
_	In the paper, Copernicus postulated the principle that "bad money drives out good", which later came to be referred to as Gresham's Law after a later describer, Sir Thomas Gresham.
_	Set up within the political context of decentralization, the FRACs were created on the principle that financing would be shared between the state and the regional councils.
_	Marshall, for a unanimous Court, reaffirmed the principle that (at least as far as European property owners—who gained U.S. citizenship—were concerned) the transfer of sovereignty—in Florida, from Spain to the United States—did not disturb private property rights.
_	Golsen v. Commissioner of Internal Revenue, 54 T.C. 742 (1970), "aff'd on other grounds", 445 F.2d 985 (10th Cir. 1971), "cert. denied", 404 U.S. 940 (1971), is a case in which the United States Tax Court stated the principle that where the court of appeals to which an appeal would be made in a given case has already established a rule of precedent for a legal issue to be decided by the Tax Court, the Tax Court will follow the decision of that court of appeals.
_	Passages operates on the principle that people become addicted to drugs and alcohol due to underlying and unresolved problems in their lives.
_	It was formed on the principle that lack of knowledge and ignorance is the cause of human problems.
_	It is the principle that "whatever succeeds for the finite, also succeeds for the infinite".
_	The group was founded in 2004, facilitated by e-learning developer Vinciworks, under the principle that there is no competitive advantage in compliance.
_	That it is expedient that such a system should be predicated upon the principle that the evil of slavery is a national one and that the people and the States of this Union ought mutually to participate in the duties and burdens of removing it Therefore,
_	The "Oxford English Dictionary" defines subsidiarity as "the principle that a central authority should have a subsidiary function, performing only those tasks which cannot be performed at a more local level".
_	MAG is based on the principle that cities, towns, counties, and Native American Communities should exercise the basic initiative and leadership and should have the primary responsibility for addressing those local problems and needs which require action on an area-wide or regional basis.
_	The Equality Act 2010 embodies the principle that people should treat one another according to the content of their character, and not another irrelevant status, to foster social inclusion.
_	Modern analysts use computers, but this description illustrates the principle that the computer algorithms implement.
_	In Australia, geoSmart is a geodemographic segmentation system based on the principle that people with similar demographic profiles and lifestyles tend to live near each other.
_	Tigerscheme was founded in 2007 on the principle that a commercial certification scheme run on independent lines would give buyers of security testing services confidence that they were hiring a recognised and reputable company.
_	"Here he lays down, in no uncertain language, the principle that the first and elemental concern of every government is economic" (Beard 1913, p. 156).
_	Chalmers found himself at the head of the party in the Church of Scotland which stood for "non-intrusionism": the principle that no minister should be intruded into any parish contrary to the will of the congregation.
_	Hence, the discounted present value of a payment corrects for inflation and the principle that money available today is worth more than money not accessible for 50 years (or some future time).
_	This, he argued, entailed the principle that no employee would be sacked without good cause.
_	Among magicians, Canasta is recognised for inventing the principle that eschewed perfection, believing that making an occasional error made his other effects stronger and more entertaining, - an approach later followed by comedy magician, Tommy Cooper.
_	He led his life on the principle that he was placed upon this earth to lead others through the same doors to opportunity that he had opened for himself.
_	The activity of the Norwegian Helsinki Committee is founded on the principle that the documentation of human rights violations and the presence of a strong civil society is of vital importance in order for states to protect human rights within their borders, as well as abroad.
_	This is based on the principle that, through optimization, the sparsity of a signal can be exploited to recover it from far fewer samples than required by the Shannon-Nyquist sampling theorem.
_	This approach is guided by the principle that to take a leadership role in the development of their communities and countries, individuals require opportunities and tools: the knowledge to participate in civic and economic life, a voice in public decisions that affect their wellbeing, and a means of making a meaningful living (enterprise).
_	In Mormonism, continuous revelation is the principle that God or his divine agents still continue to communicate to mankind.
_	The "ectoparasite" explanation of modern human nakedness is based on the principle that a hairless primate would harbor fewer parasites.
_	Algorithmic transparency is the principle that the factors that influence the decisions made by algorithms should be visible, or transparent, to the people who use, regulate, and are impacted by systems that employ those algorithms.
_	Independence of the judiciary is the principle that the judiciary should be separated from legislative and executive power, and shielded from inappropriate pressure from these branches of government, and from private or partisan interests.
_	Because of the principle that all powers have legal limits, the Attorney-General's exercise of prosecutorial discretion and the power to pardon or grant clemency to convicted persons exercised by the President on the Cabinet's advice are both justiciable in exceptional cases, for instance, where the powers have been exercised unconstitutionally or in bad faith.
_	In 1918, while a deputy chief of the Cheka in Ukraine, he established the principle that sentences were to be determined not by guilt or innocence but by social class.
_	Network neutrality is the principle that all Internet traffic should be treated equally.
_	The absence of a voluntary offer refers to the principle that all work relations should be founded on the mutual consent of the contracting parties.
_	Originally designed by Klaus Jensen in 2004, the concept was founded on the principle that a conical body allows the foam to accumulate more steadily through a gently sloping transition.
_	The case was remanded to District Court where it was decided in the defendants' favor, due to the principle that as agents of the state, the defendants were covered by a qualified immunity unless they knowingly acted illegally.
_	""... the Minister of Defence laid down the principle that we were to put the cost of drill halls down to bedrock, there being so many required; and those drill halls are made of wood and iron and are found good enough...""
_	Functionalism, in architecture, is the principle that architects should design a building based on the purpose of that building.
_	Donaldson, Lufkin and Jenrette founded the firm on the principle that no one else on Wall Street was doing high quality independent corporate research.
_	Delphi is based on the principle that forecasts (or decisions) from a structured group of individuals are more accurate than those from unstructured groups.
_	Slot limits are based on the principle that bass populations exhibit different habitat requirements during different phases of their life histories.
_	The UDHR included both economic, social and cultural rights and civil and political rights because it was based on the principle that the different rights could only successfully exist in combination:
_	The study researched the principle that chemoattractive molecules may play an important role in neuroblast migration in the RMS.
_	Ch 534 is an English trusts law case, concerning the principle that non-charitable trusts must be for beneficiaries and not abstract purposes.
_	In the process, the principle that the banknote was merely a substitute for the real commodity money (gold and silver) was gradually abandoned.
_	Together with manager Michael Hausman they formed United Musicians, an independent music collective founded on "the principle that every artist should be able to retain copyright ownership of the work he or she has created and that this ownership is the basis for artistic strength and true independence."
_	Again it was established that the principle that religion and philosophy, faith and knowledge, may be diametrically opposed and yet coexist for the same thinker.
_	The second was the delay in ratification; the principle that Congress is not bound by agreements reached on behalf of the US by its official representatives is something almost unique to the US, other examples including the rejection of Woodrow Wilson's League of Nations agreement in 1919.
_	In keeping with the principle that no one man should hold the full power of the Roman state, it was possible to appeal the decisions of one consul to the other.
_	Homos has come all the way to the United States to experience first-hand everyday life in the country which prides itself to represent democracy and equality, to see for himself how the principle that "all men are created equal" is being practiced.
_	However, this only applies where the land has not materially changed in character, and does not withstand the principle that councils may not dispose of land "for a consideration less than the best that can be obtained" under the Local Government Act 1972, section 123.
_	In addition, had the court allowed for an inference to be made from silence, suspicions would then inherently supersede and contradict the principle that defendants are innocent until proven guilty.
_	Drive theory is based on the principle that organisms are born with certain psychological needs and that a negative state of tension is created when these needs are not satisfied.
_	In "Leahy v Attorney-General for New South Wales", Lord Simonds set the principle that:
_	It is dedicated to the principle that the Jewish people as a viable and vibrant entity is dependent upon the study and knowledge of Torah and Talmud.
_	The EC Treaty lays down the principle that the self-employed (whether working in commercial, industrial or craft occupations
_	Starting with the reforms of Maria Theresa and Joseph II, Austrian constitutional thinking gradually developed the principle that general court system and administration should not interfere with each other.
_	He declared that such bills violated the principle that the federal government should not be involved in local economic affairs.
_	Their basis is founded on the constitutional right to procedural due process—the principle that the government may not deprive individuals of a liberty interest without some sort of fair procedure, such as the opportunity for a hearing before a neutral decision maker.
_	Placing the religious youth in psychiatric hospitals was based on the principle that any person who had gone through the atheistic education from kindergarten to university and yet remained religious (or even worse, if he converted), could be considered to have a kind of psychological disorder.
_	S operates on the principle that interrogations are directed to a specific aircraft using that aircraft's unique address.
_	The Conservative Opposition supported Balls' right to dismiss her "because ministers want to uphold the principle that they – and not the courts, through judicial review – should be responsible for their decisions".
_	As his United States District Court colleague Robert Gettleman noted, "Long before pro bono representation was recognized as important by all segments of the bar, Milton Shadur lived his professional life as a lawyer faithful to the principle that one of the obligations of membership in the bar is the obligation to render uncompensated legal services to those unable to afford them."
_	They have forced Jake to "induce head pain to engage the enemy" by making him give his money away under the principle that "nothing hurts more than humiliation and a little money loss".
_	Thenceforth, American revolutionaries generally agreed and were committed to the principle that governments were legitimate only if they rested on popular sovereignty – that is, the sovereignty of the people.
_	In "U.S. News and World Report", he explained why he decided against forming an exploratory committee like many of his Democratic rivals, on the principle that he had "to get to work."
_	A solution to this problem embraced by modernists and usually ignored by Islamists, is the inclusion of the principle that Islamic law must serve the general common good or maslaha.
_	This idea is not new: C. I. Lewis was led to invent modal logic, and specifically strict implication, on the grounds that classical logic grants paradoxes of material implication such as the principle that a falsehood implies any proposition.
_	"The Constitution does not allow the judicature to concede the principle that the Parliament can conclusively "recite itself" into power."
_	What remained for the apologists of the regime to defend it from the Orangist attacks was the claim that it promoted "freedom" in the sense of the "True Freedom" of the De Witt regime from the previous stadtholderless regime, with all that comprised: religious and intellectual toleration, and the principle that power is more responsibly wielded, and exercised in the public interest, if it is dispersed, with the dynastic element, embodied in the stadtholderate, removed.
_	Paleostress inversion refers to the determination of paleostress history from evidence found in rocks, based on the principle that past tectonic stress should have left traces in the rocks.
_	Kemalist nationalism believes in the principle that the Turkish state is an indivisible whole comprising its territory and people, which is defined as the "unity of the state".
_	In "Coffin v. United States" it is stated “the principle that there is a presumption of innocence in favor of the accused is the undoubted law, axiomatic and elementary, and its enforcement lies at the foundation of the administration of our criminal law”.
_	The case is considered a landmark in cases concerning Article 2, particularly in upholding the principle that Article 2, paragraph 2, defines circumstances in which it is permissible to use force which may result in a person's death as an unintended consequence, rather than circumstances in which it is permissible to intentionally deprive a person of their life.
_	This victory was celebrated by many of the other small parties – regardless of political differences – on the principle that it was a victory for the people's right to democratic choice.
_	Health equity falls into two major categories: horizontal equity, the equal treatment of individuals or groups in the same circumstances; and vertical equity, the principle that individuals who are unequal should be treated differently according to their level of need.
_	In the meantime the Library used a so-called “fixed” location system, introduced by Ten Brook, organizing shelves and the catalog according to the principle that each book should have a specific fixed place.
_	High Court jurisdiction is founded on the doctrine of effectiveness, which refers to the principle that a claimant must sue out of the court which will be most effective in giving a judgment: that is, the court which is best positioned to enforce the judgment.
_	This reflects the principle that people with disability or varied capacity have an equal right to have their decisions respected.
_	It was formed on the principle that war and fighting are the causes of human problems.
_	The Devaraja cult developed the belief of worshiping Shiva and the principle that the king was an avatar of Shiva.
_	Harrington writes that Matthew presents the six antitheses as examples of the principle that Jesus came not to abolish but to fulfill the Law and the Prophets.
_	The Supreme Court, in an opinion by Justice Brennan, laid down a rule that it will infer a private right of action for monetary damages where no other federal remedy is provided for the vindication of a constitutional right, based on the principle that for every wrong, there is a remedy.
_	On April 25, 1333, Janisław crowned Casimir III of Poland, son and successor of Władysław I. In Warsaw (1339), the new lawsuit granted Poland Gdańsk against the Teutonic Knights, stating the principle that the King of Poland must rule Gdańsk on the grounds it had previously been Polish.
_	In his own mind, he died not because of the denial of the doctrines on purgatory and transubstantiation but "for the principle that a particular doctrine on either point was not a necessary part of a Christian's faith".
_	However, the precedent did establish the principle that women could hold any political office in Canada.
_	Hirsch Ballin could then partially execute the motion of the House of Representatives of the Netherlands|House of Representatives for a temporary stop in expulsion, and the VVD would be allowed to voice its opposition to this decision, breaking the principle that cabinets speak with one voice.
_	A team must include exactly 5 people, and only finishes the race if all members finish together, on the principle that one does not leave teammates behind.
_	Basing on the principle that the energy required for the melting process is induced directly into the charge by electromagnetic coils, ASEA managed to create a new technology that is fundamentally more efficient and precise.
_	This system is based on the principle that bulk high-temperature superconductors can be levitated stably above or below a permanent magnet.
_	The latter is vital on the principle that truly important things cannot be said.
_	The company then created a site named searchneutrality.org to share its experiences as a result of the penalty as well as making the case for what the company refers to as search neutrality – which Foundem defines as “the principle that search engines should be open and transparent about their editorial policies, or, better still, should have no editorial policies other than that their results be comprehensive, impartial, and based solely on relevance.”
_	She only spends three days and two nights in every town, without exception, on the principle that three days is enough time to learn almost everything important about a place, while leaving time to explore new lands.
_	Delegation of the position of commander-in-chief is an exception to the principle that the president cannot delegate functions to others.
_	By performing a carefully-calculated provocation, the opponent is to be shown that violent confrontation remains an option, and there will be no backing off on the principle that the show of force is to defend.
_	The new law swept away a swathe of earlier statutes, stating at the outset the principle that "Printing and publication are free".
_	Muslim jurists allow abortion in this context based on the principle that what is considered the greater evilthe woman's deathshould be warded off by accepting the lesser evil of abortion.
_	According to M.T. Usmani, "some requirements of Shari‘ah are often overlooked" in transactions of ijarah in the real world, as when an unforeseeable circumstance leads to the destruction of the asset but the lessee is required to keep paying the rent in violation of the principle that the lessor assumes the liability for his ownership and offers any usufruct to the lessee.
_	Grameen Bank is founded on the principle that loans are better than charity to interrupt poverty: they offer people the opportunity to take initiatives in business or agriculture, which provide earnings and enable them to pay off the debt.
_	Miyagi teaches Daniel important life lessons such as the importance of personal balance, reflected in the principle that martial arts training is as much about training the spirit as the body.
_	This can be contrasted with common law systems; the intellectual framework of which comes from judge-made decisional law, and gives precedential authority to prior court decisions, on the principle that it is unfair to treat similar facts differently on different occasions (doctrine of judicial precedent, or "stare decisis").
_	Informed consent is the principle that the volunteers in the experiment should fully understand the procedure that is going to take place, be aware of all the risks involved, and give their consent to taking part in the experiment beforehand.
_	Many of what have now become standard features of formal consensus process—the principle that the facilitator should never act as an interested party in the debate, for example, or the idea of the “block”—were first disseminated by MNS trainings in Philadelphia and Boston."
_	The architectural feature lighting is based on the principle that the tower should not be "lit up" but "radiate a glow" at night.
_	The Association supports the principle that "drug courts are designed to reduce drug use, reduce crime, repair families, hold addicts accountable and restore them to meaningful roles in society."
_	This is based on the principle that the long term average of the field strength at a typical listening location must be 100mA/m, +- 3 dB.
_	In its verdict in 1773 the Court of Arches refused to deprive Dr Bowles of his living, but did lay down the principle that clergy should be examined and found proficient in Welsh in order to be considered for Welsh-speaking parishes.
_	Originally, the focus was on achieving peace and ending violence, within the context of the ongoing peace talks that Pastrana's government was then holding with the FARC guerrillas, following the principle that the country's violence had "deep roots in the economic exclusion and...inequality and poverty".
_	He used these remedies almost exclusively in the last 10 years, acting on the principle that a treatment would work the fastest if the "complex diseases" present in most patients were countered with a "complex remedy."
_	Here, Lord Denning stated the principle that if an individual forms an intention to commit a crime, and then intoxicates himself, the mens rea of his actions is not diminished to basic intent:
_	This involved crackdowns on relatively minor offenses such as graffiti, turnstile jumping, and aggressive "squeegeemen," on the principle that this would send a message that order would be maintained and that the city would be "cleaned up."
_	The Communists in inviting him back were acting on the principle that "any enemy of my enemy is a friend of mine."
_	There are certain exceptions to the principle that a patented invention cannot legally be exploited without the authorization of the patent owner.
_	This theory is not relativistic because the equation of motion refers to coordinate time rather than proper time, and because, should the matter in some isolated object suddenly be redistributed by an explosion, the field equation requires that the potential everywhere in "space" must be "updated" "instantaneously", which violates the principle that any "news" which has a physical effect (in this case, an effect on test particle motion far from the source of the field) cannot be transmitted faster than the speed of light.
_	Sir Kenneth Keith describes the use of these powers as based on the principle that "The Queen reigns, but the government rules, so long as it has the support of the House of Representatives".
_	The "Buckhurst Peerage Case" established the principle that once a peer inherits the peerage, he is forever "ennobled in blood" and cannot be deprived of it (except by Act of Parliament).
_	The fair solution in the circumstances may be arrived at by applying the principle that equity regards that as done that ought to be done.
_	By ratifying the Convention, countries commit themselves to the principle that children have fundamental rights as persons and that state authorities have obligations to provide for those rights.
_	The first generation of cars worked on the principle that, when the lane changing switch was flicked, the motor of the car would reverse direction, sending the power to only one of the rear wheels.
_	Most significant in the "speech in public park" cases was the principle that if the licensing power had been made an "instrument of arbitrary suppression of free expression of views" it would violate the First Amendment.
_	The "Da'as Torah" concept is the principle that guides the Haredi political parties in Israel, such as the Ashkenazi Agudat Israel (working under the tutelage of the present Gerrer Rebbe, Rabbi Yaakov Aryeh Alter) and Degel HaTorah, both individually and during their alliance together as United Torah Judaism, and the Sephardi Shas party (guided mainly by Rabbi Ovadia Yosef).
_	Rational egoism (also called rational selfishness) is the principle that an action is rational if and only if it maximizes one's self-interest.
_	This case was dismissed but the principle that Convention members could be tried by the Tribunal was an important one, and ultimately led to the Girondin leaders being tried and executed in October 1793.
_	Its working is based upon the principle that changes in the bank rate results in changed interest rate in the market.
_	This leads to the concept of "duality" in projective geometry, the principle that the roles of points and lines can be interchanged in a theorem in projective geometry and the result will also be a theorem.
_	The Carlisle principle is a term coined by Prime Minister David Cameron on 20 April 2015 in the run-up to the May 2015 United Kingdom general election, 2015 as a tag for the principle that checks and balances are required to ensure that devolution to Scotland has no adverse effects on other parts of the United Kingdom.
_	Stability is the principle that describes how well the denture base is prevented from moving in a horizontal plane, and thus sliding from side to side or front to back.
_	The institute also adheres to the principle that research findings should be shared with other scientific communities through their publication in respectable peer-reviewed journals and books.
_	They stand on the principle that art is integral to living a richer, fuller, more purposeful life.
_	Equity proceeds in the principle that a right or liability should as far as possible, be equalized among all interested.
_	In 1869, he went so far as to enforce the principle that alien husbands leave Gibraltar upon their marriage to Gibraltarian women.
_	In later opinions, the Supreme Court departed from this line of reasoning where the validity of a statute was in question, adopting the principle that a legislature could properly declare that some forms of speech posed a clear and present danger, regardless of the circumstances in which they were uttered.
_	Key among these are the complete prohibition of the commercial exploitation of underwater cultural heritage and the principle that "in situ" preservation should always be considered as a first option.
_	Device neutrality is the principle that in order to ensure freedom of choice and freedom of communication for users of network-connected devices, it is not sufficient that network operators do not interfere with their choices and activities; users must be free to use applications of their choice and hence remove the applications they do not want.
_	In 1895 the Holy See excluded the inducing of non-viable premature birth and in 1889 established the principle that any direct killing of either fetus or mother is wrong; in 1902 it ruled out the direct removal of an ectopic embryo to save the mother's life, but did not forbid the removal of the infected fallopian tube, thus causing an indirect abortion.(see below).
_	It, like all but one of its successors, enshrined the principle that the prince reigned, but did not rule.
_	The use of citizenship by non-Brazilian nationals (in this case, Portuguese) is a rare exception to the principle that nationality is a "sine qua non" for citizenship, granted to the Portuguese – if with reciprocal treatment for the Brazilians in Portugal – due to the historic relationship between the two countries.
_	Unlike a catenary arch, the parabolic arch employs the principle that when weight is uniformly applied above, the internal compression (see line of thrust) resulting from that weight will follow a parabolic curve.
_	The Knights of Labor and Gould's Union Pacific had reached an agreement that included the principle that "no man should be discharged without due notice and investigation."
_	At this time the ECJ had just delivered judgment in "Francovich" (), which established the principle that "a State must be liable for loss and damage caused to individuals as a result of breaches of Community law".
_	Originalists such as Justice Antonin Scalia argue that ""Stare decisis" is not usually a doctrine used in civil law systems, because it violates the principle that only the legislature may make law."
_	His revisions are "founded on the principle that rules of usage and style cannot be drawn out of thin air, nor constructed a priori according to logic; they must depend on the actual practice of those who are generally acknowledged to be good writers".
_	That decision established the principle that customers could connect any lawful device to the telephone network, even to offer a competing service.
_	The works are manifestations of the most conspicuous cycles of all forms of existence: the principle that sees them fall apart, reconstitute themselves, and then fall apart again.
_	The PCFF operates under the principle that a process of reconciliation is a prerequisite for achieving a sustained peace.
_	The Seventh Circuit affirmed the principle that an applicant may be granted reopening by demonstrating changed circumstances even if there was a prior adverse credibility finding.
_	A group contribution method uses the principle that some simple aspects of the structures of chemical components are always the same in many different molecules.
_	The question whether any official information is to be made available, where that question arises under this Act, shall be determined, except where this Act otherwise expressly requires, in accordance with the purposes of this Act and the principle that the information shall be made available unless there is good reason for withholding it.
_	There are exceptions to the principle that a search warrant is required.
_	On 24 February 1898, the government adopted the principle that all the main routes in the country should be established as national railways.
_	Transcendentalism has the principle that the answer to Man's cause is an acceptance of the final liberation – a quality that the Biblical religion imposed, and a quality that Hinduism attests as true, ultimately pleasurable and most importantly, to be thought out as a thinking individual- a quality that most appealed Emerson and his decision in giving up his institution of Unitarianism.
_	Guided by the principle that interdisciplinarity “is a defining characteristic of contemporary art practice” and “a necessary prerequisite for those artists who will shape the future of creative practice”, the artists who work in the Interdisciplinary Arts department investigate new terrain.
_	It was founded on the principle that it will use only indigenous personnel, methods and money for its work.
_	It stands for the principle that when the board is incapable of taking action, power to conduct the company's affairs will revert to the general meeting.
_	Priestley strongly suggested that there is no mind-body duality, and put forth a materialist philosophy in these works; that is, one founded on the principle that everything in the universe is made of matter that we can perceive.
_	They argued that even if they had been negligent it would be contrary to public policy to let the company sue them, because that would involve breach of the principle that a claimant cannot come to court and make a plea whilst relying on his own illegal behaviour ("ex turpi causa non oritur actio").
_	As well as supporting the principle that women should be ordained to the ministry, it argued that the Bible had to be understood in the context of the times in which it was written.
_	The Moon-Blink detector has been designed based on the principle that the observer will be immediately drawn to any movement taking place on parts of a large static images.
_	This analysis is enabled by the principle that evaporation from small pores will only occur after 2-propanol in larger pores has completely evaporated.
_	They are based rather on the principle that 'distinctions between citizens solely because of their ancestry are by their very nature odious to a free people whose institutions are founded upon the doctrine of equality,' "Hirabayashi v. United States", 320 U.S. 81 (1943).
_	The primary basis for the educator-distinction is based on the concept of in loco parentis, the principle that the school functions as parents over the students, thus allowing broader discretion in limiting student speech and expression.
_	These problems were resolved eventually only on appeal to the Privy Council in Britain, "which laid down the principle that land donated to a church could not subsequently be sold by the donor" (Cameron).
_	This treaty lays down the principle that the two countries must gear their language policy to each other, among other things, for a common system of spelling.
_	The case of "In Re Tanaka" established the principle that a patentee can add narrow dependent claims to an issued patent through the reissue process, because a patent with narrower dependent claims is less subject to invalidation when litigated.
_	Early in 1908 Partridge convinced the SGGA to endorse the principle that inland grain elevators should be owned by the province and terminal elevators by the Dominion of Canada.
_	The inventors had discovered the principle that hot, but congealed, lead under pressure would re-unite as an unbroken solid material, which permitted manufacture of a superior lead pipe.
_	On the principle that butchers seemed to suffer less from tuberculosis than others, he kept cows in a byre alongside the building and encouraged them to breathe on his patients.
_	His reputation is that of a great lawyer who in times of doubt and danger asserted the principle that the head of state is subject to law, and that the traditional practice of public officers, or the expressed voice of the nation in parliament, and not the will of the monarch or any part of the legislature, must guide the tribunals of the country.
_	Influenced by the time period of 1946–1964, the Dual Presidency Theory is based on the principle that there are two versions of the American President: one who is concerned with domestic policy and one concerned with foreign policy.
_	A tactile transducer or "bass shaker" is a device which is made on the principle that low bass frequencies can be felt as well as heard.
_	The Trusteeship Council was not assigned responsibility for colonial territories outside the trusteeship system, although the Charter did establish the principle that member states were to administer such territories in conformity with the best interests of their inhabitants.
_	Hirsh Balin could then partially execute the House of Representatives motion calling for a temporary halt to expulsions, while the VVD could voice its opposition to this decision, breaking the principle that cabinets speak with one voice.
_	The court also held that "the principle that the constitutional guarantees of free speech and free press do not permit a State to forbid or proscribe advocacy of the use of force or of law violation except where such advocacy is directed to inciting or producing imminent lawless action and is likely to produce such action."
_	This reflects the principle that he has been a cardinal from the earlier date and that membership in the College of Cardinals depends on the decision of the pope, not any ceremony or ritual.
_	The system is based on the principle that a water insoluble polymer, dissolved in a biocompatible solvent, will participate upon contact with physiological fluids.
_	The Transport Act 1968 created the National Bus Company (NBC), and introduced the principle that rural bus services could be subsidised by councils.
_	As the dominant politician in Aylesbury, he was partly responsible for the landmark constitutional case of "Ashby v White", which established the principle that "for every wrong there is a remedy".
_	Although the court rejected the argument, it is noteworthy that nowhere in its judgment did it call into question the principle that rules of common law may be declared null and void on the ground of vagueness.
_	"Sat—being, existence; substance; "pure existence, eternal, infinite, indefinable, not affected by the succession of Time, not involved in the extension of Space, beyond form, quantity, quality", the first term of saccidananda and the principle that is the basis of satyaloka; "the spiritual substance of being" which is cast "into all manner of forms and movements"; existence as "the stuff of its own becoming", which on every plane is "shaped into the substance with which Force has to deal" and "has formed itself here, fundamentally, as Matter; it has been objectivised, made sensible and concrete to its own self-experiencing conscious-force in the form of self-dividing material substance" short for sat brahman."
_	The Unemployment Insurance Act 1927 returned to the principle that workers had to contribute to insurance schemes in order to be a part of them.
_	Upper- and lower-body special exercises are rotated frequently (at least every three weeks) on the principle that training the same special exercise for too long will be counterproductive.
_	The cryopump operates on the principle that gases can be condensed and held at extremely low vapor pressures, achieving high speeds and throughputs.
_	"Numerus clausus" is also used in law, property law in particular, as the principle that the system of estates allows only a limited number of property rights available in a legal system.
_	With Wilson's 1918 proclamation of the Fourteen Points, the fifth reading: "A free, open-minded, and absolutely impartial adjustment of all colonial claims, based upon a strict observance of the principle that in determining all such questions of sovereignty the interests of the populations concerned must have equal weight with the equitable claims of the government whose title is to be determined", some Algerian intellectuals—dubbed "oulémas"—began to nurture the desire for independence or, at least, autonomy and self-rule.
_	Protection of the right to own and enjoy property is found in the offence of theft, by intellectual property laws and by the principle that there can be no taxation except that which is authorised by Parliament.
_	In Article 25(2), Zia introduced the principle that ""the state shall endeavour to consolidate, preserve and strengthen fraternal relations among Muslim countries based on Islamic solidarity.""
_	Therefore, although Hay let Bowles stay in post, the case established the principle that clergy being considered for Welsh-speaking parishes should be examined in their knowledge of Welsh and only those proficient in the language should be inducted to them.
_	In its verdict in 1773 the Court of Arches refused to deprive Dr Bowles of his living, but did lay down the principle that clergy should be examined and found proficient in Welsh in order to be considered for Welsh-speaking parishes.
_	Duties are divided with reference to the principle that every man make his own the entire moral problem and act at the same time in an existing moral society.
_	Probability summation comes from the principle that there is a greater chance of detecting a visual stimulus with two eyes than with one eye.
_	If this happens when there are two whisters, then the penalty is distributed fairly among them according to the principle that each whister is only responsible for his or her own undertricks with respect to half the required number of tricks.
_	In management, Joy's law is the principle that "no matter who you are, most of the smartest people work for someone else,” attributed to Sun Microsystems co-founder Bill Joy.
_	In such cases, there are strong policy considerations supporting the principle that a trial procedure can never be considered fair if a person is kept in ignorance of the case against him or her.
_	A-i-A helped solidify the principle that public art in the US should be truly owned by the public.
_	Freedom of the press or freedom of the media is the principle that communication and expression through various media, including printed and electronic media, especially published materials, should be considered a right to be exercised freely.
_	The dissolution of the Springfield Presbytery was in part a symbolic act, based on the principle that gave priority to individual autonomy for local congregations.
_	On the other hand, the research spanning over two decades since 1980s has also falsified the principle that there is a coevolved natural enemy of a host weed which can manage weed through varied formulation and thus advocated for more research to culturally and genetically intensify the bioherbicidal organisms.
_	Heard in the Appellate Division in Bloemfontein on March 15 and April 5, 1929, it established the principle that, where a third party has not taken reasonable steps to protect his property from the lessor's tacit hypothec, the courts will infer that the property was brought onto the leased premises with the implied knowledge and consent of that party.
_	In ancient China, flower-arranging developed into a highly refined art form, based on the principle that life is sacred, including the life of plants, therefore cut flowers were used sparingly in carefully planned arrangements.
_	Today, the principle that cantonal police officers are deployed and army units of the Confederation are to be deployed on a subsidiary basis in case of urgent need.
_	Asserting that women were individual persons, she stated that, "the custom of calling women Mrs. John This and Mrs. Tom That and colored men Sambo and Zip Coon, is founded on the principle that white men are lords of all."
_	The "locus classicus" for the principle that a company is a separate entity from its directors and shareholders is the landmark English case of "Salomon v Salomon".
_	He embraced the principle that those who have achieved great wealth should give back for the public good and create institutions dedicated to that purpose.
_	Albert is credited with introducing the principle that the British royal family should remain above politics.
_	In "FTC v. Activis, Inc.", the Supreme Court discussed the "Singer" case and said it exemplified the principle that patent settlement agreements should be evaluated by measuring the settlement’s anticompetitive effects against procompetitive antitrust policies rather than solely against patent law policy.
_	From this viewpoint it can even be compared to ancient norms of meat preservation, which relied on the principle that a good way to avoid meat spoilage is to keep the animal alive until just before consumption.
_	Retention is the principle that describes how well the denture is prevented from moving vertically in the opposite direction of insertion.
_	Although various earlier cases had also applied the principle that the relationship between banker and customer was one of debtor and creditor, this was the first time that the House of Lords, as the highest court in the land, had affirmed the position.
_	Specifically, contributory liability is based on the principle that parties should be held liable for their contribution to a harm, even when they did not directly cause the harm.
_	Unsupervised learning methods are based on the principle that topology depends on the maximum divergence of the amino acid distributions in different structural parts.
_	Capnographs usually work on the principle that absorbs infrared radiation.
_	In Europe there has been an attempt to define "best execution" within the Markets in Financial Instruments Directive (MiFID), which introduces the principle that all financial services firms carrying out transactions on their clients' behalf: "must take all reasonable steps to obtain the best possible result, taking into account price, costs, speed, likelihood of execution and settlement, size, nature or any other consideration relevant to the execution of the order."
_	Universal Acceptance (UA) is the principle that every top-level domain (TLD) should function within all applications regardless of script, number of characters, or how new it is.
_	Based in Santa Monica, CA, the social media-centric studio was founded by writer/director Philippe Caland “on the principle that everyone has a story to tell, and we passionately seek those innovative voices.”
_	Nevertheless, the federal courts have not departed from the principle that courts may only strike down statutes for unconstitutionality.
_	An independent school, it is based on theoretical foundations laid down by Rudolf Steiner and adheres to the principle that any child desiring a Steiner education (referred to as Waldorf education in North America) should receive one.
_	This prescriptive use of Constitutionalism is also concerned with the principles of constitutional design, which includes the principle that the field of public action be partitioned between delegated powers to the government and the rights of individuals, each of which is a restriction of the other, and that no powers be delegated that are beyond the competence of government.
_	Nor does it prevent the government from retrying the defendant after an appellate reversal other than for sufficiency, including habeas, or "thirteenth juror" appellate reversals notwithstanding sufficiency on the principle that jeopardy has not "terminated."
_	According to Vittorio Messori in his book "Opus Dei: Leadership and Vision in Today’s Catholic Church", Opus Dei’s manner of influencing society is based on the principle that "there is no way of improving humanity other than improving human beings—one by one, and profoundly."
_	Overlooking for a moment the complications posed by Gettier problems, philosophy has essentially continued to operate on the principle that knowledge is justified true belief.
_	Since the principle that the Governor should always act on the advice of his ministers was soon established, a Premier whose bills were rejected by the Council could simply advise the Governor to appoint more members until the opposition was "flooded": usually the threat of "flooding" was enough.
_	Other adventures are "Misery", "The Year of the Comet" (which he uses as an example of how a movie can become a failure at the script level), "Maverick" (which he uses as an example of the principle that the best scene sometimes needs to be cut), "The Ghost and the Darkness" (which he uses as an example of how ego can hinder a film's production and artistic integrity) and "Absolute Power" (which he uses as an example to illustrate why a movie does not have to be faithful to the book on which it is based).
_	Constitutionalism is "a complex of ideas, attitudes, and patterns of behavior elaborating the principle that the authority of government derives from and is limited by a body of fundamental law".
_	Ever since the invention of history, people have searched for "lessons" that might be drawn from its study, on the principle that to understand the past is potentially to control the future.
_	On the principle that we should not look at or listen to what we have no right to practise, and that polluted things, seen and touched, pollute ("De spectaculis", viii, xvii), he declared a Christian should abstain from the theater and the amphitheater.
_	The 2015 Act introduces for the first time the principle that a fine may also be sufficient for temporary juror disqualification.
_	A few decades later, with the neoliberal turn, such advice – 'Remember the reality of self-interest' – would be being seriously advocated in the self-help world: in bestsellers like "Swim with the Sharks", all 'kinds of seemingly benign guile are encouraged', on the principle that 'status displays matter: just don't be suckered by them yourself'.
_	The privilege of freedom from arrest applies to members of both Houses of Parliament, because of the principle that they must, whenever possible, be available to give advice to the Sovereign.
_	Venice was satisfied with reaffirming the principle that no citizen was superior to the normal processes of law.
_	Perhaps based on this practice, in which according to Vaksberg Stalin personally gave direction on the use of confessions and the use of the death penalty, Vyshinsky is cited for the principle that "confession of the accused is the queen of evidence".
_	"Schalkse Ruiters" worked from the principle that viewers shouldn't always believe everything they see on television to be real.
_	Most high-accuracy copying techniques use the principle that there will be only one type of possible interpretation for each reading of data, and only one possible way to write an interpretation of data.
_	This is based on the principle that if a non-human animal's responses to stimuli are similar to those of humans, it is likely to have had an analogous experience.
_	The case of "Ellis v. Dubowski" (1921) lays down the principle that there can be no delegation of authority to an absolute body from which no right of appeal exists.
_	Best Radio DJ, Kidd Squidd - "Dave Squires, a.k.a. Kidd Squidd, has been a stalwart of Tucson’s own KXCI-FM since moving here from Los Angeles in 1984 – and from that time on, he’s been committed to the principle that ours should be one pueblo under a groove."
_	The ruling, which became known as the "Kibbey Decision," established the principle that "water belongs to the land" and could not be used as "floating" property to be divided by decision of the canal company.
_	They applied to the Transvaal Provincial Division of the High Court to have the relevant provisions of the Child Care Act and the Guardianship Act declared unconstitutional on three grounds: that they unfairly discriminated against du Toit and de Vos on the prohibited grounds of sexual orientation and marital status, that they infringed on du Toit's right to dignity, and that they violated the principle that the best interests of the child are paramount in situations involving children.
_	Dragonfly, formerly known as the Canard Rotor/Wing Demonstrator, was a VTOL rotor wing experimental unmanned aerial vehicle that was developed by Boeing and DARPA to demonstrate the principle that a helicopter's rotor could be stopped in flight and act as a fixed wing, enabling it to transition between fixed-wing and rotary-wing flight.
_	Distances a and c between the viewer and the wall are greater than the b distance, so adopting the principle that when an object is a greater distance from the observer, it becomes smaller, the wall is reduced and thus appears distorted at the edges.
_	Under the Copyright Act of Japan, basically, rights of performers are established under the principle that performers should collect compensation for their performance in a lump sum when they first permit their performance to be utilized, and the allocation of profits obtained by utilizing their performance afterwards should be determined by the agreement that performers should enter into at that time.
_	A controversial idea was originated in 1961 when the League encouraged "incentive licensing", which sought reversion to the principle that higher levels of license privileges should require higher levels of demonstrated knowledge and CW skill but took away some amateur privileges until licensees requalified at higher levels; "incentives" are still in effect and only holders of the highest class of license (Amateur Extra) maintain all amateur privileges.
_	Elements of Titoism are characterized by policies and practices based on the principle that in each country the means of attaining ultimate communist goals must be dictated by the conditions of that particular country, rather than by a pattern set in another country.
_	As well, this is in line with the principle that intentional crimes are to be punished more severely than unintentional crimes.
_	Compositionality is the principle that states that the meaning of a complex expression depends on the meaning of its parts and on its mode of composition.
_	Turning to the monopolization claim, the Ninth Circuit concluded that there were material issues of fact concerning whether Kodak fell within one of the exceptions to the principle that a firm generally has no duty to deal with competitors.
_	The case of "Chng Suan Tze v. Minister for Home Affairs" (1988) is the leading authority in Singapore law for the principle that the function of a court in the review of discretionary power depends on whether a jurisdictional or precedent fact was involved.
_	In English law, heirs of the body is the principle that certain types of property pass to a descendant of the original holder, recipient or grantee according to a fixed order of kinship.
_	He also initiated a series of actions that sought to establish the principle that a person is entitled to see the information on which a search warrant that affects him is based.
_	The 70,000 Character petition was founded on the principle that the specific characteristics of Tibet should be taken into account.
_	After the atomic bomb was dropped on Hiroshima, Dalí took his work in a new direction based on the principle that the modern age had to be assimilated into art if art was to be truly contemporary.
_	However, by adhering to the principle that the majority case overrules the exception, Jewish tradition continues to regard such milk as kosher, since statistically it is true that most animals producing such milk are kosher; the same principle is not applied to the possibility of consuming meat from an animal which has not been checked for disease.
_	The formulas for compound option parity can be derived using the principle that two portfolios with identical payoffs should have the same price.
_	Theories with tuneable parameters are sometimes deprecated on the principle that, of two theories which both agree with observation, the more parsimonious is preferable.
_	"For years, Francophone Belgian elites defended the principle that there were no difference between French culture in Belgium and in France.
_	Strain gauge load cells work on the principle that the strain gauge (a planar resistor) deforms when the material of the load cells deforms appropriately.
_	At the same time it has re-established the principle that climate change should be tackled through international law, not national, voluntarism."
_	The non-profit Chicago Medical School originally operated on the principle that admission should be based on merit alone.
_	It is based on the principle that rather than studying highly abstract summaries of legal rules (the technique used in most countries), the best way to learn American law is to read the actual judicial opinions which become the law under the rule of "stare decisis" (due to its Anglo-American common law origin).
_	His varied work includes examples of plaster relief, tiles, stained glass, pottery, wallpaper and textile designs, in all of which he applied the principle that in purely decorative design "the artist works freest and best without direct reference to nature, and should have learned the forms he makes use of by heart."
_	Vedral believes in the principle that information is physical.
_	This case created the "entwinement test", the principle that a private organization could be connected in such a way with state organizations that the private organization itself exercises state power.
_	The Welsh movement, Cymuned, promote the principle that owners of holiday homes should pay double the standard rate of council tax, as they do not otherwise invest in the local community.
_	This technique works by superposing ("interfering") the signal waves from the different telescopes on the principle that waves that coincide with the same phase will add to each other while two waves that have opposite phases will cancel each other out.
_	Another of Smythies's commitments was to the principle that Africa be converted and ministered by African priests, and he made many improvements to the arrangements for their teaching at Kiungani, ordaining the first local African priests.
_	The Euclidean algorithm is based on the principle that the greatest common divisor of two numbers does not change if the larger number is replaced by its difference with the smaller number.
_	This is an extension of the principle that a finite string of random text has a lower and lower probability of "being" a particular string the longer it is (though all specific strings are equally unlikely).
_	According to UM's Web site, it is "founded on the principle that every artist should be able to retain copyright ownership of the work he or she has created and that this ownership is the basis for artistic strength and true independence."
_	Lord Diplock had established the principle that patents were to be read in a "purposive" manner.
_	In the 13th century, pangenesis was commonly accepted on the principle that semen was a refined version of food unused by the body, which eventually translated to 15th and 16th century widespread use of pangenetic principles in medical literature, especially in gynecology.
_	It is based on the principle that consent requires the ability to withhold consent in an election, just as they can by voting "No" on ballot questions.
_	Executive power in New Zealand is based on the principle that "The Queen reigns, but the government rules".
_	The letter "r" was avoided in Schleyer's original Volapük, on the principle that it would be difficult for Chinese speakers to pronounce, and in the adoption of foreign roots "r" was generally changed to "l".
_	Rather, it stood for the principle that "every humane society …
_	Chesterton's fence is the principle that reforms should not be made until the reasoning behind the existing state of affairs is understood (compare to the Precautionary principle).
_	In accordance with the principle that in a monosyllable the equivalent of a recessive accent is a circumflex, a circumflex is used on a long-vowel monosyllable:
_	The medieval theologian Thomas Aquinas cited this line when he explained how the principle that "God allows evils to happen in order to bring a greater good therefrom" underlies the causal relation between original sin and the Divine Redeemer's Incarnation, thus concluding that a higher state is not inhibited by sin.
_	The agent is the part of the principle that is connected to the medical devices.
_	Furthermore, such endorsements can be said to undermine the principle that a candidate for President should not be beholden to any political formation, which is reflected in the requirement for a candidate not to be a member of any political party.
_	He undertook fundamental studies of the fatigue properties of elastomers, and established the principle that fatigue cracks develop from pre-existing features of rubber's microstructure, in accordance with the expectations of Fracture Mechanics.
_	As Trotsky would later explain, "The Tsar's family was a victim of the principle that form the very axis of monarchy: dynastic inheritance", for which their deaths were a necessity.
_	"H(is) M(ajesty's) G(overnment) accepts the principle that P(alestine) should be reconstituted as the Nat(ional)
_	Most European countries, on the other hand, follow the principle that copyright protection is granted automatically upon creation of the work.
_	This poll produced data that showed that 'Nearly half (49%) of leave voters said the biggest single reason for wanting to leave the European Union was “the principle that decisions about the UK should be taken in the UK”.
_	The availability of direct application is qualified by the principle that the Bill of Rights should not be applied directly in a legal dispute unless it is necessary to do so.
_	It is based upon the principle that expectant mothers must be provided the utmost care and respect and Hubbard’s words:
_	Bao said today's PRC leaders should respect the principle that Hong Kong citizens rule themselves, or Deng Xiaoping's promises to Hong Kong would have been fake.
_	It acted on the principle that the titles of all private landed estates might be called in question, because at some time or other they must have belonged to the Crown, and the burden of proof of ownership lay with the actual owner of the property, not the Crown.
_	The current concept of development of biosimilar mAbs follows the principle that an extensive state of the art physicochemical, analytical and functional comparison of the molecules is complemented by comparative non-clinical and clinical data that establish equivalent efficacy and safety in a clinical "model" indication that is most sensitive to detect any minor differences (if these exist) between biosimilar and its reference mAb also at the clinical level.
_	Wimsey continues to pursue her romantically, but Harriet repeatedly declines marriage on the principle that gratitude is not a good basis for it.
_	Verner identified the principle that these instead become the voiced consonants *b, *d, *g, *gʷ if they were word-internal and immediately preceded by an unaccented vowel in PIE.
_	Both schools of thought relied upon the principle that "like is only known by like", and thus upon the notion that the eye was composed of some "internal fire" which interacted with the "external fire" of visible light and made vision possible.
_	Wedderburn was sued by Knight in a freedom suit, and lost his case, establishing the principle that Scots law would not uphold the institution of slavery either.
_	In addition to Utilitarian, Libertarian, and Egalitarian philosophies, there are also normative views that are based upon the principle that land has intrinsic value and positions coming out of an ecological or systems view.
_	One philosophy grounded in the principle that land has intrinsic value which is directly applicable to agriculture is Aldo Leopold's stewardship ethic or land ethic.
_	Meanwhile, a human supremacist organization called Cerberus believes that humans deserve a greater role in the galactic community and supports the principle that any methods of advancing humanity's ascension are entirely justified, including illegal experimentation and terrorist activities.
_	Another way to phrase the pigeonhole principle for finite sets is similar to the principle that finite sets are Dedekind finite:
_	However, comity remains valuable for examining the doctrine of recognition insofar as it underpins the principle that a domestic court cannot examine the substantive validity of the foreign court's action - as it cannot claim to hold more competence - nor does it pretend that it must enforce the foreign court's decision.
_	Addams used it to generate system-directed change, on the principle that to keep families safe, community and societal conditions had to be improved.
_	If a claimant does bring an action for dishonest assistance, or liability for receipt, "Tang Man Sit v Capacious Investments Ltd" affirmed the principle that the claimant may not be overcompensated by suing for the same thing twice.
_	Following the principle that an architect should be able build what he designs, Blow had begun practical building alongside stonemasons in North Yorkshire.
_	This provision featured in "Boddington v British Transport Police" (1998) where the House of Lords recognised the principle that a defendant in criminal proceedings, in this case fined £10 for smoking on a train in violation of a railway byelaw, could challenge the validity of the rule before a court, save where Parliament has indicated that such a challenge is not possible.
_	It is the principle that no person should be judged without a fair hearing in which each party is given the opportunity to respond to the evidence against them.
_	In particular, when the branching at each node is done on a finite subset of an arbitrary set not assumed to be countable, the form of König's lemma that says "Every infinite finitely branching tree has an infinite path" is equivalent to the principle that every countable set of finite sets has a choice function, that is to say, the axiom of countable choice for finite sets.
_	This fallacy operates on the principle that [the] squeaky wheel gets the grease.
_	It embodies the principle that continuous adaptation of the process to the work at hand is the normal state of affairs.
_	This contradicted a 19th-century precedent which allowed the use of Gaelic in court, resulting in a legal review which established the principle that Gaelic could be used in court only if the witness could not speak English.
_	Dr Pheby's research and practice is rooted in the principle that creativity is central to humanity and has the potential to affect real positive change in the world.
_	IPT is based on the principle that relationships and life events impact mood and that the reverse is also true.
_	Continental Paper Bag Co. v. Eastern Paper Bag Co., 210 U.S. 405 (1908), was a case in which the Supreme Court of the United States established the principle that patent holders have no obligation to use their patent.
_	This illustrates the principle that "splits can be lumped more easily than lumps can be split".
_	The frame problem can be thought of as the problem of formalizing the principle that, by default, "everything is presumed to remain in the state in which it is" (Leibniz, "An Introduction to a Secret Encyclopædia", "c". 1679).
_	Piracy is the broadest exception to the principle that a ship on the high seas is subject to the protection of, and jurisdiction of, its flag state.
_	The AGA cooker is a heat storage stove and cooker, which works on the principle that a heavy frame made of cast iron can absorb heat from a relatively low-intensity but continuously burning source, and the accumulated heat can then be used for cooking.
_	Non disclosure is the principle that no vulnerability information should be shared, or should only be shared under non-disclosure agreement (either contractually or informally).
_	Many residents of the village under the banner "Citizens for Fairness" successfully fought the motion on the principle that the majority of citizens, by ballot, should decide such a fundamental change.
_	It articulates the principle that primacy and conciliarity are interdependent and mutually necessary."
_	It is based simply on the principle that the killing of an innocent human child is incompatible with going in Communion with the body of Christ.
_	Hellin's Law is the principle that one in about 80 natural pregnancies ends in the birth of twins, triplets once in 80 births, and quadruplets once in 80 births.
_	The Javanese however, adhered to the principle that he should be more cautious and the Keris may solely be exercised during the time of need, thus cladding their Keris from behind.
_	job resource requirements prediction algorithms operate on the principle that jobs with similar characteristics have similar resource requirements.
_	Ethereum Classic came into existence when some members of the Ethereum community rejected the hard fork on the grounds of "immutability", the principle that the blockchain cannot be changed, and decided to keep using the unforked version of Ethereum.
_	This led him to formulate the principle that, in any list of numbers taken from an arbitrary set of data, more numbers will tend to begin with "1" than with any other digit.
_	Katha Pollitt, stating the principle that, "if the control the language, you control the debate", remarked that while the term looked "analytic", it was emotional and "intended to get us to think less and fear".
_	In early times, the "avis facultatif" maxim was: "The Commission proposes, and the Council disposes"; but now the vast majority of laws are now subject to the ordinary legislative procedure, which works on the principle that consent from both the Council and Parliament are required before a law may be adopted.
_	He sought to establish the principle that governors and judges must be salaried appointees.
_	In science and history, consilience (also convergence of evidence or concordance of evidence) refers to the principle that evidence from independent, unrelated sources can "converge" on strong conclusions.
_	"The Everlasting Yea" is Carlyle's name in the book for the spirit of faith in God in an express attitude of clear, resolute, steady, and uncompromising antagonism to the "Everlasting No", and the principle that there is no such thing as faith in God except in such antagonism against the spirit opposed to God.
_	Archimedes' principle does not consider the surface tension (capillarity) acting on the body, but this additional force modifies only the amount of fluid displaced and the spatial distribution of the displacement, so the principle that "Buoyancy = weight of displaced fluid" remains valid.
_	Much of the Church's detailed doctrines derive from the principle that "sexual pleasure is morally disordered when sought for itself, isolated from its procreative and unitive [between spouses] purposes".
_	In "Eli Lilly and Co. v. Apotex Inc.", the Supreme Court of Canada adopted the principle that sale of a patented article exhausts the patentee's right in that article.
_	Among the interesting parts of the law is Article 8 which establishes the principle that only a law passed by the NPC can be used to criminalize activity.
_	The ruling thus established the principle that the basic structure cannot be amended on the grounds that a power to amend is not a power to destroy.
_	Parallel computing is a form of computation in which many calculations are carried out simultaneously, operating on the principle that large problems can often be divided into smaller ones, which are then solved "in parallel".
_	In a statement of purpose published in 1906, the founders wrote, legal aid is based on the principle that justice is the right of all men, and aims to put the rich and poor on an actual equality before the law.
_	This is consistent with the principle that the courts are generally only concerned with the legality of decisions and not their merits.
_	It was formed on the principle that dishonesty and deception is the cause of human problems.
_	Using the principle that ontogeny recapitulates phylogeny, the researchers concluded that the original crocodilians had fully 4-chambered hearts and were therefore warm-blooded and that later crocodilians developed the bypass as they reverted to being cold-blooded aquatic ambush predators.
_	This includes unity and solidarity on the principle that work should serve to accomplish political goals, strengthen grassroots movements, build political consciousness, and lead the world on a path to social transformation.
_	While establishing the principle that Ireland could not block the publication of abortion information from foreign clinics or their agents, the Court found it was legal for Ireland the block information from third parties, so establishing a principle of freedom of abortion information but ultimately finding against the students due to their status as unconnected third parties and leaving them with their costs.
_	The USA creationist explanation for the Holocaust is that it had been driven in part by eugenics, or the principle that individuals with "undesirable" genetic characteristics should be removed from the gene pool.
_	The foundation’s approach to funding is based on the principle that community-based organizations are best poised to respond effectively to the HIV/AIDS crisis.
_	Engineered by Page and financed almost entirely from Rogers' personal resources, VGN lines were laid on the principle that picking the best route and buying the best equipment would save operating expenses.
_	The Cooper Union is committed to the principle that an education in the liberal arts provides the ethical, social and humanistic framework crucial to personal development and professional excellence; thus, all students in the first two years take a core curriculum of required courses in the humanities and social sciences.
_	Kirk took as one of the "canons" of conservatism the principle that "civilized society requires orders and classes".
_	The principles of the Honor Concept are as old as the Academy itself, revolving around the principle that an officer's word is his bond.
_	In the absence of legislation regulating unfair contract terms, and where a provision did not offend public policy or considerations of good faith, a careful construction of the contract itself should ensure the protection of the party whose rights had been limited, but also give effect to the principle that the other party should be able to protect herself or himself against liability insofar as it was legally permissible.
_	A molecular-weight size marker, also referred to as a protein ladder, DNA ladder, or RNA ladder, is a set of standards that are used to identify the approximate size of a molecule run on a gel during electrophoresis, using the principle that molecular weight is inversely proportional to migration rate through a gel matrix.
_	From 1662 the Colony of Virginia, followed by others, incorporated into law the principle that children took their mother's status, i.e., the principle of "partus sequitur ventrem".
_	The Bourdon pressure gauge uses the principle that a flattened tube tends to straighten or regain its circular form in cross-section when pressurized.
_	The Federal Circuit found it inappropriate to carve out a further exception to the principle that "anything under the sun made by man is patentable."
_	As First Sea Lord he assisted in establishing NATO and agreed the principle that the Supreme Allied Commander Atlantic (SACLANT) should be an American Admiral, in the face of fierce British opposition.
_	Instead, Unger's Reconstructive Left affirms "the principle that everyone should share, in some way and at some time, responsibility for taking care of other people."
_	As a solely graduate-level program, this is based on the principle that people need to learn primary subject matter well before they can learn how to teach it to others.
_	The "Second Manifesto" was a 1904 declaration made by Joseph F. Smith, the president of The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (LDS Church), in which Smith stated the church was no longer sanctioning marriages that violated the laws of the land and set down the principle that those entering into or solemnizing polygamous marriages would be excommunicated from the church.
_	On the principle that it would take two years after a final agreement to prepare the appropriate office space, full services were set up in Brussels in expectation of a report from the Committee of Experts looking into the matter of a final seat.
_	He was the cricketer who established in law the principle that income from a benefit match should not normally be taxable in a case ruled on by the High Court in 1927.
_	However, the principle that such transactions involving the dower could not be carried out by the husband without the wife's presence or written permission was not always respected.
_	Kirkpatrick pointed out that the Supreme Court, but not Judge Hand, properly followed the principle that the Supreme Court had explained in "United States v. American Livestock Comm'n Co.", which distinguished between joint refusals to participate in unlawful conduct and joint refusals to deal where "the wrong is completely independent of the dealings
_	The biography by RB Dann shows that Anthony Norris Groves may be rightly regarded as the "father of faith missions," "i.e.", the principle that a missionary, if called and sent by the Holy Spirit, should go to their mission in faith, believing that God will thus provide for all their needs—and without first raising funds from supporters.
_	GAIAS was founded on the principle that would become a first-rate institution for international students and researchers.
_	The minority of Lord Nicholls and Lord Millett argued strongly for the abandonment of "Cundy v Lindsay" and in favour of the principle that all mistakes for identity merely render a contract voidable; for instance, Lord Nicholls argued that the loss should be borne by the seller, "who takes the risks inherent in parting with his goods without receiving payment", rather than by the innocent third party.
_	In a 2007 "Nature" news feature, CHDI's then senior scientific advisor Allan Tobin stated, "Ninety-five per cent of science works on the principle that the best thing to do is to let good scientists follow their noses ...
_	Good library naming conventions are not rigorously observed on the principle that common operations should always be easy to write and code should always be easy to read.
_	The Instructional Method of Signs is a real educational method emphasised using gestures or hand signs, based on the principle that "the education of deaf mutes must teach them through the eye of what other people acquire through the ear."
_	Only cinemas worked on the principle that the premises had to be privately owned, and that customers had to sign a form which instantly made them members.
_	The British government flatly rejected the proposition, reiterating the principle that the main contribution of Argentina was its supplies and in order to guarantee them it was necessary to maintain neutrality.
_	His educational policy was guided by the principle that the church and education were inseparably connected and the funds to sustain them were administered by the same trustees.
_	Composition over inheritance (or composite reuse principle) in object-oriented programming (OOP) is the principle that classes should achieve polymorphic behavior and code reuse by their composition (by containing instances of other classes that implement the desired functionality) rather than inheritance from a base or parent class.
_	British ballet methods operate on the principle that establishing correct technique and strength slowly makes it much easier for the student to adapt to more difficult vocabulary and techniques later on.
_	The FAVT is a brief self-report assessment tool established on the principle that one's thought processes influence one's potential for violent behavior.
_	The Declaration of Paris confirmed these rules and added to them the principle that blockades, in order to be obligatory, must be effective.
_	Eventually the barons forced John to sign the Magna Carta, a practical solution to the political crisis he faced in 1215, which established for the first time the principle that everybody, including the king, was subject to the law.
_	It starts from the principle that every physical state is the symbol of a state of consciousness, and argues that feeling is not the effect but the efficient cause of motion.
_	However, as a satirist, we are beholden to the principle that every human being has the right to be parodied.
_	Similarly, a Midrash cited as an application of the principle that all miracles that God did for Israel, and the punishment of the wicked on their behalf, took place at night.
_	It is based on the principle that Ghost Nyquists are produced due to the inconsistencies between the odd and even echos of the MR images.
_	God by serving human persons is the principle that guides its action.
_	It is based upon the principle that a creditor cannot be compelled to accept a partial payment or a part performance of a contract.
_	Buddy diving is the more generally advocated procedural alternative, on the principle that in case of an emergency, a dive buddy can assist the diver in difficulty, but this is only valid if the buddy is close enough to help, notices the problem, and is competent and willing to assist.
_	The program is guided by the principle that the informed actions of pesticide users can potentially reduce pesticide risk more efficiently and to a greater extent than can be achieved through regulatory mandates.
_	The method is based on the principle that different aquatic invertebrates have different tolerances to pollutants.
_	In the first lecture, "The Uncertainty of Science" Feynman explains the nature of science, that it is a "method for finding things out", and that it is "based on the principle that observation is the judge of whether something is so or not".
_	The pendulum hardness test is based on the principle that the amplitude of the pendulum's oscillation will decrease more quickly when supported on a softer surface.
_	To establish the principle that the Camus family must have total control of the process from the grape to the glass, Jean-Baptiste bought his partners’ shares and created "Camus La Grande Marque".
_	"The norms of the Roman Missal admit the principle that in cases where Communion is administered under both kinds, 'the Blood of the Lord may be received either by drinking from the chalice directly, or by intinction, or by means of a tube or a spoon' (General Instruction of the Roman Missal, 245).
_	These laws established the principle that Old Northwest would be governed by a territorial government, under the aegis of Congress, until it reached a certain level of political and economic development.
_	For the Elementary Education Act 1870 he supported the principle that all provided schools should be secular or strictly unsectarian.
_	The court affirmed the principle that the U.S. Government cannot breach contracts with impunity.
_	Knowledge is explained by the principle that elements in the things outside us are perceived by the corresponding elements in ourselves.
_	More to the point is the principle that an advance by the shipper on account of the freight to be earned is, in the absence of any stipulation to the contrary, "an irrevocable payment at the risk of the shipper of the goods".
_	The inverse care law is the principle that the availability of good medical or social care tends to vary inversely with the need of the population served.
_	Merkel defines the rule of law as “the principle that the state is bound to uphold its laws effectively and to act according to clearly defined prerogatives.”
_	Harry calls Ken and orders him to kill Ray, on the principle that killing a child, even accidentally, is unforgivable.
_	In his reviews, Pearson established the principle that a subjective audio review is not a matter of taste, but that the "absolute sound" should be the standard in evaluating the qualities of components or recordings.
_	For Stanomir, the ideologist as Tismăneanu and Vasile show him is a man who replicates religious belief, guided by the principle that "outside the Party there can be no salvation" ("see Extra Ecclesiam nulla salus").
_	The cryotron works on the principle that magnetic fields destroy superconductivity.
_	A meeting of the PGA on the following Monday accepted the principle that the player could choose in such situations.
_	There were different types of succession based on agnatic primogeniture, all sharing the principle that inheritance is according to seniority of birth among siblings (compare to ultimogeniture) and seniority of lineage among the agnatic kin, firstly, among the sons of a monarch or head of family, with sons and their male-line issue inheriting before brothers and their issue.
_	Corpus delicti (Latin: "body of the crime"; plural: "corpora delicti") is a term from Western jurisprudence referring to the principle that a crime must be proved to have occurred before a person can be convicted of committing that crime.
_	It operates on the principle that most objects are derived from other, more general objects, and only differ in a few small aspects; while usually maintaining a list of pointers internally to other objects which the object differs from.
_	This power rested on the principle that the person of the plebeian tribune was sacrosanct.
_	Third, the principle that effects cannot precede causes can be invoked, by including on the right side of the regression only variables that precede in time the dependent variable; this principle is invoked, for example, in testing for Granger causality and in its multivariate analog, vector autoregression, both of which control for lagged values of the dependent variable while testing for causal effects of lagged independent variables.
_	The case was later cited as precedent for the principle that the government may provide paleontological evidence if a country of origin is obscured.
_	The court first noted the principle that a sovereign nation always has exclusive jurisdiction to prosecute crimes in its territory, unless it consents to prosecution by some other authority.
_	WeFarm is built around the principle that rural farming communities in developing countries have generations worth of knowledge to share, but lack the tools to do so.
_	It is based on the principle that investors would require a greater return on classes of assets that are more risky.
_	Among them is the principle that Ex-Im Bank does not compete with private sector lenders, but rather provides financing for transactions that would otherwise not occur because commercial lenders are either unable or unwilling to accept the political or commercial risk inherent in the deal.
_	The Treaty of Madrid (13 January 1750), finished the border between the Spanish possessions and southern Portuguese Brazil, had first enunciation the principle that new states, at the time of their creation shall have dominion over the lands that were settled as colonies.
_	In 1995, an appellate chamber in the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia stated that "there had undisputedly emerged a general consensus in the international community on the principle that the use of chemical weapons is also prohibited in internal armed conflicts."
_	The SBR idea is based on the principle that the psychoacoustic part of the human brain tends to analyse higher frequencies with less accuracy; thus harmonic phenomena associated with the spectral band replication process needs only be accurate in a perceptual sense and not technically or mathematically exact.
_	The school was run along radical lines inspired by Hill's friends Thomas Paine, Richard Price and Joseph Priestley; all teaching was on the principle that the teacher's role is to instill the desire to learn, not to impart facts, corporal punishment was abolished and alleged transgressions were tried by a court of pupils, while the school taught a radical (for the time) curriculum including foreign languages, science and engineering.
_	According to another theory, the right to exclude inhabitants was derived from the principle that "the estate of any inhabitant of a town is liable to be taken in execution on a judgment against the town".
_	By standing firm on the principle that government must be responsible and accountable with every taxpayer dollar Michigan's bond rating has significantly increased, ensuring the state is prepared in times of crisis.
_	The Convention had unanimously accepted the principle that representation in the House of Representatives would be in proportion to the relative state populations.
_	When earlier developmental stages have gone astray, however, then, on the principle that 'if you miss a stage, you can always go through it later,' some middle children 'come to school for another purpose...[not] to learn but to find a home from home...a stable emotional situation in which they can exercise their own emotional liability, a group of which they can gradually become a part.
_	Fortsmann took to heart the principle that Ruttenberg had defined when he said, "I have a reputation, it's all I have, and I don't want to lose that reputation."
_	The foundation for the principle that "a canine sniff is not a Fourth Amendment search" was derived from the Supreme Court's previous dog sniff cases, discussed below, and lies at the heart of the instant case and of several other similar cases.
_	In it, Duran states the principle that the most convincing polemical technique is to argue within one's opponents own assumptions.
_	It is based on the principle that the expected average between-marker distances can be smaller than the average insert length of a clone library containing the gene of interest.
_	Originally a steam brewery, with the engines now being powered by electricity, Arkell's is a tower brewery which works on the principle that raw materials are fed into the top of the building and beer comes out in casks at the bottom.
_	In cognitive science, association by contiguity is the principle that ideas, memories, and experiences are linked when one is frequently experienced with the other.
_	He was committed to the principle that it was possible to simultaneously maintain a religious observant lifestyle and participate in American society.
_	One of the conveniences of the criminal code was that it constituted the principle that no person would be able to be convicted of a crime unless otherwise specifically outlined and stated in a statute.
_	The Tsiolkovsky rocket equation—the principle that governs rocket propulsion—is named in his honor (although it had been discovered previously).
_	At the same time, Jakeš acknowledged Soviet pressure for reform by pledging to pursue economic restructuring, stating that "just as Soviet Communists, we too must observe the principle that more democracy means more socialism."
_	Informed consent is the principle that the volunteers in the experiment should fully understand the procedure that is going to take place, be aware of all the risks involved, and give their consent to taking part in the experiment beforehand.
_	A hallmark of the French colonial project in the late 19th century and early 20th century was the civilising mission ("mission civilisatrice"), the principle that it was Europe's duty to bring civilisation to benighted peoples.
_	The exterior columns on the North side feature bracketing and are non-weight bearing in what may be seen as a humorous stab at the movements at the time following the principle that architecture must be truthful and form must follow function.
_	Ultrasonic testing uses the principle that a gap in the weld changes the propagation of ultrasonic sound through the metal.
_	He established the principle that the Rhine defined a natural boundary between Gaul and Germania magna.
_	Like many alphabetic writing systems English also have incorporated the principle that graphemic units should correspond to the phonemic units, however, the fidelity to the principle is compromised, compared to an exemplar like Finnish language.
_	Congreve, 2nd Baronet devised a machine running on capillary action that would disobey the principle that water seeks its own level, so to produce a continuous ascent and overflow.
_	Purposefully, she introduced the principle that through cooperation with big industry to create inexpensive objects, good design would thereby become available to the general public.
_	The "Tao" is a fundamental idea in most Chinese philosophical schools; in Taoism, however, it denotes the principle that is the source, pattern and substance of everything that exists.
_	In his article “The Principle of Vulnerability” in Informal Logic seeks to offer defence to the principle that all arguments should be considered susceptible to criticisms.
_	After working full-time for 25 years in mathematics research and analysis while also volunteering in animal welfare, in 2007, Bathurst founded Safe Humane Chicago, a community-wide coalition of government agencies, religious groups, police, animal welfare groups that operates under the Dog Advisory Work Group, or D.A.W.G., a court advocacy program, also founded by Bathurst, to help curb violence against animals by focusing on the principle that a safe community is a humane one.
_	In Taoism, however, "Tao" denotes the principle that is both the source and the pattern of development of everything that exists.
_	The High Court has applied the principle that no general power enables a government, the Governor-General or any other delegated legislation-maker to make regulations "which go outside the field of operation which the Act marks out for itself".
_	This is based on the principle that beforehand, the deck is set up with all the suits in order.
_	Presumption of guilt, in Latin, "ei incumbit probatio qui negat, non qui dicit" (the burden of proof is on the one who denies, not on one who declares), is the principle that one is considered guilty unless proven innocent.
_	The author concludes, "A free society is based on the principle that [individuals have] a right to decide on what art or entertainment (they want) to receive – or create."
_	The Tortoise then asks Achilles whether a second kind of reader might exist, who accepts that "A" and "B" are true, but who does "not" yet accept the principle that "if" "A" and "B" are both true, "then" "Z" must be true.
_	It represents the principle that the difference between the aggregate work of the accelerating forces of a system and that of the retarding forces is equal to one half the "vis viva" accumulated or lost in the system while the work is being done.
_	In most jurisdictions, this appears in the principle that makes the protection of the best interests of any child the first and single most important concern of the courts.
_	An ex-wife tried to take advantage of the principle that had been reintroduced in the High Trees case to enforce her husband's promise to give her maintenance.
_	The best-known songs from the opera include "I'm called Little Buttercup", a waltz tune introducing the character, which Sullivan repeats in the entr'acte and in the Act II finale to imprint the melody on the mind of the audience; and "A British tar" (a glee for three men describing the ideal sailor), composed by Sir Joseph "to encourage independent thought and action in the lower branches of the service, and to teach the principle that a British sailor is any man's equal, excepting mine".
_	An alleged agreement that she should remain as the chairman was not looked on favourably in this public company, because it contradicts the principle that in public companies information material to good governance should be disclosed to shareholders.
_	Louis XIV had succeeded in establishing the principle that a new treaty would be fixed within the framework of the Treaties of Westphalia and Nijmegen, and the Truce of Ratisbon, but with the Emperor's demands for Strasbourg, and William III's insistence that he be recognized as King of England "before" the conclusion of hostilities, it hardly seemed worthwhile in calling for a peace conference.
_	The US Supreme Court ruled on the principle that state legislatures had to establish districts with roughly equal populations, in order to support the principle of equity of "one man, one vote".
_	Proceeding on the principle that like can only be known by like, Trendelenburg next reaches a doctrine peculiar to himself (though based upon Aristotle) that plays a central part in his speculations.
_	As conflicting claims grew out of the controversy, maritime states came to modulate their demands and base their maritime claims on the principle that it extended seawards from land.
_	In the early 1970s, Eadie put forward a Private Members Bill that would have established the principle that no child in Scotland should be treated as incapable of being educated.
_	Swish was founded on the principle that equality cannot be fully achieved and hateful policies cannot be overturned without the help and support of the straight community.
_	Because the pathic diseases generally arise out of the more primary constant (tonic) diseases, such as the chronic diseases that arise out of the chronic miasms, Hahnemann also laid down the principle that the tonic diseases should be treated first, and second any remaining pathic diseases.
_	In "Love, Power and Justice," Hatcher outlines a system of ethics based on the principle that there is a universal human nature.
_	Others have supported him, going with the principle that "drivers are free to race".
_	This is based on the principle that the forces of natural selection cause genes and other functional elements to undergo mutation at a slower rate than the rest of the genome, since mutations in functional elements are more likely to negatively impact the organism than mutations elsewhere.
_	The Adam Smith Foundation supports "Right to Work," the principle that employees should not be forced to join unions or to pay union dues.
_	His translation was also guided by the principle that the Bible "was meant to be read aloud".
_	He then conveys that the principle that I political economy, no private interest or right may have authority over the general interest of the country, and if a political economy does not acknowledge that principle, it will forever remain in a dismal state.
_	The Public Trust Doctrine primarily rests on the principle that certain resources like air, sea, waters and the forests have such a great importance to the people as a whole that it would be wholly unjustified to make them a subject of private ownership.
_	Obvious and fundamental points of agreement between the two authors include the analogy drawn between beauty and virtue, the functions assigned to the moral sense, the position that the benevolent feelings form an original and irreducible part of our nature, and the unhesitating adoption of the principle that the test of virtuous action is its tendency to promote the general welfare.
_	Subsequently his team calculated genetic distance between populations, based on the principle that two populations that share similar frequencies of a trait are more closely related than populations that have more divergent frequencies of the trait.
_	"Rylands v Fletcher" contained the principle that "the person who for his own purposes brings on his lands and collects and keeps there anything likely to do mischief if it escapes, must keep it at his peril, and, if he does not do so, is prima facie answerable for all the damage which is the natural consequence of its escape", with a requirement that this use of land be "non-natural".
_	The SPR is based on the principle that certain levels of fish have to survive in order to spawn and replenish the stock at a sustainable level.
_	It is based upon the principle that any flat surface within a home or office tends to accumulate clutter.
_	Elmasry argued that Canadian law is deficient because it lacks the concept of "group defamation," which he explained should be based on the principle that "There is (sic) individual human rights and there is (sic) collective, group human rights, and both of them are very important."
_	Early in 1908 Partridge convinced the Saskatchewan Grain Growers' Association (SGGA) to endorse the principle that inland grain elevators should be owned by the province and terminal elevators by the Dominion of Canada.
_	Mario Bunge has written that "psychokinesis, or PK, violates the principle that mind cannot act directly on matter.
_	"Semana" reported that both negotiating parties had agreed to the principle that nothing coming from the outside could influence the discussions, while the FARC states that its Central High Command had decided to continue the exploratory meetings, "for it was the will of Alfonso Cano."
_	The "ratio decidendi" is "the point in a case that determines the judgement" or "the principle that the case establishes".
_	The one hundred delegates of the Montana constitutional convention enshrined in the newly drafted constitution for the state the principle that educational institutions in the state should commit to presenting their students with a curriculum that would expand and fortify students' understanding of American Indian history, both within and outside the state of Montana.
_	Stir frying in vinegar is typically used whenever one wants to direct the properties of an herb more to the liver based on the principle that the sour taste belongs to the liver.
_	Relations with the Soviet bloc improved during the era of "" around 1970, West Germany then adopting the principle that the GDR and the Federal Republic were "two German states within one German nation".
_	On the first day of dialogue, he offers geometrical foundations for Archytas’ (Pseudo-Aristotles) mechanics, establishing the principle that the further a weight is from the centre of a pivoting lever, the less force is required to move it in a circular motion.
_	This method is based on the principle that the value of an asset is intrinsic to the expected income flows it generates.
_	Nevertheless, he established, in the case of Captain Streater, committed to prison by order of the Council of State and the Speaker of the House of Commons for the publication of seditious writings, the principle that a court of justice cannot review parliamentary commitments if regular in form.
_	He denied that the principle that "stare decisis" applies particularly to decisions based on statutes was relevant here.
_	Muslim jurists agree that abortion is allowed based on the principle that "the greater evil [the woman's death] should be warded off by the lesser evil [abortion]."
_	Finally, AFD has adopted the principle that she “should include environmental and social responsibility in its procurement process”.
_	There was already concern following the Michael Watson case, which in the United Kingdom established the principle that the authorities have a wide responsibility for the health and safety of boxers (and spectators too).
_	According to a 1979 report prepared for and under the guidance of the Committee on the Exercise of the Inalienable Rights of the Palestinian People, it would appear that the United Nations has maintained the principle that the legal status of Jerusalem is that of a "corpus separatum".
_	"At this moment, every portion of England's vast Colonial Empire is thoroughly loyal, but it is not too much to say that very different sentiments will arise if the British Government once give their assent to the principle that to suit the fancy of statesmen any portion of the colonies may be given away to or exchange with a foreign power, not only without the consent, but contrary to the wish of the people whose allegiance is made a matter of barter."
_	It is the principle that the conjuncts of a logical conjunction may switch places with each other, while preserving the truth-value of the resulting proposition.
_	A few exceptions to the principle that compositions weren't renumbered were when a composition from the Anhang could be recovered and/or authenticated as Bach's, so that it deserved a place in the main catalogue, in which case it was given a number above 1080.
_	The Supreme Court affirmed the principle that it is not for a secular judge to sit in judgment on the correctness of a religious belief.
_	He based his interpretation on the principle that the Vedas needed to be interpreted using the Darshanas, Brahmanas, the Upanishads, and especially the science of Etymology (Nirukta).
_	Balmond sees his work as an open-ended visual application of theory, following the principle that "structure as conceptual rigour "is" architecture".
_	Following World War One, the Treaty of Versailles contained the first constitution of a new International Labour Organization founded on the principle that "labour is not a commodity", and for the reason that "peace can be established only if it is based upon social justice".
_	They rejected the principle that there was a constitutional right to reside in one's own country, calling it "extreme", and concluded that in any case no such right could not trump legislation such as an Order in Council.
_	A trained celebrant usually operates professionally on the principle that their own beliefs and values are not relevant.
_	In "United States v. Verdugo-Urquidez", the Supreme Court reaffirmed the principle that the Constitution does not extend protection to non-U.S. persons located outside of the United States, so no warrant was required to engage in even physical searches of non-U.S. citizens abroad.
_	The clinic operated "on the principle that two-thirds of its patients should be charity cases and the other third paying patients who contributed the funds for keeping the clinic in operation".
_	Under our Constitution the question is settled by its express language, and when we are informed ... no person is eligible to the office of President unless he is a natural born citizen, the principle that the place of birth creates the relative quality is established as to us.
_	Ernest Hemingway, who had the same publisher, accepted the principle that "fart" could be cut, on the grounds that words should not be used purely to shock.
_	They work on the principle that passing a high voltage through a low-pressure gas generates light.
_	on the principle that bans are justified only under exceptional circumstances.
_	Fermat also used his principle to give a mathematical derivation of Snell's laws of refraction directly from the principle that light takes the quickest path.
_	The board debated whether to accept government support, with Deady arguing against, out of concern for the encroachment of political influence, and on the principle that citizens would place more value on something they themselves paid for, even if the payment were small.
_	She was often seen as a conservative maverick; she was one of only seven Senate votes who opposed an increase in the state's minimum wage, on the principle that it would put her Southern Tier district at a competitive disadvantage with neighboring counties in Pennsylvania.
_	The "Iowa idea" embodied the principle that tariff rates should accurately measure the difference between the cost of production here and abroad, but not set rates higher than necessary to protect home industries.
_	The public interest in disclosure is the principle that a court of justice ought not be denied access to relevant information, and that the opposing party should have access to all relevant information to make their case.
_	This technique is based on the principle that when each recorded data comes from the same parent population, they are consistent.
_	Criticism that the churches in the RCSA have abandoned the principle that Christ is the only Head of the church, exists.
_	The majority opinion, reversing the District Court, stated that the appellees did not sufficiently prove a textual basis, within the US Constitution, supporting the principle that education is a fundamental right.
_	Although this presumption is useful in determining whether a person is an employee or not, as it is closely linked to the principles and approaches developed by the courts, the Labour Court held, in "Catlin v CCMA", that section 200A does not do away with the principle that the true nature of the relationship between the parties must be gathered from the contract between them.
_	This was a landmark measure, in that it established, according to A. J. P. Taylor, "the principle that housing was a social service".
_	This method is based on the principle that there is a direct relation between the costs expended in the development of the intellectual property and its economic value.
_	A Truman Institute survey from 2005 found that 63% of the Arab citizens accept the principle that Israel is the state of the Jewish people.
_	J.S. Haldane originally used a critical pressure ratio of 2 to 1 for decompression on the principle that the saturation of the body should at no time be allowed to exceed about double the air pressure.
_	Most notably, it set forth the principle that in the absence of external forces, an object's motion will be uniform and in a straight line.
_	While not all of Liebeskind's ideas were incorporated into the final design, his design and the public support it garnered did solidify the principle that the original footprints of the Twin Towers should be turned into a memorial and not be used for commercial purposes.
_	SOFI is the principle that a higher-order statistical analysis of temporal fluctuations caused by fluorescence blinking helps resolve uncorrelated fluorophores in the same diffraction spot.
_	Working on the principle that the browsers of the day (Netscape Navigator 4.01 and Internet Explorer 3.0) were built to fulfil commercial imperatives determined by advertisers and software corporations rather than the information needs of the individual, The Web Stalker browser stripped out the superfluous, so only the raw text, links, and meta data remained.
_	This is the principle that the scientific name of a species, and not of a taxon at any other rank, is a combination of two names; the use of a trinomen for the name of a subspecies and of uninominal names for taxa above the species group is in accord with this principle.
_	Cultural historians employed the "normative model of culture", the principle that each culture is a set of norms governing human behaviour.
_	As E. J. Lemmon describes it:""Modus ponendo tollens" is the principle that, if the negation of a conjunction holds and also one of its conjuncts, then the negation of its other conjunct holds."
_	A string trimmer works on the principle that a line that is turned fast enough is held out from its housing (the rotating reel) very stiffly by centrifugal force.
_	The Dominant Factor Test (also known by several variants such as the Dominant Principle Test or Dominant Element Theory) is the principle that most U.S. jurisdictions (states or territories) use in determining, legally, what is and is not gambling.
_	Isotope analysis is based on the principle that most elements exist in two or more forms, known as isotopes.
_	SIA is based on the principle that birds will retain isotopic information in their tissues that are based on the isotopic landscapes they inhabited in the recent past.
_	The doctrine of estoppel is based on the principle that consistency in word and action imparts certainty and honesty to human affairs.
_	The cooperative is based on the principle that children can collectively advocate for services.
_	He advocated the principle that St. Paul ought to be interpreted by St. James, not St. James by St. Paul, on the ground that St. James wrote later, and was presumed acquainted with St. Paul's teaching.
_	The conditions concern the type of life annuity and the necessity, based on the principle that the higher the income is, the more pension plus life annuity one needs to build up for the future, up to a maximum.
_	They endorse the principle that the human rights that people have offline should enjoy the same protection online, including freedom of assembly and the right to organize, freedom of religion and the right to be protected by the "arbitrary" intrude into his privacy.
_	This states the principle that the transferee is bound to the contractual and employment law obligations of the transferor.
_	These cases sit uneasily with the principle that polluters should pay, and the scheme of the Water Framework Directive 2000 to ensure proper enforcement of clean water standards.
_	WHEREAS, the 14th Amendment to the U.S. Constitution states, "…nor shall any state deprive any person of life, liberty or property, without due process of law, nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the law," Georgia Right to Life PAC affirms the principle that the right to life is the bedrock upon which all other constitutional rights are derived.
_	In the Federal Government of the United States, the "nondelegation doctrine" is the principle that the Congress of the United States, being vested with "all legislative powers" by Article One, Section 1 of the United States Constitution, cannot delegate that power to anyone else.
_	Iura novit curia is a Latin legal maxim expressing the principle that "the court knows the law", i.e., that the parties to a legal dispute do not need to plead or prove the law that applies to their case.
_	This is the result of the operation of the principle that constitutional issues should, where possible, be avoided.
_	Central banking is based on the principle that no medium needs more than the guarantee of the state that it can be redeemed for payment of debt as "legal tender" – thus, all money equally backed by the state is good money, within that state.
_	One theory proposes the borrowing of the word "gladius" from *"kladi"- during this period, relying on the principle that "k" often became "g" in Latin.
_	The new format maintains the principle that the overall winner will be the first to cross the finish line.
_	When asked about the case, Jagland responded: "It will in itself be a paradox if one questions the principle that freedom of speech is subject to the party whip.
_	As a junior club, it was founded on the principle that any boy, no matter how good or bad a rugby player he was, would get a game.
_	The Hospital follows the principle that large volume service result in low cost and self-sustainability and has the distinction of being a very productive eye care organization, in terms of surgical volume and the number of patients treated.
_	Thus, in the Interlingua-English Dictionary (IED), Alexander Gode followed the principle that every word listed is accompanied by all of its clear compounds and derivatives, along with the word or words it is derived from.
_	A court judgment "Whitcombe & Tombs Limited v Taylor" (1907) 27 NZLR 237 stated the principle that "a well established custom or practice may become part of a contract" (as noted by the Court of Appeal of New Zealand in CA246/03, nearly a century later, despite half a dozen intervening changes of employment law).
_	According to Raff in his opinion letter, search neutrality ought to be "the principle that search engines should have no editorial policies other than that their results be comprehensive, impartial and based solely on relevance".
_	As his medical theory was based on the principle that all disease was caused by an unbalance of "excitability", which referred to the body's ability to react to stimuli, he believed that excitement could be measured mathematically similar to the use of degrees on a thermometer.
_	It is generally believed to be the principle that, if the ratio between the greatest and least income exceeds 5, it becomes disadvantageous for the societal unit involved.
_	Most notably, Richard Bland published a pamphlet entitled "An Enquiry into the Rights of The British Colonies", setting forth the principle that Virginia was a part of the British Empire, not the Kingdom of Great Britain, so it only owed allegiance to the Crown, not Parliament.
_	PCF's scientific strategic plan operates on the principle that longer term funding of milestone-driven research is needed in the field in order to reduce death and suffering from prostate cancer.
_	Prichard gave an influential defence of ethical intuitionism in his "Does Moral Philosophy Rest on a Mistake?" (1912), wherein he contended that moral philosophy rested chiefly on the desire to provide arguments, starting from non-normative premises, for the principles of obligation that we pre-philosophically accept, such as the principle that one ought to keep one's promises or that one ought not steal.
_	Fearing arrest the archbishop fled to Canterbury, and entered upon a violent war of words with the king, and by his firm conduct led to the establishment of the principle that peers were only to be tried in full parliament before their own order ("en pleyn parlement et devant les piers").
_	In addition, they undermine the principle that public justice should be dispensed in public, and will weaken fair trial guarantees of equality of arms, which are essential elements of the rule of law”.
_	The term is not recognized as a psychiatric illness in any of the medical manuals, such as the ICD-10 or the DSM-5; however, the principle that memories can be altered by outside influences is overwhelmingly accepted by scientists.
_	He commented that, in later years, the politician adopted views which resonated with those of Hegel, most notably the principle that legislation needed to adapt to the individual spirit of nations.
_	He made similar contributions to uphold the importance of Wolverhampton, Walsall and Stoke, continually insisting on the principle that constituencies should represent communities and populations, not political or economic interests.
_	Network neutrality (also net neutrality, Internet neutrality, or net equality) is the principle that Internet service providers and governments should treat all data on the Internet equally, not discriminating or charging differentially by user, content, site, platform, application, type of attached equipment, or mode of communication.
_	He gave a notably crisp formulation to the principle that physicians should undergo preliminary preparation in Aristotelian natural philosophy: "Ubi desinit physicus, ibi medicus incipit"
_	Gavin prepares an indictment against de Spain, as mayor, for Flem's theft of the brass at the power plant, largely motivated by his desire to stand up for "the principle that chastity and virtue in women shall be defended whether they exist or not."
_	The modern art of aikido is founded upon the principle that the control of the opponent achieved by the successful application of "aiki" may be used to defeat one's opponent without harming them.
_	In 1999, he was named executive director of the organization, whose mission is "to defend and extend God-given religious liberty for all, furthering the Baptist heritage that champions the principle that religion must be freely exercised, neither advanced nor inhibited by government."
_	The Council sought to: (a) bring an end to the practice of the conferring of ecclesiastical benefices by people who were laymen (b) free the election of bishops and abbots from secular influence (c) clarify the separation of spiritual and temporal affairs (d) re-establish the principle that spiritual authority resides solely in the Church (e) abolish the claim of the emperors to influence papal elections.
_	The second area was the failure of ministerial accountability; the principle that "for every action of a servant of the crown a minister is answerable to Parliament".
_	"What is the principle of unity that holds together the nine circles of Hell, the seven terraces of Purgatory, and the ten spheres of Paradise," and "What is the principle that divides
_	The movement generally espouses the principle that sovereignty ends where human rights begin.
_	García is a strong believer in the principle that there is no business growth without a relationship with its local community.
_	ELOKA operates on the principle that all ways of knowing should be treated ethically, and intellectual property rights should be respected.
_	While Attorney General, Maginess was party to the case of "Attorney General for Northern Ireland v Gallagher [1961] 3 All Er 299", which remains authority in the law of Northern Ireland and England & Wales for the principle that Dutch courage is not a defence in criminal law.
_	Linguistic models in MTT operate on the principle that language consists in a mapping from the content or meaning (semantics) of an utterance to its form or text (phonetics).
_	"This building is dedicated to the principle that no institution can long endure unless it serves faithfully and unselfishly its country, its state and community."
_	De Camp noted that the two stories were completely different, and used the incident to illustrate the principle that two science fiction writers, using the same idea, will write different stories, so there is nothing wrong with copying someone else's idea.
_	His expression corresponds to what we would now call potential energy, so that his statement of least action in statics is equivalent to the principle that a system of bodies at rest will adopt a configuration that minimizes total potential energy.
_	We oppose any unilateral steps by either side to alter the status quo in the Taiwan Straits on the principle that all issues regarding the island’s future must be resolved peacefully, through dialogue, and be agreeable to the people of Taiwan.
_	In optics, Fermat's principle or the principle of least time, named after French mathematician Pierre de Fermat, is the principle that the path taken between two points by a ray of light is the path that can be traversed in the least time.
_	Mayo Clinic Graduate School of Biomedical Sciences is committed to the principle that society benefits from PhD-trained biomedical scientists leading in a broad range of careers.
_	Throughout the history of the United States, the dominant legal principle governing citizenship has been "jus soli"—the principle that birth within the territorial limits of the United States confers automatic citizenship, excluding slaves before the American Civil War.
_	Dorade boxes operate on the principle that air can pass relatively freely through the chambers, yet rain or sea wash will be trapped in successive chambers and drain out the small holes in the sides of the box.
_	In the 1990s the legal system was gradually becoming more professionalized, and a series of reforms in 1996-97 affirmed the principle that all punishments must be based on the rule of law.
_	Also, legislators have created unintentional misdemeanors, a straying from the principle that says "there is no crime of offence without the intention of committing it" (art. 121-3 of penal code).
_	Existing states were broken up and new ones created; the new nation-states were founded on the principle that each nation is entitled to its own sovereignty and to engender, protect, and preserve its own unique culture and history.
_	Committed to the principle that political parties are fundamental to the American political process, O'Brien was elected in 1968 and in 1970 by the DNC to serve as its national chairman.
_	Automotive Tooling Systems (Pty) Ltd v Wilkens & others was an important case in South African labour law, in which the Supreme Court of Appeal of South Africa confirmed the principle that a restraint of trade would be considered unreasonable and contrary to public policy, and thus unenforceable, if it does not protect some legally recognisable interest of the employer and merely seeks to exclude or eliminate competition.
_	It can be ... because when you put on the uniform of the United States and you go and fight on behalf of your country in a foreign land at war, and you’re taken captive by the enemy, the principle that we don’t leave our men and women behind doesn’t have an asterisk attached to it depending on who’s holding you.
_	His expression corresponds to what we would now call potential energy, so that his statement of least action in statics is equivalent to the principle that a system of bodies at rest will adopt a configuration that minimizes total potential energy.
_	In response, supporters of the principle that web sites should be compliant with World Wide Web Consortium standards and hence viewable with any browser started the "Viewable With Any Browser" campaign, which employed its own logo similar to the partisan ones.
_	Lennon was impressed, and felt he had to have an American guitar, on the principle that "if was good enough for Thielemans it was good enough for me."
_	The Code of Military Justice adopted the principle that a minority vote of three against four was an acquittal.
_	It now forms part of the UK Government's "Information Principles", supporting the principle that "Information is standardised and linkable".
_	He takes the opportunity to learn lace construction anyway, on the principle that one never knows when such a thing may be useful.
_	In the foundation's commitment to "the principle that the solution to offensive speech is more speech, and the suppression of speech on the grounds that it gives offense to some infringes on the rights of all to a free, open and robust marketplace of ideas," the FTRF awards and distributes grants to aid intellectual freedom litigation, directly participates as a party to intellectual freedom litigation, and submits amicus curiae briefs in freedom of speech and freedom of the press cases.
_	The ISO 25178 standard is considered by TC213 as first and foremost providing a redefinition of the foundations of surface texture, based upon the principle that nature is intrinsically 3D.
_	They also enshrined the principle that it was a free river, and no tolls were to be collected for its use.
_	Clutch delay valves operate on the principle that engagement only needs to occur at a certain rate to be efficient and that engaging at a quicker rate can damage the drive train components of an automobile.
_	CARU, operating under the principle that self-regulation is best supported by education, provides a general advisory service for advertisers and agencies and has created publications to help parents help their kids understand advertising.
_	Subsequently his team calculated genetic distance between populations, based on the principle that two populations that share similar frequencies of a trait are more closely related than populations that have more divergent frequencies of the trait.
_	The Decision states that "the principle that the Chief Executive has to be a person who loves the country and loves Hong Kong must be upheld."
_	The claim is based on the principle that the rights of peoples are inalienable and on the following reasons:
_	PSU Alaminos City Campus was conceived with the principle that the National and Local Government have a shared responsibility of ensuring the happiness and well being of the present generation brought about by a progressing economy and a well-developed society that exist within the wider context of the environment that requires the interaction among well-educated and value-driven citizens.
_	Orthographies that use alphabets and syllabaries are based on the principle that the written symbols (graphemes) correspond to units of sound of the spoken language: phonemes in the former case, and syllables in the latter.
_	They would also contradict the principle that all heat transfer is of one and the same kind, a principle founded on the idea of heat conduction between closed systems.
_	That landmark decision established the principle that “labels matter” under California’s Unfair Competition and False Advertising laws and is now a landmark of American law.
_	A "key plank of TerraNova's argument" was the principle that the Court should select the interpretation that is most "practical and sensible".
_	It was traditionally justified on the principle that the palace was most capable of distributing wealth efficiently for the benefit of society.
_	The government stood by the principle that military action was permitted only under civilian control, but in recognition that delay for consultation might prove dangerous, ships of the Japan Maritime Self-Defense Force (JMSDF) began to be armed with live torpedoes, and fighter-interceptors were allowed to carry missiles at all times.
_	Prominent Reform rabbis who were more integrationist, unwilling to abandon the principle that Jews should live as free and equal citizens in the United States and other countries around the world, and who rejected the idea in 1942 of a religiously segregated Jewish army to fight alongside the Allies, formed the American Council for Judaism.
_	The victimary process is the missing link between the animal world and the human world, the principle that explains the humanization of primates.
_	Network neutrality or Net neutrality, sometimes described as the "open Internet," is the principle that preserves Internet access without restriction to the content, sites, platforms, equipment or modes of communication allowed.
_	If special relativity is to hold up exactly to this scale, different observers would observe quantum gravity effects at different scales, due to the Lorentz–FitzGerald contraction, in contradiction to the principle that all inertial observers should be able to describe phenomena by the same physical laws.
_	It is one of the first international documents formally outlining the principle that European powers are empowered to divide the rest of the world into "spheres of influence" and colonise the territories located within such spheres, and that any indigenous peoples living there need not be asked for consent.
_	RepaNet is based on the principle that a table needs three legs, or it will fall over.
_	Philip laid down the principle that Joan, as a woman, could not inherit the throne of France, played heavily upon the fact that he was now the anointed king, and consolidated what some authors have described as his effective "usurpation" of power.
_	Convinced as he was of the necessity for union and reform, he contributed more than anyone to the adoption of the principle that, since the schism had survived the Council of Pisa, it was necessary again to take up the work for a fundamental union, without considering the rights of John XXIII any more than they had those of Gregory XII and Benedict XIII.
_	For instance, he repeatedly remarks that technical flourishes are excessive, and contrasts worrying about such things with the principle that all technique is simply a method of cutting down one's opponent.
_	Upon a Vatican suggestion, the dissemination of public statements is restricted to joint communiqués according to the principle that "nothing is agreed unless everything is agreed."
_	His obituary in the "Morning Post" states that he declined several subsequent offers of translation to "more important" posts, being a "firm believer" in the principle that colonial bishops should not return to England.
_	The "hot" forging process is based on the principle that a product is stronger the weight being equal.
_	As the principle that any purported amendment of an association’s constitution by its members that does not follow the prescribed procedure is void is well settled, it should only mean that the act of registering the College with the new constitution was wrongful and perhaps the registration is a nullity.
_	The notion of knowledge seems to be governed by the principle that knowledge is factive:
_	Hegeler intended for the firm to serve the purpose of discussing religious and psychological problems on the principle that the scientific world-conception should be applied to religion.
_	Discounts is the principle that no operative should suffer if he was allocated substandard cotton, or put on a machine that output a lower capacity.
_	[I]t would contradict my approach completely, for my having dared to criticize is built on the principle that every person ... is liable to err ... [Others] will undoubtedly find many mistakes that I have made, because man is biased in favor of his own words and ideas.
_	This refers to the principle that the response of a nervous system should stay within certain bounds even as the inputs from the environment change drastically.
_	This maxim rests on the principle that so long as compensation is available for those whose property is in fact taken, the governmental action is not unconstitutional.
_	What they love is the principle that originally lay behind ennoblement.
_	He opens with the principle that instilling the belief in God's unity, and especially in His government of the world, is the ultimate purpose of every commandment, so that it is the duty of humanity to seek the underlying objective of each commandment.
_	The charity operates by the principle that Western charities should act in an enabling, not prescriptive, manner.
_	Through this, Hideaki employed the principle that one should always attempt to deepen their level of technical accomplishment in order to create within themselves an unshakable form.
_	"State Street" for a time established the principle that a claimed invention was eligible for protection by a patent in the United States if it involved some practical application and, in the words of the "State Street" opinion, "it produces a useful, concrete and tangible result."
_	Conceptually, geospatial predictive modeling is rooted in the principle that the occurrences of events being modeled are limited in distribution.
_	Net neutrality is the principle that governments should mandate Internet service providers to treat all data on the Internet the same, and not discriminate or charge differently by user, content, website, platform, application, type of attached equipment, or method of communication.
_	But I want to state the principle that one must permit neediness and yearning to remain as forces favoring work and change.
_	Grounded in the principle that durable stability is a result of local will, empowerment, initiative, and leadership, OTI designs and implements clusters of small grants through a process-oriented, community-driven approach.
_	This operates on the principle that a person visiting a new temple will memorize a unique pattern upon the wall, and by recalling this pattern at a different temple, be transported to the first temple with the aid of a priest.
_	It would seem that, if the property remaining over has actually increased in amount or value, the fideicommissary may claim all of it on the principle that the person who bears the loss is entitled to the profits.
_	A few years later William Wollaston echoed this claim with the principle that "Whatever is either reasonable or unreasonable in B with respect to C, would be just the same in C with respect to B, if the case was inverted.
_	At the convention he made clear his support for the principle that "trade and intercourse ... shall be absolutely free" in a federal Australia.
_	Namely the principle that homosexual conduct is an issue of morality and religion, and not criminal sanctions by the State.
_	The court referred to Whelan v. Jaslow, which had earlier that year established the principle that the structure, sequence and organization of a computer program could be subject to copyright (software copyright).
_	This clause, then, must have no meaning, "or imply, that were it omitted, congress would have the power in question, either upon the principle that some general words in the constitution may be so construed as to give it, or on the principle that congress possesses the powers not expressly reserved".
_	Brown worked on the principle that the best flour came from a combination of careful blending of wheat and the use of the best milling machinery.
_	Thexton v Thexton is an important case in New Zealand trust law, applying the principle that burden of establishing an intention to create a trust rests on the person alleging it.
_	However, “to complicate matters further,” the principle that constitutional issues should be avoided is not an absolute rule.
_	A firm belief in the principle that engineers must hold the public welfare paramount, or above any other responsibility, led Amadei to reconsider his involvement in a hydroelectric plant in Costa Rica in 2002.
_	HEART method is based upon the principle that every time a task is performed there is a possibility of failure and that the probability of this is affected by one or more Error Producing Conditions (EPCs) – for instance: distraction, tiredness, cramped conditions etc. – to varying degrees.
_	Broad offers nine examples of B.L.P.s, including the principle that there can be no backward causation, that there can be no action at a distance, and that one cannot perceive physical events or material things directly, unmediated by sensations.
_	In the text, Kant provides a groundbreaking argument that the rightness of an action is determined by the character of the principle that a person chooses to act upon.
_	Cycling activists in favour of vehicular cycling have opposed cycle tracks and paths on the principle that they might not be created with the "fast cyclist type" in mind.
_	All known forms of group selection conform to the principle that an individual behaviour can be evolutionarily successful only if the genes responsible for this behaviour conform to Hamilton's Rule, and hence, on balance and in the aggregate, benefit from the behaviour.
_	Colour temperature is based upon the principle that a black body radiator emits light whose colour depends on the temperature of the radiator.
_	SOE also adhered to the principle that resistance fighters would be handicapped rather than helped by heavy equipment such as mortars or anti-tank guns.
_	However, from the 13th century onwards, English diocesan bishops successfully established the principle that only the glebe and 'greater tithes' of grain, hay and wood could be appropriated by monastic patrons in this manner; the 'lesser tithes' had to remain within the parochial benefice; the incumbent of which thenceforward carried the title of 'vicar'.
_	The treaty affirmed the principle that no warships of any power should enter the straits of the Dardanelles and the Bosporus.
_	It is said that the reason why people don't receive this wound in the capital is because of the principle that malice does not win against true spirit.
_	Based on his experiences with McClintock and his love for naval traditions, Markham, future President of the Royal Geographical Society, became a fervent believer in the principle that manhauling was the purest form of polar travel.
_	On the principle that it is for the reader to dwell, not the author, the narratives are related with a deliberate economy: enough detail
_	The paper goes on to counsel, however, that using "K" for both a MAC and as the session key violates the principle that keys should not be used for more than one purpose, and presents various workarounds.
_	Glenrothes has a planned road network with original masterplans establishing the principle that "through traffic" be bypassed around the housing precincts by a network of "Freeway" and "Highway" distributor roads.
_	Specifically, precognition appears to violate the principle that an effect cannot occur before its cause.
_	Anarchists around the turn of the twentieth century clearly embraced the principle that means used to achieve any end must be consistent with that end, though they apparently did not use the term "prefiguration".
_	When Arthur Herman Gilkes became Master, he adhered to Carver's belief that the physical organisation of the school should be based on the principle that as far as possible management should be in the hands of the boys.
_	Christian T. Petersen comments: ""El Grande" showed me the surprising depth that could be achieved by interlocking simple mechanisms — the principle that lies at the heart of the German school of design."
_	Terence Tunberg's research and teaching is devoted to the principle that Latin literature is not a phenomenon pertaining just to the ancient Romans, but is in fact a vast literary tradition that has continued without ever experiencing a total interruption from the Romans virtually up to the present, and that some post-Roman periods (such as the Renaissance and early modern era) saw Latin's richest
_	In The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (LDS Church), continuing revelation is the principle that God or his divine agents still continue to communicate to mankind.
_	Despite this, the real significance of the case in later centuries lay in the principle that was extracted from the judges' arguments about how the common recovery worked and how compensation should be made, even if commentators got the details (and name) of the case itself wrong, having never seen the Plea Roll.
_	Belmore succeeded in having the Audit Act 1870 passed, which established the principle that government expenditure had to be authorised by appropriation through both houses of parliament, which had not been the practice until that time.
_	The intuitionist writings of L. E. J. Brouwer refer to what he calls "the "principle of the reciprocity of the multiple species", that is, the principle that for every system the correctness of a property follows from the impossibility of the impossibility of this property" (Brouwer, ibid, p. 335).
_	For this reason, precedent alone established the principle that a court may strike down a law it deems unconstitutional.
_	First generation iTPMS systems are based on the principle that under-inflated tires have a slightly smaller diameter (and hence higher angular velocity) than a correctly inflated one.
_	Nwakanma says he has lived most of his life on the principle that the value of a person’s life can only be measured by how much one has touched the lives of people around.
_	Further development on the game's user interface began using the principle that the game needed to be both accessible and charming, being able to draw in new players and to be clear how to play the game.
_	The Black Consciousness movement was based on the principle that the liberation struggle should be led by black people, whereas the UDF welcomed anyone who shared their goals and was willing to commit to them in struggle.
_	Grasset stressed the principle that various simple geometric shapes like triangles and squares are the basis of all compositional arrangements.
_	In awarding Leavitt a Doctor of Divinity (D.D.) honorary degree that same year, Bowdoin College noted that Leavitt "at all times an eloquent preacher of Christian duty, and in wartime a convincing teacher of the principle that only the righteous nation that keepeth truth may enter in the gates of the Kingdom."
_	It is generally cited for establishing the principle that reasonable restraints of trade, unlike unreasonable restraints of trade, are permissible and therefore enforceable and not a basis for civil or criminal liability.
_	Dictum de omni (sometimes misinterpreted as universal instantiation) is the principle that whatever is universally affirmed of a kind is affirmable as well for any subkind of that kind.
_	The modus operandi of SARG04 is based on the principle that the hardware must remain the same (as prior protocols) and the only change must be in the protocol itself.
_	Initially the villains were to be in combat gear, but later they decided against that due to the principle that they have to be placed in suits, with Leitch quoting Mosca, "It is about men in suits."
_	It argues that beyond the principle that a nation should have independent rights, Brittany also has everything to gain by such a process of emancipation, on economic, cultural or environmental fronts.
_	This is in contrast to most other well-known Asian martial arts but it is justified by the principle that bare-handed moves are acquired naturally through the same exercises as the weapon techniques, making muscle memory an important aspect of the teaching.
_	'Reciprocal altruism' can be expressed as the principle that "if you scratch my back, I'll scratch yours".
_	This works on the principle that everyone buying the product will either be a new customer (a 'trier') or a repeat customer.
_	One of Morris's long-term achievements was the acceptance of the principle that footballers could play for a country with which they had blood ties but which was not the country of their birth.
_	The conference was notable for producing the Balfour Declaration, which established the principle that the dominions are all equal in status, and "autonomous communities within the British Empire" not subordinate to the United Kingdom.
_	Since the jewel was not produced at the trial, Armory was awarded the maximum value that a jewel of that form could have (under the principle that a wrongdoer should not be able to derive gain, i.e. uncertainty of damages, from the effects of his wrongdoing).
_	The system works on the principle that images can be remembered more easily than numbers.
_	The great Moore's law compensator (TGMLC), also known as Wirth's law – generally is referred to as software bloat and is the principle that successive generations of computer software increase in size and complexity, thereby offsetting the performance gains predicted by Moore's law.
_	However, the 1830 revolution established the principle that the Charter, which was then reissued in amended form, could be changed, in the same way as an ordinary law, by the joint act of the King and the Chambers.
_	Smith has been a proponent of green building and the principle that new construction should be sustainable as a matter of law.
_	"The plan of any County Park System should be based on the principle that such system would benefit the whole population of the county, that it should be convenient and easily accessible to the large centers of population and that above all else, it should take over and preserve for park purposes land adoptable for parks before it is utilized for residences, factories or other purposes."
_	Brownlee took exception to this, less from any objection to funding Catholic schools than on the principle that education was a matter of provincial jurisdiction, but King would not allow him to rescind his agreement.
_	It is based on the principle that populations that share similar frequencies of a trait are more closely related than populations that have different frequencies of a trait.
_	Theater Headquarters had already announced the principle that the Constabulary would be organized along geographical lines to coincide as nearly as possible with the major divisions of the German civil administration, in order to facilitate liaison with the German police and United States Offices of Military Government.
_	In an interview with "Asiaweek" six months after stepping down from the presidency, Ong indicated that he had asked for the audit based on the principle that as an elected president, he was bound to protect the national reserves, and the only way of doing so would be to know what reserves (both liquid cash and assets) the government owned.
_	The Moschovakis coding lemma is a lemma from descriptive set theory involving sets of real numbers in the axiom of determinacy (the principle that every two-player integer game is determined).
_	"Respect for autonomy" is the principle that decision-making should allow individuals to be autonomous; they should be able to make decisions that apply to their own lives.
_	He explains how, in the first century BC, Vitruvius based his understanding of architecture on the principle that it should conform to the "members of a well-shaped man" and that it depended on squares and circles.
_	Formally, he captured this "relevance condition" with the principle that
_	Hero of Alexandria (10–70 AD) knew of the principle that certain substances, notably air, expand and contract and described a demonstration in which a closed tube partially filled with air had its end in a container of water.
_	These decrees enforced the principle that it was unlawful to effect an individual's employment status one way or the other on the grounds of political patronage and allegiances.
_	This initiated a period of active involvement in water policy by the government, based on the principle that water is a social good to be either provided free of charge or subsidised.
_	The common thread (enacted in different ways, and subject to the constraints of various systems of national law) is the principle that an enterprise or association should be owned and controlled by the people it serves, and share any surpluses on the basis of each member's cooperative contribution (as a producer, labourer or consumer) rather than their capacity to invest financial capital.
_	KNM is a democratic party and has a complete faith in the principle that people are real sovereign.
_	“ applying the principle that no restriction may be imposed on the fundamental rights and freedoms of end-users, without a prior ruling by the judicial authorities, notably in accordance with Article 11 of the Charter of Fundamental Rights of the European Union on freedom of expression and information, save when public security is threatened in which case the ruling may be subsequent.
_	Thornton Blackburn (1812–1890) was a former slave whose case established the principle that Canada would not return slaves to their masters in the US no matter what they had done.
_	The thorough consistency between dogma and contemporary science was maintained here in part from a serious attendance to the principle that there can be only one truth.
_	Justice Harlan rejected the theory that the Constitution enshrined the so-called "one man, one vote" principle, or the principle that legislative districts must be roughly equal in population.
_	According to the CRS, Congress has historically reserved to itself control over the dissemination of CRS products to the public on the principle that CRS, as an extension of congressional staff, works exclusively for the Congress.
_	It later formulated the principle that simple advice from a law professional does not constitute an error of law (Crim. 7 janvier 2004).
_	It is the principle that if a subject formula_1 knows formula_2, and formula_1 knows that formula_2 entails formula_5, then formula_1 can thereby come to know formula_5.
_	In Aristotelean logic, dictum de omni et nullo (Latin: "the maxim of all and none") is the principle that whatever is affirmed or denied of a whole kind K may be affirmed or denied (respectively) of any subkind of K.
_	The 1971 ruling in the Supreme Court case "New York Times Co. v. United States" formulated the principle that the concept of prior restraint is largely unconstitutional.
_	Starting from the principle that perception is the result (the trace) of the sentient body (which is itself a “body-trace”) and that qualifying what is perceived is the consequence (trace) of a cognitive process, the author proposes the use of the term sign-trace every time that the history of the construction of the emergence of the sign is worth repeating.
_	The Patiala State Monorail Trainways and Kundala Valley Railway were built in India on the principle that he described.
_	By this I mean the principle that, in deciding what is good and what is bad for a given individual, the ultimate criterion can only be his own wants and his own preferences."
_	Land ethics may also be based upon the principle that the land (and the organisms that live off the land) has intrinsic value.
_	1887, Hegeler founded the Open Court Publishing Company, intended to serve the purpose of discussing religious and psychological problems on the principle that the scientific world-conception should be applied to religion.
_	In mathematical optimization theory, duality or the duality principle is the principle that optimization problems may be viewed from either of two perspectives, the primal problem or the dual problem.
_	The following day (8 December), the UK and EU negotiators agreed on the principle that "nothing is agreed until everything is agreed" and formally announced to proceed immediately to the next phase of talks on a transition period and future trade relationships.
_	Jineology is built on the principle that without the freedom of women within society and without a real consciousness surrounding women no society can call itself free."
_	Existence is the principle that gives reality to an essence not the same in any way as the existence:
_	Ellingham diagrams are a particular graphical form of the principle that the thermodynamic feasibility of a reaction depends on the sign of ΔG, the Gibbs free energy change, which is equal to ΔH − TΔS, where ΔH is the enthalpy change and ΔS is the entropy change .
_	Guiding of light by refraction, the principle that makes fiber optics possible, was first demonstrated by Daniel Colladon and Jacques Babinet in Paris in the early 1840s.
_	Lightwood's law is the principle that, in medicine, bacterial infections will tend to localise while viral infections will tend to spread.
_	In criminal law, Blackstone's formulation (also known as Blackstone's ratio or the Blackstone ratio) is the principle that:
_	Convergence is the chance similarity of sound and meaning of a word in two different languages and "is based on the principle that a word is an arbitrary association of sound and meaning".
_	LSI is based on the principle that words that are used in the same contexts tend to have similar meanings.
_	He also demonstrated the principle that mirror-image amino acids put together to form a protein create a mirror-image protein which, if an enzyme, can catalyze the mirror-image reaction.
_	(Availability is sometimes not mentioned, on the principle that it is a simple function of reliability and maintainability.)
_	One of the features that makes him the first "modern general" is his scrupulous care for his communications and his operating under the principle that his army should be united, or each unit having the ability to join the other units, at any time.
_	This initiative aims to establish a Young Professionals Coastal Community (YPCC), based on the principle that innovative, resilient, no-regret adaptive options should involve young professionals at an early stage through familiarising them with the concepts and tools of ICZM.
_	Systemic development is based on the principle that one must understand the complexity of the whole system to develop a solution.
_	Even where good quality archaeological research is carried out by archaeologists working with treasure hunters, concerns remain that treasure hunting, by definition, ignores the principle that in-situ preservation of cultural heritage should always be considered first, and that the sale of recovered artifacts breaks up the assemblage of cultural heritage material, resulting in a loss of opportunity to study the whole picture.
_	It is the principle that out of this issue no precedent must be created that makes the Royal authority once more a source of independent political power in the State.
_	The International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia, in the Tadic case, stated "there undisputedly emerged a general consensus in the international community on the principle that the use of [chemical] weapons is also prohibited in internal armed conflicts."
_	They operated on the principle that "more participation would mean more competition, which would drive down premiums and make health insurance more affordable" and "[w]hen insurers signed up to sell health plans on the exchanges, they did so with the expectation that the risk-corridor program would limit their downside losses."
_	Greenleaf proceeds to argue that "In matters of public and general interest, all persons must be presumed to be conversant, on the principle that individuals are presumed to be conversant with their own affairs" (p. 9).
_	The rest is a defense of (a) what we now call the principle of contradiction, the principle that it is not possible for the same proposition to be (the case) and not to be (the case), and (b) what we now call the principle of excluded middle: "tertium non datur" — there cannot be an intermediary between contradictory statements.
_	Notions of responsible consumption developed over decades, revealing the political nature of individual purchases, according to the principle that consumption should satisfy the population’s basic needs.
_	OneVoice emerged from Lubetzky's previous venture, Peaceworks,Inc., on the principle that economic cooperation between Israelis and Palestinians would result in stronger relations.
_	During World War I (1914–1918) he was one of the few national deputies to remain true to the principle that the workers of the world should not support wars between their countries arranged by political and military leaders.
_	The court reaffirmed the principle that words in the revenue acts should be interpreted in their ordinary, everyday sense.
_	Shrapnel used the principle that the bullets encountered much less air resistance if they travelled most of their journey packed together in a single streamlined shell than they would if they travelled individually, and could hence attain a far greater range.
_	Nor does it prevent the government from retrying the defendant after a deadlocked jury, an appellate reversal other than for sufficiency, including habeas, or "thirteenth juror" appellate reversals notwithstanding sufficiency on the principle that jeopardy has not "terminated."
_	Justice Cooke noted on the right to silence, "The starting point for any attempt to explore a little deeper must be the principle that, unless an Act of Parliament imposes or authorises the imposition of a duty to the contrary, every citizen has in general a right to refuse to answer questions from anyone, including an official."
_	The practice is based on the principle that the more independent transmission histories there are, the less likely they will be to reproduce the same errors.
_	The Ingersoll “Glarimeter”, the earliest known instrument developed for gloss measurement, was based on the principle that light is polarised in specular reflection.
_	This is the principle that in cases of conflicts between simultaneously published divergent acts, the first subsequent author can decide which has precedence.
_	Third, the principle that effects cannot precede causes can be invoked, by including on the right side of the regression only variables that precede in time the dependent variable.
_	Yet, the Court continued to recognize the principle that "a change of sovereignty produces no change in individual property, yet it imputes to them only a modified validity."
_	Unlike the other two programs, the principle that the federal government should also contribute a portion of the underwriting cost, with the other two portions prorated accordingly, was accepted without question.
_	The decision helped establish the principle that a plaintiff must meet a standing requirement for "each" form of relief sought.
_	In giving his judgment, Chief Justice Coke set out the principle that the King had no power to declare new offences by proclamation:
_	The treatment works on the principle that charged ions in the skin are either attracted or repelled from the electrodes, resulting in certain chemical effects.
_	Rome instead started from the principle that most of the territory of the new eparchy depended on the Patriarchate of Jerusalem, of which the patriarch of Antioch was only administrator, and that the conditions of this administration had never been determined or clarified.
_	The view expressed at first instance by HHJ Southwell QC in "Creasey v Breachwood" that English law "definitely" recognised the principle that the corporate veil could be lifted was described as a heresy by Hobhouse LJ in "Ord v Bellhaven", and these doubts were shared by Moritt V-C in "Trustor v Smallbone (No 2)": the corporate veil cannot be lifted merely because justice requires it.
_	"Only one eye for one eye", also known as "An eye for an eye" or "A tooth for a tooth", or the law of retaliation, is the principle that a person who has injured another person is to be penalized to a similar degree, and the person inflicting such punishment should be the injured party.
_	As an example, the principle that courts should not interpret a statute to produce absurd or unintended results will often be informed by evidence of what the proponents of a bill stated about the objectives to be achieved by the statute.
_	He claimed the credit for establishing the principle that the position of Minister of the Crown is incompatible with directorship of a public company.
_	If Special Relativity is to hold up exactly to this scale, different observers would observe Quantum Gravity effects at different scales, due to the Lorentz–FitzGerald contraction, in contradiction to the principle that all inertial observers should be able to describe phenomena by the same physical laws.
_	For the phonology of Thracian, Georgiev uses the principle that an intelligible placename in a modern language is likely to be a translation of an ancient name.
_	Fundamental to the operation of all public bodies was the principle that the Marxist-Leninist KPRP served as the most important political institution of the state.
_	Bigeleisen's research led to the development of isotope chemistry based on the principle that heavier isotopes formed stronger chemical bonds allowing for the creation of a straightforward theory to explain the progress of chemical reactions through the interaction of isotopes in gaseous form, which he did together with Maria Goeppert-Mayer, who would later win the Nobel Prize in Physics.
_	Compounding this issue was that sports leagues in this era generally operated on the principle that a visiting team was entitled to a percentage of the gate receipts.
_	The Comoros has repeatedly pressed its claim to Mayotte before the United Nations General Assembly, which adopted a series of resolutions under the caption "Question of the Comorian Island of Mayotte", opining that Mayotte belongs to the Comoros under the principle that the territorial integrity of colonial territories should be preserved upon independence.
_	At the same time, neural networks offer a new approach to attack ciphering algorithms based on the principle that any function could be reproduced by a neural network, which is a powerful proven computational tool that can be used to find the inverse-function of any cryptographic algorithm.
_	Love and Will (1969) is a book by American existential psychologist Rollo May, in which he articulates the principle that an awareness of death is essential to life, rather than being opposed to life.
_	The more general definition is based on the principle that pairs of nodes are more likely to be connected if they are both members of the same community(ies), and less likely to be connected if they do not share communities.
_	The deal makes no changes to the principle that child benefit should be paid to citizens no matter where their children reside.
_	Objectivist epistemology begins with the principle that "consciousness is identification".
_	Therapy focuses on the principle that with repetitive motion and wear and tear of muscle tissue, the muscles become tight and fibrotic, causing common symptoms of pain, stiffness, and weakness.
_	Ivar Aasen, however, favoured a more radical approach, based on the principle that the spoken language of people living in the Norwegian countryside, who made up the vast majority of the population, should be regarded as more Norwegian than that of upper-middle class city-dwellers, who for centuries had been substantially influenced by the Danish language and culture.
_	However, from the 13th century onwards, English diocesan bishops successfully established the principle that only the glebe and "greater tithes" could be appropriated by monastic patrons in this manner; sufficient "lesser tithes" had to remain within the parochial benefice to ensure a competent living; the incumbent of which thenceforward carried the title of "vicar".
_	The 71 single-seat constituencies in Lithuania were drawn soon after independence, based on the principle that the number of voters in each constituency should be between 90 and 110 percent of the average number of voters per constituency.
_	In 1809 Gauss had derived the normal distribution from the principle that the arithmetic mean of observations gives the most probable value for the quantity measured; then, turning this argument back upon itself, he showed that, if the errors of observation are normally distributed, the least squares estimates give the most probable values for the coefficients in regression situations.
_	In this way, Justinian not only restricted the religious freedom of the Jews, but also expanded his own power in order to reinforce the principle that, "in theory, there is no area that falls outside of the Empire's legislative power".
_	Some people would yet boldly act on the principle that might was right.
_	The case has been cited as an example of the principle that when the purpose of the copy is mainly financial gain, that weighs against the fair use finding.
_	These tests are based on the principle that if the tissue is infected with a virus, an antibody specific to that virus will be able to bind to it.
_	Aquinas acknowledges the principle that today is known as Occam's razor, but prefers causal explanations to other simple explanations (cf. also Correlation does not imply causation).
_	The Association supports the principle that "drug courts are designed to reduce drug use, reduce crime, repair families, hold addicts accountable and restore them to meaningful roles in society."
_	The common law of business balance is the principle that one cannot pay a little and get a lot.
_	The efficiency–thoroughness trade-off principle (or ETTO principle) is the principle that there is a trade-off between efficiency or effectiveness on one hand, and thoroughness (such as safety assurance and human reliability) on the other.
_	This is the principle that the name of each taxon must be unique.
_	This could not be confirmed as a Russian cyber attack due to non-attribution – the principle that online identity may not serve as proof of real world identity.
_	Schlieren analysis is based on the principle that any disturbances to the surrounding air may be detected (the Schlieren effect), like the shadow cast by the sun through the steam and hot air from a hot coffee, or even the Mirage wave effect caused by the hot air on pavement on a summer day.
_	Other Protestant synods also lay down the rule that persons unable to take wine shall be admitted to the Lord's Table on condition that they shall at least touch with their lips the cup which holds the species of wine; Jurieu, on the other hand, starting from the principle that Christ has founded the essence of the Eucharist on the two species, held that an "abstemius" does not receive the Sacrament, because it consists of two parts, and he receives only one.
_	Britain, with its unchallenged Royal Navy and increasing financial wealth and industrial strength, built its foreign policy on the principle that no state should be allowed to dominate the Continent.
_	Conservation of angular momentum is the principle that the total angular momentum of a system has a constant magnitude and direction if the system is subjected to no external torque.
_	In 1963 the Robbins Committee on Higher Education set out the principle that higher education should be available to all who wanted it and were suitably well qualified.
_	He helped to establish the principle that the newly independent States from the former USSR were entitled to membership in the OSCE, thus giving them their first direct link with Europe and North America.
_	Even then, the ministry expressed the principle that level crossings with existing roads can not be allowed, so that only high, low or gallery railways came into question.
_	ID is based on the principle that meeting basic needs is a fundamental human right which is guaranteed to all who are in a physical condition to offer a minimal amount of work.
_	The Primordial Tradition seeks to establish a fundamental origin of religious belief in all authentic religious teachings, adhering to the principle that universal truths are a cross cultural phenomenon and transcendent of their respective traditions, mythologies, and religious beliefs.
_	He also asserted the principle that the trial was to be held, and the punishment inflicted, in the place where the crime had been committed.
_	Dionysius defined Baptism by its relation to the other sacraments (Eccl. Hier.ii) that it is the principle that forms the habits of the soul for the reception of those most holy words and sacraments; by its relation to heavenly glory, which is the universal end of all sacraments, preparing the way for us, whereby we mount to the repose of the heavenly kingdom, conferring on us our most sacred and Godlike regeneration.
_	The ICTV had adopted the principle that a virus species is a polythetic class of viruses that constitutes a replicating lineage and occupies a particular ecological niche.
_	Many within the political cycles and Sufi Brotherhoods of Northern Nigeria held that Gumi was the principle that drove a wedge between Muslims and non Muslims in Northern Nigeria, his interpretations of the Hadith and Qur'an were based on his own personal views and not the Sunnah, and that he was monopolizing the mass media for his personal views.
_	In 1605, Simon Stevinus was able to solve a number of problems in statics based on the principle that perpetual motion was impossible.
_	George Frederic Watts and his second wife, designer and artist Mary Fraser Tytler, had long been advocates of the idea of art as a force for social change, and of the principle that narratives of great deeds would provide guidance to address the serious social problems of British cities.
_	Children's inability to focus on two aspects of a situation at once inhibits them from understanding the principle that one category or class can contain several different subcategories or classes.
_	However, it was in subsequent developments that the rule was turned from an example of the principle that the first in time rule will not apply if the equities are not equal into an absolute rule that the first to give notice will take priority unless the later assignee was a volunteer or was aware of the earlier assignment at the time he obtained his assignment.
_	In 2014, a team of researchers led by Chunsheung Wang from UMD and Kang Xu from ARL created a new class of aqueous electrolytes called water-in-salt electrolytes (WiSE), which operated under the principle that a high concentration of a specific type of lithium salt resulted in the formation of a protective solid-electrolyte interphase (SEI) in between the electrode surfaces and electrolyte in water-based batteries.
_	An adult's sexual intercourse with someone below the legal age of consent is defined as statutory rape, based on the principle that a child is not capable of consent and that any apparent consent by a child is not considered to be legal consent.
_	The report, published on 26 June, was critical of the Dublin administration, saying that "Ireland for several years had been administered on the principle that it was safer and more expedient to leave the law in abeyance if collision with any faction of the Irish people could thereby be avoided."
_	Steiner then introduces the principle that we can act out of the compulsions of our natural being (reflexes, drives, desires) or out of the compulsion of ethical principles, and that neither of these leaves us free.
_	Creationist cosmology, however, holds that the cause of the universe does lie outside time and space: a 1981 law from the US state of Arkansas setting out six cardinal tenets of "creation science", described the first as the principle that the universe, energy and life were the result of "sudden creation ... from nothing."
_	According to its Constitution, the Student Senate "[serves] as an advocate for all undergraduate students, deriving its power from the consent of the governed and developed on the principle that all undergraduate students of the University of New Hampshire have the right to participate in University governance.
_	Thus, the constitution enshrines the rule of law, yet simultaneously stresses the principle that the 'leadership of the Communist Party' holds primacy over the law.
_	Based on the principle that "man only truly respects what he pays for", Michelin decided to charge a price for the guide, which was about 750 francs or $2.15 in 1922.
_	In European Union law, direct effect is the principle that Union law may, if appropriately framed, confer rights on individuals which the courts of member states of the European Union are bound to recognise and enforce.
_	Co-op dissolved for financial reasons and, in keeping with the principle that co-operatives cooperate with other cooperatives, PCC agreed to provide technical and financial assistance to the Central Co-op to replace it.
_	Two years later, in another landmark case, he applied to a house-husband the principle that a divorced woman who has not contributed financially towards the acquisition of matrimonial assets is nonetheless entitled to a substantial share of them in view of her indirect contributions in the form of paying towards the household expenses or caring for the family.
_	Secondary average operates under the principle that batting average is an incomplete indicator of a hitter's ability since batting average does not account for power, plate discipline, and speed.
_	Inclusive democracy is based on the principle that meeting basic needs is a fundamental human right which is guaranteed to all who are in a physical condition to offer a minimal amount of work.
_	WR3A remains dedicated to the principle that if used computer exports are outlawed, only outlaws will export used computers.
_	Access to public information builds on the principle that in a democratic system people should be in the condition of accessing a wide range of information in order to effectively participate in public life as well as on matters affecting them.
_	In a number of speeches during November 1933, Heidegger endorses the "Führerprinzip" ("leader principle"), i.e. the principle that the Führer is the embodiment of the people; that he is always right and that his word is above all written law and demands total obedience.
_	The episcopal throne embodies the principle that only a bishop makes a cathedral, and this still applies even in those churches that no longer have bishops, but retain cathedral dignity and functions in ancient churches over which bishops formerly presided.
_	But the throne can also embody the principle that a cathedral makes a bishop; both specifically, in that the bishop is elected within the cathedral and is inaugurated by being enthroned within the cathedral by acclamation of clergy and laity; and also generally, in that the bishops' essential qualifications of regular prayer, higher learning and musical worship were for many centuries, primarily accessible through cathedral functions.
_	The patterns include provision for future modification and repair, in keeping with the principle that the most satisfying living spaces are those which, like the lives of their occupants, tend to change and evolve over time.
_	The parabolic arch employs the principle that when weight is uniformly applied to an arch, the internal compression resulting from that weight will follow a parabolic profile.
_	Australian securities regulation rests on the principle that "financial markets cannot function effectively unless participants act with integrity and there is adequate disclosure to facilitate informed judgements".
_	The study of such sums, found in the works of Diophantus, may have prompted Vieta to lay down the principle that quantities occurring in an equation ought to be homogeneous, all of them lines, or surfaces, or solids, or supersolids—an equation between mere numbers being inadmissible.
_	In the proof he notably used the principle that the solution is the function that minimizes the so-called Dirichlet energy.
_	White seemingly blocks his d-pawn, violating the principle that "one should not block one's central pawns with pieces"; however, the bishop is not meant to stay on d3.
_	This approach is based on the principle that an accessible and effective media can:
_	The unusual notrump extends the principle that when the natural meaning of a bid is not generally very useful, it is profitable to agree that it means something somewhat opposite.
_	So although he was incorrect to theorize that there was only one gene involved, the principle that a single gene can have multiple alleles, a revolutionary idea at the time, has proven true.
_	Their primary aims were to change the discriminatory elements of the code, including polygamy and the principle that a husband has ultimate authority over his wife.
_	The Réunion Environmental Charter and the Regional Development Plan formally established the principle that a park should be created in "Les Hauts", the mountainous interior of the island.
_	Levinson states that the role of "Shruti" and "Smriti" in Hindu law is as a source of guidance, and its tradition cultivates the principle that "the facts and circumstances of any particular case determine what is good or bad".
_	The Study Club operated under the principle that "everything was fixed" (which implied law enforcement non- interference with the selling of alcohol).
_	HVLS fans work on the principle that cool moving air breaks up the moisture-saturated boundary layer surrounding the body and accelerates evaporation to produce a cooling effect.
_	In a similar manner, in 1840 Swiss chemist Germain Hess formulated the principle that the evolution of heat in a reaction is the same whether the process is accomplished in one-step process or in a number of stages.
_	The decision established the principle that government could not force a newspaper to publish content.
_	In 1962, the International Agreement on the Neutrality of Laos reaffirmed the principle that no foreign military personnel could be stationed in Laos except for a French training mission.
_	Jefferies' re-design of the "Enterprise" was based on the principle that the technology was updated over time, but the general hull remained the same.
_	However, by the middle of the fourteenth century, the principle that only a single individual was entitled to bear a particular coat of arms was generally accepted, and disputes over the ownership of arms seems to have led to gradual establishment of heraldic authorities to regulate their use.
_	It centered on the principle that a citizen in a particular state should have the right to sue a corporation, which is based in another state and even conducts its business in another state.
_	Cobert brought forward the principle that English courts will not recognize a governmental act affecting private property rights when the property is situated outside the territory of that government; and that English courts will not enforce the "penal, revenue or other public laws of a foreign state"
_	Determining the principle that explains a series of observations is often linked directly to a mathematical model predicting those observations.
_	In 1902 he expressed the principle that "forms derive from needs".
_	This technique works by superposing (interfering) the signal waves from the different telescopes on the principle that waves that coincide with the same phase will add to each other while two waves that have opposite phases will cancel each other out.
_	He argues that early law-makers were guided by the principle that murder was not good for society, and were able to educate other people that this was a rational principle.
_	The most novel changes relate to penal law: the abolition of the "giudatico" (impunity for criminals who had arrested other criminals) and the "esemplarità" (cruel extensions of the death penalty, like quartering the corpse and scattering the ashes); restrictions on the imposition of the death penalty; affirmation of the principle that the punishment should fit the crime; and the distinction between attempted crimes and crimes actually committed.
_	More recently, books such as Nagy's influential 1979 book about epic heroes, "The Best of the Achaeans", and Egbert Bakker's 1997 linguistic study "Poetry as Speech", work on the principle that the radical cross-fertilisation and resonances between different traditions, genres, plot lines, episodes, and type scenes, are actually the driving force behind much of the artistic innovation in Homeric epic.
_	For example, the Talmud establishes the principle that a wife is entitled, but not compelled, to the same dignity and social standing as her husband, and is entitled to keep any additional advantages she had as a result of her social status before her marriage.
_	Iddq testing uses the principle that in a correctly operating quiescent CMOS digital circuit, there is no static current path between the power supply and ground, except for a small amount of leakage.
_	It promotes the principle that quality education, funded publicly, should be available to every student in every country regardless of race.
_	On the 12 July 2002 the Foreign Secretary, Jack Straw, in a formal statement in the House of Commons, said that after twelve months of negotiation the British Government and Spain are in broad agreement on many of the principles that should underpin a lasting settlement of Spain's sovereignty claim, which included the principle that Britain and Spain should share sovereignty over Gibraltar.
_	Guiding of light by refraction, the principle that makes fiber optics possible, was first demonstrated by Daniel Colladon and Jacques Babinet in Paris in the early 1840s.
_	He claimed that it was the first practical use of the dihedral group, and confirmed the principle that in the end, all beautiful mathematics will find a use, even though in practice the algorithm will be implemented using simple lookup tables without needing to understand how to generate those tables from the underlying group and permutation theory.
_	Seems to operate on the principle that if you have enough special interests, eventually you'll have a majority of the people behind you."
_	This principle by logical dexterity is maintained together with another favorite principle, the principle that 'error has no right to exist'."
_	Much of their awareness campaigns are based on the principle that the more that an individual is aware of their own breasts, the more likely they are to spot a change - should one occur.
_	'Reciprocal altruism' can be expressed as the principle that "if you scratch my back, I'll scratch yours."
_	Wenger has been credited with promoting the importance of diet and nutrition in football and advocating the principle that the sport ought to be entertaining on the pitch.
_	The court said it rejected that: "Instead, we read "Banks", "Wheaton", and related cases consistently to enunciate the principle that the law," whether it has its source in judicial opinions or statutes, ordinances or regulations, is not subject to federal copyright law."
_	Act in 2005: "I am surprised that the Sarbanes–Oxley Act, so rapidly developed and enacted, has functioned as well as it has...the act importantly reinforced the principle that shareholders own our corporations and that corporate managers should be working on behalf of shareholders to allocate business resources to their optimum use."
_	Morionism centers on the principle that the soul is housed on a perishing, superficial body that must undergo physical and mental tortures in order to attain the purification and glorification of the soul.
_	In "Robertson v Boyce", the Appeal Court had recognised the principle that dogs were "ferae naturae"; as such, the owners must be taken to know of their vicious propensities.
_	The operators requested a reduction of the Jacksonville scale as well as union acceptance of the principle that wages should be tied to the changing price of coal.
_	According to the drivers, it wasn't so about the money, it was the principle that a licence is a licence and that the fee should be the same for everyone.
_	In "On the Search for the Neural Correlate of Consciousness", Chalmers said he is confident that, granting the principle that something such as what he terms global availability can be used as an indicator of consciousness, the neural correlates will be discovered "in a century or two".
_	Such a strategy called for the concentration of naval forces composed of capital ships, not too large but numerous, well-manned with crews thoroughly trained, and operating under the principle that the best defense is an aggressive offense.
_	The remainder of the essay comprises dissertations on the following subjects: the excellence of Israel, the land of prophecy, which is to other countries what the Jews are to other nations; the sacrifices; the arrangement of the Tabernacle, which, according to Judah, symbolizes the human body; the prominent spiritual position occupied by Israel, whose relation to other nations is that of the heart to the limbs; the opposition evinced by Judaism toward asceticism, in virtue of the principle that the favor of God is to be won only by carrying out His precepts, and that these precepts do not command man to subdue the inclinations suggested by the faculties of the soul, but to use them in their due place and proportion; the excellence of the Hebrew language, which, although sharing now the fate of the Jews, is to other languages what the Jews are to other nations and what Israel is to other lands.
_	The CSM aims at a democratic secular country built on a free citizen that takes part in building a fair society that is open to its surrounding and the world based on the principle that a human being has an absolute value and on the CSM’s principles and mechanism of action.
_	"We all know that one man's terrorist is another man's freedom fighter, and that Reuters upholds the principle that we do not use the word terrorist...
_	Founded on the principle that "All waters belong to the State," the National Water Resources Council was then created and tasked to control and regulate the use and development of water resources in behalf of the government.
_	The consuls are given in two columns, in keeping with the principle that there should always be two consuls.
_	In the context of institutional investment management, intergenerational equity is the principle that an endowed institution's spending rate must not exceed its after-inflation rate of compound return, so that investment gains are spent equally on current and future constituents of the endowed assets.
_	His obituary in "The Times" notes that 'He followed the principle that the aim of archaeology was not to solve problems for one’s own satisfaction or to impress colleagues, but to provide accurate information about the past for the enlightenment of all.
_	1984, which abolished the principle that wage increases of Deputies could only govern until after they have ceased to function those who approved.
_	... that all civilized nations recognize the principle that a subordinate is covered by the orders of his superiors.
_	As he declared in his last great public speech, at the Grey Festival organised in his honour at Edinburgh in September 1834, its purpose was to strengthen and preserve the established constitution, to make it more acceptable to the people at large, and especially the middle classes, who had been the principal beneficiaries of the Reform Act, and to establish the principle that future changes would be gradual, "according to the increased intelligence of the people, and the necessities of the times".
_	They maintained, however, the principle that only the Fourth International, as a consciously Marxist organization of the working class can lead the world revolution.
_	The resolution noted that the shooting down of the two planes, which were part of the Brothers to the Rescue organisation run by Cuban exiles, was a violation of the principle that no weapons were to be used against civil aircraft in flight and that, when intercepting such aircraft, the lives of those on board not should be jeopardised.
_	A number of other activists, in the spirit of civil disobedience, created works of arts containing the infringing code, on the principle that such works are subject to First Amendment principle within the United States.
_	In constructive mathematics, indecomposability or indivisibility (, from the adjective "unzerlegbar") is the principle that the continuum cannot be partitioned into two nonempty pieces.
_	The new government also adopted the principle that Cabinet would normally adopt any AWC recommendation supported by the majority of ministers.
_	Equifinality is the principle that in open systems a given end state can be reached by many potential means.
_	To quote the General Report on Tunny:Turingery introduced the principle that the key differenced at one, now called ΔΚ, could yield information unobtainable from ordinary key.
_	The Public Trust Doctrine is based on the principle that certain resources (such as navigable waters) are too valuable to be privately owned and must remain available for public use.
_	Consequently, it is suggested that the management of the CFP could be improved through the application of the theory of subsidiarity—the principle that political decisions should be handled at the lowest, least-centralised competent level.
_	It works on the principle that the heavier kill mud will sink below the lighter well bore fluids and so bleeding off the pressure will remove the latter leaving an increasing quantity of kill mud in the well bore with successive steps.
_	"The Basic Law: Israel Lands" establishes the principle that Israel Lands are nationally owned, and they can only be leased, not sold.
_	The President specifically called for "upholding the principle that bigger nations can't bully the small."
_	Hartman quantifies this notion by the principle that "each property of the thing is worth as much as each other property, depending on the level of abstraction".
_	Elements of Titoism are characterized by policies and practices based on the principle that in each country, the means of attaining ultimate communist goals must be dictated by the conditions of that particular country, rather than by a pattern set in another country.
_	Tonometry is based on the principle that at equilibrium the partial pressure of a diffusible gas such as CO2 is the same in both the wall and lumen of a viscus.
_	“We declare allegiance to the principle that:
_	This maxim represents the principle that states must either surrender a criminal within their jurisdiction to a state that wishes to prosecute the criminal or prosecute the offender in its own courts.
_	Primitive communism, according to both Morgan and Engels, was based in the matrilineal clan where women lived with their classificatory sisters – applying the principle that "my sister’s child is my child".
_	Coke, despite the fear in Parliament, stood and spoke, citing historical precedents supporting the principle that members of the Commons could, within Parliament, say whatever they wished – something now codified as Parliamentary privilege.
_	Prichard differed from Blumenbach and other predecessors by the principle that people should be studied by combining all available characters.
_	South African businessman Johann Rupert, chairman of Richemont, proposed that an organisation be created "based on the principle that sport can bridge the gaps in society and change the way people look at the world."
_	in which he lays down the principle that union with Christ is effected by the three great mysteries of baptism, chrismation, and the eucharist.
_	On October 3, 1965, President Lyndon B. Johnson signed the legislation into law, saying, "This [old] system violates the basic principle of American democracy, the principle that values and rewards each man on the basis of his merit as a man.
_	In his summing up on 22 April Lord Dyson said that it was "most unfortunate" Sandiford required "relatively speaking ... [a] very small sum indeed" for her legal costs, but that this "cannot affect the principle that we have had to consider and it cannot affect our decision.
_	The bill established the principle that retained corporate earnings could be taxed.
_	These pumps work on the principle that gas molecules can be given momentum in a desired direction by repeated collision with a moving solid surface.
_	Educational progressivism is the belief that education must be based on the principle that humans are social animals who learn best in real-life activities with other people.
_	Lord Rosebery summed up the fears of Anglicisation in 1882, stating that the new legislation was framed on the principle that "every part of the United Kingdom must be English, because it is part of the United Kingdom".
_	Working on the principle that "human rights defenders are one of the main actors fighting against impunity in the name of justice", PI runs field projects in several countries (the Democratic Republic of the Congo, Uganda, Nepal, Thailand, Colombia, Guatemala, Honduras) and conflict-stricken zones such as the East and Horn of Africa in collaboration with local partner organisations.
_	Thus, logical positivism indirectly asserted Hume's law, the principle that "is" statements cannot justify "ought" statements, but are separated by an unbridgeable gap.
_	In the case of the latter she argued for the development of training for teachers along Froebelian lines and developed the principle that was also to inform her general educational program, which is the first the education of the senses, then the education of the intellect.
_	The congruence between the principles and methods is not only fundamental to achieving the goal, or only determinant of the degree of correspondence between the object and its primary concepts or theoretical, is the foundation that defines the process, or more precisely the principle that is indeed.
_	And yet, on the other hand, there is another general principle of engineering drawing that nearly diametrically opposes all this effort and intent—that is, the principle that "users are not to scale the drawing to infer a dimension not labeled."
_	Some religious leaders reinforced the principle that an additional purpose of the "hijab" was to protect the Islamic people and customs.
_	The case also continues to be cited in deportation cases, for the principle that a decision to recommend deportation following a conviction must be justified by the potential detriment to the UK if the person is allowed to stay.
_	Such measures establish the importance of a node in a network based on the principle that connections to high-scoring nodes contribute more to the score of the node.
_	established the principle that material prepared by a government
_	Client confidentiality is the principle that an institution or individual should not reveal information about their clients to a third party without the consent of the client or a clear legal reason.
_	This technique works by superposing (interfering) the signal waves from the different telescopes on the principle that waves that coincide with the same phase will add to each other while two waves that have opposite phases will cancel each other out.
_	Although there is wide agreement on the principle that education, at least at school level, should be financed mainly by governments, there is considerable debate over the desirable extent of public provision of education.
_	Alfred Rosenberg in an editorial in the "Völkischer Beobachter" declared that killing an ethnic Pole like Pietrzuch was no crime as National Socialists like himself rejected the principle that the life of a Pole was equal to the life of a German as National Socialism was based on the belief in the inequality of humanity.
_	According to garden historians David and Michigo Young, at the heart of the Japanese garden is the principle that a garden is a work of art.
_	He laid more emphasis than other teachers of his era on the principle that instruction should subserve education.
_	Both the embodiment and social cultural perspectives share the principle that gestures are not just indicators of development, but play an important role in how children come to understand object-directed relations and human intention.
_	To compensate for the possibility of a cell failure during a dive, three cells are generally fitted, on the principle that failure of one cell at a time is most likely, and that if two cells indicate the same P, they are more likely to be correct than the single cell with a different reading.
_	A common interpretation is that Rousseau valued the ethics of authenticity over rational moral principles, as he illustrates the principle that one should do what is imposed upon him by society only insofar as it would seem congruent with one's "secret principles" and feelings, being constituent of one's core identity.
_	Hausman, along with Mann and Penn, founded the independent music collective United Musicians, which is based on the principle that every artist should be able to retain copyright ownership of the work he or she has created.
_	The statute also endorsed the principle that the interpretation of the Scriptures should be done under the aegis of proper authority, namely the Puritan leaders, in order to avoid "false glosses of saint seeming deceivers".
_	The Convention follows the civil law tradition, with a preamble, in which the principle that "all human rights are universal, indivisible, interdependent and interrelated " of Vienna Declaration and Programme of Action is cited, followed by 50 articles.
_	In a referendum organised by the Government of Gibraltar on 7 November 2002, voters overwhelmingly rejected the principle that Spain and the United Kingdom should share sovereignty over Gibraltar, by 17,900 votes to 187 on a turnout of almost 88%.
_	The compromises that were reached in a series of immigration laws in the 1920s established the principle that the number of new arrivals should be small, and, apart from family reunification, the inflow of new immigrants should match the ethnic profile of the nation as it existed at that time.
_	Burley also seems to have been the only 14th-century logician to have taken the position that, in line with modern views on the material conditional, the principle that "from the impossible anything follows" (""ex impossibili sequitur quidlibet"") is both a necessary and sufficient condition for explaining the logical relationship between antecedent and consequent.
_	KHAGENDRA NATH which affirmed the principle that sentencing power of judiciary and executive are readily distinguishable.
_	Moses b. Naḥman, indeed, follows another opinion in his commentary on Genesis in holding to the principle that 'the Torah speaks according to the manner of men'; but we can justly say that men speak according to the manner of the Torah" ("Ḥiḳḳur Din," iii. 22).
_	Though much Protestant religious thought is based on "sola scriptura" (the principle that the Bible itself is the ultimate authority in doctrinal matters), the first Protestant reformers, like the Catholic and Orthodox churches, used the theological interpretations of scripture set forth by the early Church Fathers.
_	"Virginia v. West Virginia" was also one of the first cases to establish the principle that Congress may give implied consent, and that such consent may be inferred from the context in which action was taken.
_	In order to measure the accurate mass of an atom, a high-resolution mass spectrometer, based on the principle that the mass of any molecule (except for multi-hydrogen molecules) is lower than the mass of an atom with the same mass number, was used in order to separate between the mass of an atom and the masses of molecules of the same mass number was used.
_	This policy is based on the principle that any amount of radiation exposure, no matter how small, can increase the chance of negative biological effects such as cancer.
_	It is also based on the principle that the probability of the occurrence of negative effects of radiation exposure increases with cumulative lifetime dose.
_	His predecessor, Bishop Pontbriand, reiterated the principle that Christians should accord princes the respect and obedience which is their due (Romans 13:1-7).
_	Americans were profoundly committed to the principle that republicanism could never be allowed to disappear, so crusades roused their emotional intensity.
_	The stadia method is based upon the principle that in similar triangles homologous sides are proportional.
_	The first direct attack came through "Massey v Boulden", where the Court of Appeal held that "Hansard" could not be used in criminal law cases, because of "the principle that penal statutes are to be narrowly construed intervenes to resolve any ambiguity without resort to Hansard".
_	Unlike professional mental health services, which were usually based on the medical model, peer-run services were based on the principle that individuals who have shared similar experiences can help themselves and each other through self-help and mutual support.
_	An organisation called the Free Church Defence Association believed that "it was wrong not to put Professor Macleod on trial in the General Assembly and that the majority has therefore departed from the principle that allegations of misconduct must be investigated not by a Committee of the General Assembly but by the whole General Assembly."
_	In 1316, Philip V the Tall definitively established the principle that only male descendants of Hugh Capet, born of a legitimate marriage, can succeed to the French throne.
_	A solid oxide electrolysis cell works on the principle that, at elevated temperatures, certain ceramic oxides, such as yttria-stabilized zirconia (YSZ) and doped ceria, become oxide ion (O) conductors.
_	This is the principle that each nominal taxon in the family group, genus group, or species group has—actually or potentially—a name-bearing type fixed that provides the objective standard of reference that determines what the name applies to.
_	The A.V. Club wrote, "Operating under the principle that a moving camera is always better than a static one – and not above throwing in a terrifying evil doll – "Deep Red" showcases the technical bravado and loopy shock tactics that made Argento famous."
_	The Center is guided by the principle that economic policy and social programs should be based on scientific evidence.
_	To compensate for the possibility of a cell failure during a dive, three cells are generally fitted, on the principle that failure of one cell at a time is most likely, and that if two cells indicate the same P, they are more likely to be correct than the single cell with a different reading.
_	At the 2nd Regional Congress (held in March 1965), it was decided to endorse the principle that the Regional Secretary of the Regional Command would be the "ex officio" head of state, and the Regional Command acquired the power to appoint the prime minister, the cabinet, the chief of staff, and the top military commanders.
_	The core teachings of the "Seth Material" are based on the principle that consciousness creates matter, and that each individual creates his or her own reality through thoughts, beliefs and expectations, and that the "point of power" through which the individual can effect change is in the present moment.
_	The Sony α model system works on the principle that the next model up in the series has additional features to the one below; for example the α330 has the features of the base model α230 but with a tilt-angle LCD and Quick AF Live View, while the α380 has the settings and features of the α330 but increased resolution of 14.2 megapixels.
_	The standards for new sources may be more stringent than that for existing facilities, on the principle that a new plant can be designed with the latest and most advanced control technologies.
_	In it, de Lolme advocated a constitutional form of government enshrining the principle that monarchy, aristocracy and democracy should be balanced against each other.
_	Baykeeper was by Michael Herz on the principle that California's waterways are common property, owned by all who use and enjoy them.
_	Porter took Fromm’s Freudian frame of reference and modified it based on the principle that the primary drive is for self-worth, or self-actualization.
_	Constantine established the principle that emperors could not settle questions of doctrine on their own, but should summon instead general ecclesiastical councils for that purpose.
_	Reviewing the episode "Kiss Kiss Bang Bang" for "The Daily Telegraph" James Walton was sceptical about the fact that "some of the fawning [over Captain Jack] even came from the main baddie" and what he felt to be the indication that the character was "thrown into the mix on the principle that one glamorous space-travelling bisexual isn’t enough."
_	Access to public information builds on the principle that in a democratic system people should be in the condition of accessing a wide range of information in order to effectively participate in public life as well as on matters affecting them.
_	It established the principle that one state, in its dealings with another, cannot place itself in economic isolation.
_	This may be derived by proceeding with the principle that historically gives the Pythagorean diatonic and chromatic scales, stacking perfect fifths with 3:2 frequency proportions (C-G-D-A-E).
_	The concept of range is based on the principle that, no matter how strong or fast the opponent is, it means nothing if they can't reach their target.
_	Direct reference is the principle that singular terms contribute their referents to the propositions expressed by the sentences which contain them.
_	Semantic innocence is the principle that "embedding" a term or name in a "that" clause should not change its semantic value.
_	Each of these cases was decided on the principle that patents and plant breeders' rights were overlapping and not mutually exclusive.
_	For another illustration of the principle that the count/non-count distinction lies not in an object but rather in the expression that refers to it, consider the English words "fruit" and "vegetables".
_	A business union is a type of trade union that is opposed to class or revolutionary unionism and has the principle that unions should be run like businesses.
_	Like RFLP, CAPS works on the principle that genetic differences between individuals can create or abolish restriction endonuclease restriction sites, and that these differences can be detected in the resulting DNA fragment length after digestion.
_	The Satoyama Initiative is based on the principle that such landscapes, when properly managed, can benefit both biodiversity and human livelihoods, rather than these being in a state of opposition, thus leading to "society in harmony with nature".
_	At the Congress of Vienna was born the Conservative Order, the principle that the legitimate monarchies of Europe should be inviolable, in both their constitution and territory.
_	Inherent to the group’s philosophy is the principle that by maintaining one’s own property, others are inspired to follow by example.
_	This includes supporting a broad interpretation of the First Amendment's guarantee of free exercise of religion and laws protecting religious freedom, supporting laws to advance religious liberty, and supporting the principle that religion must not be co-opted by the state through regulation or through financial entanglements.
_	British philosopher Antony Flew proposed a similar challenge based on the principle that, in so far as assertions of religious belief cannot be empirically falsified, religious statements are rendered meaningless.
_	The method allows for use of other scaling schemes, following the principle that intensity strength is measured in the same way across attributes.
_	Nor does it prevent the government from retrying the defendant after an appellate reversal other than for sufficiency, including "habeas corpus", or "thirteenth juror" appellate reversals notwithstanding sufficiency on the principle that jeopardy has not "terminated."
_	During the Great Depression, Peterson drafted and subsequently defended the constitutionality of the Minnesota Mortgage Moratorium Act, a signature Depression-era reform which sustained the principle that States could adopt moratoria on bank foreclosures.
_	On 1 October Prime Minister Takeo Fukuda announced that the Japanese government would accept the hijackers' demands, on the principle that "the life of a single person outweighs the earth."
_	It is one of the more outspokenly interfaith of New Thought organizations, stating adherence to "the principle that Truth is Truth where ever it is found and who ever is sharing it".
_	The Commonwealth bases the funding for charter schools on the principle that the state’s subsidies should follow the students, regardless of whether they choose to attend traditional public schools or charter schools.
_	Most squeezes operate on the principle that declarer's and dummy's hands can, between them, hold more cards with the potential to take extra tricks than a single defender's hand can protect or "guard".
_	This ability of information to be carried on different physical systems or media is described as "interoperability", and arises as the principle that the combination of two information media is also an information medium.
_	But human weakness and wilfulness began to throw off the bridle of Christian discipline in family life; civil rulers began to disown the authority of the Church over the marriage tie; and rationalism sought to sustain them by establishing the principle that the marriage contract is not a sacrament at all, or at least that the natural contract and the sacrament are separable and distinct things.
_	It uses the principle that the positive phase angle of an inductive impedance can be compensated by the negative phase angle of a capacitive impedance when put in the opposite arm and the circuit is at resonance; i.e., no potential difference across the detector (an AC voltmeter or ammeter)) and hence no current flowing through it.
_	The organization is based on the principle that fresh and prepared food should not be going to waste while in the same city people are hungry.
_	The model for Violence-Free Zones was developed by the Center for Neighborhood Enterprise and is based on the principle that lack of parental involvement and guidance is at the root of violence among youth in these high-risk communities.
_	In the eleventh century, two Karaite reformists rejected the principle that a marriage was a true and full union, instead arguing that the only relationships that should be forbidden were those analogous to those in the Biblical prohibitions.
_	Genetic association studies today are based on the principle that genotypes can be compared "directly", i.e. with the sequences of the actual genomes or exomes via whole genome sequencing or whole exome sequencing.
_	Whole language instruction was predicated on the principle that children could learn to read given (a) proper motivation, (b) access to good literature, (c) many reading opportunities, (d) focus on meaning, and (e) instruction to help students use meaning clues to determine the pronunciation of unknown words.
_	In law, the last injurious exposure rule is the principle that when an occupational disease was caused by a succession of jobs, or could have been caused by any one of a succession of jobs, the most recent employer with the risk exposure is liable.
_	This "void-for-vagueness" rule may be based either on the right to a fair trial in general or on the principle that, if a criminal norm in legislation is vague and uncertain, it cannot be stated that the act or omission in question actually constituted an offence prior to a court's interpretation of the legislation.
_	The Roman law, as also the Roman-Dutch law, recognises the principle that, generally speaking, no one is bound to mind the business of another, even where he can, with no danger or expense to himself, avert serious harm from the other, and that no liability is incurred by refraining from doing so, even if the omission should violate a moral duty [...]
_	American constitutionalism has been defined as a complex of ideas, attitudes and patterns elaborating the principle that the authority of government derives from the people, and is limited by a body of fundamental law.
_	The process is based on the principle that precious metals do not oxidise or react chemically, unlike the base metals; so when they are heated at high temperatures, the precious metals remain apart and the others react forming slags or other compounds.
_	When determination of social place is by role, one’s merit is the principle that determines the job one holds.
_	"Zadvydas" was cited in a subsequent Supreme Court case, "Clark v. Martinez", that reiterated the principle that all people within the United States were entitled to due process and could not be deprived of liberty indefinitely.
_	It works on the principle that any individual who shares its values can be an equal part of its work.
_	Regular Freemasonry has traditionally not responded to these claims, beyond the often repeated statement that those Grand Lodges in amity with UGLE explicitly adhere to the principle that "Freemasonry is not a religion, nor a substitute for religion.
_	This is a perfectly straightforward application of the principle that the first in time will only prevail if the equities are equal and is not considered controversial.
_	Human rights also includes gender equality and the principle that vulnerable groups need special protections, including children, the aged, the disabled, oppressed racial and ethnic minorities, migrants, and indigenous peoples.
_	In mathematics, the principle that says that if the number of players is one more than the number of chairs, then one player is left standing, is the pigeonhole principle.
_	Policy reforms implemented within the Administration were based on the principle that traditional processes, independent in each Government Department or Public Institution, is built according to past reforms, but is also a reflection of past failures.
_	The alternative is to donate the primary demand valve that the donor is currently breathing from, on the principle that it is known to be working and is immediately recognizable and accessible.
_	Explicit in the court's decision was the principle that the confidentiality of the therapeutic relationship is subordinate to the safety of society and its members.
_	Rand held that Romanticism was the highest school of literary art, noting that Romanticism was "based on the recognition of the principle that man possesses the faculty of volition," absent which, Rand believed, literature is robbed of dramatic power, adding:
_	An electric generator works based on the principle that whenever conductor cuts the magnetic field,an emf is induced which will cause the current to flow if conductor circuit is closed.
_	We find in this, as in many books for boys, a certain monotony in the inculcation of the principle that honesty is the best policy, a proposition that, as far as mere temporal success is concerned, we believe to be only partially true.
_	Asset allocation is based on the principle that different assets perform differently in different market and economic conditions.
_	In Article 25(2), Rahman introduced the principle that '"the state shall endeavour to consolidate, preserve and strengthen fraternal relations among Muslim countries based on Islamic solidarity.".
_	According to Alfred H. Knight, the phrase "had profound long-term consequences for the development of constitutional law", because its consequences forced the king to accept the benefit of clergy, the principle that secular courts had no jurisdiction over clergy.
_	In part based on the principle that legal persons are simply organizations of natural persons, and in part based on the history of statutory interpretation of the word "person", the US Supreme Court has repeatedly held that certain constitutional rights protect legal persons (such as corporations and other organizations).
_	Bray and Stanley (1997) summarized TOFD as tip-diffraction techniques which utilized the principle that the tips of a crack when struck by a wave will diffract the signals back to the other location on the surface.
_	By far his most important work was "Philosophy of the Unconditioned," the development of the principle that for the human finite mind there can be no knowledge of the Infinite.
_	Deeply impressed with Kant's antithesis between subject and object, the knowing and the known, Hamilton laid down the principle that every object is known only in virtue of its relations to other objects.
_	Richard's claim to the throne was based on the principle that the son of an elder brother had priority in the succession over his uncles.
_	The court relied upon "Stein v Blake" [1998] 1 All ER 724 (at 727D and 729G "per" Millett LJ) for the principle that a duality of duties may exist.
_	In virtually all cases, the EU follows the principle that member states can always create rights more beneficial to workers.
_	As a heat storage stove, it worked on the principle that a heavy frame made from cast iron components can absorb heat from a relatively low-intensity but continuously-burning source, and the accumulated heat can then be used when needed for cooking.
_	"Murdock v. Memphis" is cited today as instrumental in establishing the principle that interpretation of state law is the province of the state courts, and that, in particular, the state Supreme Courts, rather than the federal courts, have final jurisdiction in this area.
_	He also clearly articulated the principle that magnets always have both a north and south pole, no matter how finely one slices them.
_	"Charge quantization" is the principle that the charge of any object is an integer multiple of the elementary charge.
_	The Assembly has established the principle that the UN should not be unduly dependent on any one member to finance its operations.
_	We oppose any unilateral steps by either side to alter the status quo in the Taiwan Straits on the principle that all issues regarding the island’s future must be resolved peacefully, through dialogue, and be agreeable to the people of Taiwan.
_	They founded the organization on the principle that citizens acting together could maintain and improve the quality of life in their neighborhoods and help commercial endeavors prosper once again.
_	His sermons suggest that William was a conservative theologian committed to the principle that philosophers should not attempt to use philosophy to resolve purely theological questions.
_	Operating under the principle that electrical resistance varies with temperature, a platinum wire resistive temperature device measures the ambient air temperature.
_	The theory works on the principle that the amount of reflection possible within such an environment depends upon the type of cognitive engagement, i.e. fascination; that the environment holds.
_	No-frills businesses operate on the principle that by removing luxurious additions, customers may be offered lower prices.
_	Grey took office as Prime Minister of the United Kingdom in 1830, Sir John Barrow was especially requested to continue serving as Secretary in his department (the Admiralty), starting the principle that senior civil servants stay in office on change of government and serve in a non-partisan manner.
_	The place later became the focus of the Otago Association, an offshoot of the Free Church of Scotland, notable for its high-minded adoption of the principle that ordinary people, not the landowner, should choose the ministers.
